title,selftext,subreddit
"A question about gay men who pose as women on tinder to attract ""Straight"" men","It's a thing in Online dating, where occasionally I'd match with a ""woman"" and it turns out that in fact this woman is a ""man"" seeking   a samesex relationship with another man.

I get it that there are *sad* repressed people masquerading as heterosexuals who in fact are repressed queers and some people find those repressed people attractive. I'm just not that sort of repressed person. 

When I get one of those matches and the truth comes out I politely explain I'm not interested and perhaps the person seeking a same sex relationship will have better luck next time.

What are the breadcrumbs that people put on their profiles that make people think a person would want a same sex relationship and what cues should I use to indicate that I'm not interested.

FWIW if I wanted to explore a same sex relationship - I'd fire up grindr ",queer
"From Brazil to the US, Fight for Trans Rights",,queer
Cyberus is a growing 16+ server that exists to network LGBT+ content creators and to promote gay media in hopes of creating a richer artistic community !,,queer
Spoop Town Usa Halloween Makeup Lewk.,,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! 
The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 
Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 
Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org
Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

",queer
NYC Trans Woman run over by FDNY ambulance - UPDATE &amp; PETITION! Day 877 of hell for her,[https://www.change.org/p/mayor-bill-de-blasio-de-blasio-protect-trans-new-yorkers-from-government-worker-abuse-discrimination?recruiter=2779849&amp;utm\_source=share\_petition&amp;utm\_medium=copylink&amp;utm\_campaign=share\_petition&amp;utm\_term=04363789edcf40c684c9aed87d127e4b](https://www.change.org/p/mayor-bill-de-blasio-de-blasio-protect-trans-new-yorkers-from-government-worker-abuse-discrimination?recruiter=2779849&amp;utm_source=share_petition&amp;utm_medium=copylink&amp;utm_campaign=share_petition&amp;utm_term=04363789edcf40c684c9aed87d127e4b),queer
Bisexual vs lesbian. Who’s to identify,,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! 

The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 

Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

&amp;#x200B;

&amp;#x200B;",queer
Sex-Ed : how to lesbians have sex!,,queer
Opium Music by Mimi Bordeaux,"Listen to Come Around by Mimi Bordeaux #np on #SoundCloud
https://soundcloud.com/mimi-bordeaux/come-around",queer
"Dwarf looking to get pegged by filthy fake tits tranny, shaved minge preferably.",I’m also open to getting feather dusters shoved up my ass as long as you let me fulfill my “crushing” fetish on your beloved family pet or goldfish.Will fuck the occasional fatty but don’t think it will turn serious lol don’t want to get slagged by me mates in the pub. ,queer
How Robyn Became a Queer Icon: An Investigation,,queer
I went to university to escape homophobic bullying at work.,,queer
How to tell if a girl is gay... according to google! Check it out. Some of the tips might be helpful 👀,,queer
A film about Gay Bronx Dudes,,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"
Research Study for FL Residents! 
The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 
Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 
Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org
Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

",queer
Queer Artists Needed for Research Paper!,"\[CLOSED, thanks to all who helped/offered their help!\]

Hi all!

I'm an IB student and I'm doing my Extended Essay on the subject of queer art, titled 'In What Ways Does Queer Art Affect Societal Opinion and Understanding?'

Are there any queer artists (digital or physical art) on here who would be happy to send me a portfolio and answer some questions about the topic? I already have two trans women on board so a bit more diversity would be appreciated (trans men, nonbinary people, gay people, bi people, etc.)

Just a heads up, it'll probably take a few days to get back to you with the questions.

Thanks! \^\_\^",queer
IRB approved study looking at Bisexual Representation in the Media," 

Hi there,

My name is Rachel and I am a PhD student and bisexual researcher at UMass Boston. I am reaching out to see if you would be willing to participate in a study exploring how female bisexuality is depicted in the media. We are looking for bi- identified folks who are willing to fill out a short survey and watch a video. Your participation would be a valuable contribution to this study, and if you know other folks who would be interested in participating, feel free to forward this link!

&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/shcx7cpitao11.png

survey link: [https://umassboston.qualtrics.com/j…/form/SV\_6WOsZl1i2BrfRfD](https://umassboston.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_6WOsZl1i2BrfRfD)",queer
QUEER REGGEATON MIX- LATIN X- DJ MINAS,,queer
Commercialized gay culture locales aren't the same as queer venues for example around Cambridge/Somerville and in Waltham!,"Commercialized gay culture locales aren't the same as queer venues for example around Cambridge/Somerville and in Waltham!... Queer Resource Center Brandeis https://www.google.com/search?q=queer+center The future Cambridge Queer Cultural Center will be modeled after http://queerculturalcenter.org/Pages/MainMenu/About.html

Mainstream gay culture addressed by the Gay Shame Movement https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Gay_Shame

",queer
Question. What does it mean to you to identify as queer?,"I've never seen or heard a clear definition, and some times here conflicting things. So here asking for some clarification. Thanks!",queer
Video by Mimi Bordeaux,Anthrax Party by Mimi Bordeaux https://api.jam-community.com/song/detail/97567504-bbca-11e8-93ba-0679f364d8e4,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! 
The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 
Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 
Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org
Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

",queer
Queer Menta Health Survey,"Hi everyone! I am a trans, queer identified therapist associate who is trying to fix the mental health need gaps within the queer community.

I’m working on collecting some information to help advance mental health care for queer identified individuals. In order to do so I would love it if you could take this survey if you fall in the queer and trans spectrum. No prior experience in receiving mental health treatment is necessary. Please share and pass along as well! It shouldn't take more than 15 minutes.

Thank you!

[https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLSeV4XmGJJ105i6\_xYYERk8Y-x2CKHT5ShU3Eqlo30RRPiZhqw/viewform](https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLSeV4XmGJJ105i6_xYYERk8Y-x2CKHT5ShU3Eqlo30RRPiZhqw/viewform)

&amp;#x200B;",queer
Seraque,,queer
Why did this shifty subreddit ban me?,,queer
Paid relationship education program for male couples!,"Hey! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give y'all some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for cisgender male couples.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn healthy relationship skills like communication, healthy sexuality, emotional support, and other ways to strengthen your relationship. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible to take part, you'll see a consent form, which has more info about your privacy rights.

Fun bonus: as a thank you for completing all parts of 2GETHER, each partner will receive $250!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: [https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY](https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY)

Even more info on our website: [http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/](http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/)

IRB #STU00202802, STU00202939",queer
Winterland,,queer
Yes talk about the first I went to a lesbian bar and the first time I bought a girl a drink 😋,,queer
The queer designer knitting neon ’90s glitchwear,,queer
Being told you don't act gay or act straight can be a real issue for us.,"I found this article that sums up the topic very nicely and thought I'd share it with you all.

https://www.intomore.com/you/moving-past-passing",queer
"Buffy, the Coming Out Slayer?",,queer
Found this condom ad from Sweden - beautiful garden scene with two guys,,queer
I love reddit!:),,queer
Sing,You guys should try Badoo Live – I livestreamed for 2 minutes and got 0 viewers! https://bdo.to/u/3inbi5q,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! 

The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

&amp;#x200B;",queer
"I [33] recently realised I've never felt as a male, but I don't feel like a female either. Any directions?","On the one hand, I was thinking this is truly privileged from me, as in this is one of the ideals to aim for, to not feel constrained into feeling like a male or a female.

Yet I have been, of course, unconsciously bound by typically male aesthetics and thinking all my life. It's just that now I'm kind of challenging the whole idea for the first time ever, after struggling a lot to find solutions for my image and feelings, and finding little or none.

Not that I haven't struggled with the whole area of life that has to do with sexuality and gender —I do, a lot—, but it's that I never thought of it this way until now: I asked myself, did I ever feel ""male""? And I struggle to find occasions where I did.

I was wondering if there's any name for this (genderless?) and if there were any suggestions on where could I read current theory on this matter.

For clarity: It's not either that I feel like I have some male things and some other female ones, and fond of both as such as in non-binary, but more that I feel like none of what I have is bound to the male or the female world. For an example, I have a penis, and I like it, but it's not as if that's important to me or my identity, I wouldn't care if I had a vagina instead. Or about character traits, I don't feel fond or dislike any of those for me because they are more male or female, but just fond or not fond of them.",queer
Shamelessly looking for friends!,"I live in a very conservative area in the southern US. I don't have any queer friends or friends who relate to the struggles that I am going through. I would love to find a cool group of people online to chat with and even penpals to send letters and packages to. If you're interested, shoot me your info, and we can make it happen!

Love you all! ♥💛💚💜💙
Jonathan",queer
Where do you get style/fashion inspo?,Need another shake up of my wardrobe but not sure where to start atm!,queer
A TV show with a trans male lead made by a queer woman," 

I’m a filmmaker who’s previously had a short in Outfest, and I just made this show for PlayStation! One of our leads is a trans guy (trigger warning: in first episode other characters misgender him, we intend that to change going forward if we get picked up to series, hoping to explore what it would mean to come out while under witness protection). 

The story follows him and his family as they adapt to life in a small town in witness protection. It sort of takes a new spin on family dramas, crime shows, and the shows we’ve seen about queer life in the past, so hopefully you all will enjoy and  love our trans male lead JJ, who is an amazing actor! 

[https://www.playstation.com/en-us/network/playstation-video/emerging-filmmakers/two-roads/](https://www.playstation.com/en-us/network/playstation-video/emerging-filmmakers/two-roads/)",queer
Queerology and The Truth of Fitting No Where—A Ramble,"I’ve been finding it very interesting to maneuver myself in queerology, if you will. I identify myself as queer, genderqueer, and in most cases I feel heavily connected to a two spirited identity.the way that the media has portrayed queer, is not my cup of tea as well. 

Over the past few years, I’ve been struggling with trying to figure out my placement in the world. And honestly, I come closer and closer to the conclusion that I don’t truly have a specific place. I am here to learn and “grow” as a root for those to gander around me. I could easily force what I think onto others, but it is not my place to force them to learn anything, or to adapt to a different mindset. All I can do is encourage it. 

Not really sure why I’m deciding to post here—except no one knows who I am. But there are many people that I think can relate to me on some level. The traditions and the things that my parents have taught me, truly have traumatize me—and I have let it consume my everything; how I approach my speech, my job, my relationships, my walk in life, on and on and on and on.

But I’ve come to a very large understanding of what it is that I need to be doing in order to debunk these ole thoughts and ways. And that is just DOING it. Doing the truth. Speaking the truth. Being the truth of myself. 

I can not do anything better than that. 
Not to mention, sex is a huuuuuuggeeee part of that. 

I’m sure I’ll be back to discuss these things further. Or if you’re interested, I’d love to talk. ",queer
is any body home?,,queer
Beginner make-up on a budget?,"Can anyone recommend some affordable make-up? Mostly looking for eye makeup but also anything else that is useful. I was AMAB and feel no sort of dysphoria surrounding my gender, but I feel more gender neutral and have always loved makeup so want to give it a try. ",queer
Bullets are more effective than conversion therapy,Tell me I’m wrong 😭👳🏿‍♂️.,queer
Homosexuality is unnatural,Homosexuality offers a species no particular advantage or help in survival and continuing to produce offspring. Ban me from this subreddit plz ,queer
MYCK Launch Day Hype Train's Contributor Bio! - Mouna,"&amp;#x200B;

https://i.redd.it/npym5q6v6ii11.png

 

My life and interests are at the intersections of feminism, queerness, and geek culture.

I enjoy audio dramas, webcomics, manga/anime, visual novel games. My favorite fictions could be described as “female-gaze.”

Comic creator, hobbyist romance novelist, occasional harmonica player, full-time disaster gay. Chaotic Good.

Uses the ojou-san laugh and “uwu” without irony.",queer
Fun and creative ways to come out to your parents in 2018!,,queer
My first girl crush. Super important to recognize when the shift started to happen...,,queer
It’s been two years since I’ve heard from my mother after she kicked me out.... here’s the result,,queer
Jonathan Van Ness is just the best person on TV,,queer
Looking for feedback - Our new Gay Youtube Series - Just uploaded our first episode! Plz check it out and comment! 😜👊,"Hey Everyone,

Marc here from Australia, looking to connect online with other peeps across the world!

Me and my bestie just started a new Gay YouTube series to connect and engage with others as well as have fun basically! Would love for you to check it out, and leave a comment and let me know what you think. If you subscribe as well then you're a downright champion!

[https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=Zk85XqRaddk&amp;feature=youtu.be](https://m.youtube.com/watch?v=Zk85XqRaddk&amp;feature=youtu.be)",queer
‘The Miseducation of Cameron Post' is another step for the community in pop culture.,,queer
First transgender poetry meet in India! ✌🏻,,queer
Aja from Ru Paul’s drag race talks about discrimination in the queer community.,,queer
It’s a problem.,,queer
ISO LGBTQ+ adults to take survey for my dissertation research,"I  identify as queer and my research focuses on LGBTQ+ individuals'  family experiences. My dissertation aims to explore how LGBTQ+ adult  children's parent child communication relates to their mental health  outcomes and relationship satisfaction.

Are  you an adult who identifies as LGBTQ+  (lesbian, gay, bisexual,   transgender, queer, nonbinary or gender queer,  pansexual, asexual,  aromantic, etc.)? Please consider taking this  20-30 minute survey to  participate in my dissertation research! The survey is anonymous and   participation is   voluntary. I am a doctoral candidate at the  University  of Missouri  and  this research is IRB approved.

I greatly appreciate you and your time. Feel  free to share this post.

[https://missouri.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV\_80bBBmQhQ9qZWzX](https://missouri.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_80bBBmQhQ9qZWzX)",queer
Questioning your sexuality? Watch this video and hopefully it will help you.,,queer
"[Sexual Health] Under 30 and living with HIV? (Chicago, US 16-29 yo)","Are you an HIV-positive young person (under 30 y/o) who is taking medication for HIV? Are you having trouble taking your HIV medications? The Positive STEPS research team at Ann &amp; Robert H. Lurie Children’s Hospital of Chicago is interested in learning how to find ways to help young folks take their HIV medications! If eligible, we'll invite you to our research office in Uptown Chicago for a visit. Participants can earn up to $310. 

To  learn more and to see if you're eligible calling us at 872.228.9051!

More information about the study can be found on our website: www.luriechildrens.org/positivesteps

Approved by the Brown University IRB # 1605001507 (PIs: M. Mimiaga/R. Garofalo)",queer
Accessing mental health resources.,"Hey all! I'm a master's student from the University of London, Goldsmiths, and I'm looking for bi-/multicultural folks to help with my dissertation. I'm looking at folk's opinions about accessing mental health resources from an intersectional perspective. If you're interested in participating, just follow the link below to find out more about the survey. It shouldn't take more than about 10 minutes, and I will be forever grateful!
https://goldpsych.eu.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_bHn9JUppIy6xiAd",queer
"A ""fashion meets mental health"" kind of post. [Very long, kind of rant.] [Advice request.]","Hi, and please excuse this first time poster.

This is also rather long (as you've surely seen), so only take time to read if you're willing to spend some. I've been pondering a lot where to post about this as I wrote and thought about it, and I've found no more fitting place —Any reccomendations to crosspost this would be more than welcome! 

I'm also a mess, and so the post will probably be a mess.

---

So, as the title goes, this is mostly a ""fashion meets mental health"" kind of thing. I'm having trouble with my identity and looks, and with finding something to do regarding that that makes me feel good.

I'm a heterosexual man, in his early 30s. Cis looking, but I don't identify with masculinity very much, or just nothing —maybe because I'm very much of a loser.

Always had trouble with the whole identity and aspect areas —think not entering a hairdresser between 15 and 25, or not ever buying any clothes unless extremely necessary, and always failing at it; all of this out of social phobia and other troubles, not as much as gender aesthetics—, so I'm kind of feeling like a teenager here. 

Anyway, lately I'm just breaking apart in all sorts of ways, and while I think I understand queer theory perfectly (*In One Person* by John Irving is a book of reference to me), I still don't see myself as queer —not for now, at least. As I said, the cis part is sort of what's at.

Let me get to the point:

One of the things I do in my solitude to not go crazy is take walks in my little village (50k people or so, but very lively), looking at stores windows and such, and lately I felt more anguished than ever by the amount of options women have, and the few men do.

Now, let me elaborate a little on what I exactly mean by that, because I know it can sound like a very generic thing (""this guy wants to cross-dress"" sort of idea), but I think that's not the case, and this is the first time I've found myself so distressed about this. It's also definitely not sexist —not blaming anyone here!

The issue I find myself in right now is that I feel like I need to buy or acquire things for my body identity looks that make me feel good. And the problem is: I can't find anything that makes me feel that way.

Masculinity aesthetics don't work with me because those are associated with success, and are simple. I tried them, and it makes me feel like a fraud. Similarly, I don't identify with any kind of urban culture or aesthetics, where the culture takes over the gender binary, so that doesn't work for me either. (note: I *do* believe that many people that feel like I do, find a place in those other spaces, hence my problem.) 

And I see what there is for women, which are just endless possibilities, and I'm envious of that. Alas, I don't want to look like a woman either, nor I am feminine looking —albeit I've been told I have some mannerisms that are more feminine than masculine, like delicacy with my hands, or in the whole aspect of moving my body, I am still a 1.80 man with a broad face and beard.

To put in other words: I'm thinking of the stereotype of women that goes shopping to cope with something, and I've never felt as if that's something I can do, and yet that's what I kind of need now —as I feel that the only thing I have left of worth is my body, which I see as kind of tragic, but that's how it is.

Money is also an issue and part of that envy, becuase women's complements are cheap and they can mean a world to them, but there's not such thing for people like me. A woman can buy a dress for 20€ and she has an entire new outfit, and then gets to complement this with a series of objects. There is that, for men that want to feel manly, but that won't work me.

So, isn't with me wanting to be and/or look like a woman, or me wanting to be and/or look like a men, but as stated before, I am in a very delicate place mentally, and I find that, as a man, I have no options to feel better in that area. 

And, I understand and respect queer people that like radical things for their looks, but that's not me either. I am discrete, I don't like to stand out, or to be told I look attractive or pretty. But I don't want to look like I can't even dress properly either, at my age. And I don't want to look 'asexuated' either, as I'm a very sexual person in fact. Androgynous aesthetics are also for cool people, and I'm not cool.

The only few things I considered, that would make me feel well, are painting my nails and doing very simple earrings. But again, not to stand out: I don't want to stand out, I just want to take better care of myself, primarily for me, to feel like I am worth something, and if I can be successful and this helps people judging me the better, that'd be great too. So these would mean simple color nails, and simple round earrings. Can't do much with hair —it'm keeping it for now, but better not to play with fire— but I have a beard.

And yet I still miss being able to have more options for dressing, that don't make me look so out of place. I am not from an urban environment, and while people wouldn't judge me over here (think close of Barcelona, Spain is a very LGTB friendly country), doing weird things would mean standing out, and I don't want to stand out.

I just want to feel good about my aspect as a person. If I had some cornerstone, I guess that'd be great and would work for me, but right now I have virtually nothing.",queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"
Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 
Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org
Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!

",queer
is this transphobic?,"please read my entire post before calling me a terf or transphobic
Recently I was trying to qualify my sexuality in my head and while I know it’s ever changing for this moment I feel like I might have down actually how I feel in words. I would consider gender to be resting again the masc end of the spectrum (I feel mostly cis male) and I am with certainty homoromantic. But I think I would define my sexuality on the line of dick I have had partners and fwb that are of various genders all of them with male genitalia and never found myself thinking anything of it. But after a strange three way with two cis girls I found that I gained no sexual pleasure from vagina. So with that being said is it possible to define sexuality along the lines of genitalia? (with out being transphobic?)",queer
Daddy says Hi!,,queer
"Be brave, be free.",,queer
It’s taking me all that I have not to propose to my partner after only 3 months. I have never been so fulfilled in a relationship before,"I have in the last year come out as trans and only been openly gay for a little over a year now. I had a huge crush on my partner for a long time and we finally started dating over the summer and quoth John mulany “I never knew relationships were supposed to make you feel better about yourself”.  They are also trans and just the most loving and caring human I’ve ever had the honor of knowing. 
Can someone remind me that proposing after 3 months is probably not a great idea? The flip side of that is will someone tell me why it might be ok? 
Also important fact, we are 20 and 21 and broke college students ",queer
Please consider participating in this study,"Hey there! I'm a counseling psychology doctoral student, and I'm collecting data for my dissertation. Please consider taking about 10 minutes to provide your input about LGB workplace experiences. Participation is anonymous and you can enter your name to win one of four $25 Amazon gift cards! More information and a link to the survey is below. I would be happy to answer any questions you have. Thanks so much! 

https://i.redd.it/skw0i8pltkd11.png

https://i.redd.it/ypfmogjotkd11.png",queer
Relationship education program for cis male couples!,"Hey! My name is Arielle and I'm a queer researcher and relationship skills coach at Northwestern University. I want to give y'all some info about 2GETHER, a project we have going on for cisgender male couples.

2GETHER is a paid research study that involves a relationship education program-- where you and your partner can learn healthy relationship skills like communication, coping, and other ways to strengthen your relationship. We have a national online program and an in-person program for people who live in Chicago.

There will be follow-up surveys and free at-home STI testing before and after the 2GETHER program. Because we're a university, all data we collect is protected by IRB and federal regulations. If you and your partner are eligible to take part, you'll see a consent form, which has more info about your privacy rights.

Fun bonus: as a thank you for completing all parts of 2GETHER, each partner will receive $250!

Want to find out if you qualify, or learn more? Check out our eligibility screener: [https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY](https://redcap.nubic.northwestern.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=YXKMW9JFXY)

Even more info on our website: [http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/](http://2getherstudy.northwestern.edu/)

IRB #STU00202802, STU00202939",queer
Lesbians Against TERFS,,queer
Cool Shirt,,queer
"people are bullying my sister in a discord for being lgbt, please help and bully them back!","https://discord.gg/UDst2e3

please help and bully them back! lets unite..",queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research study for FL residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn about alchohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer- and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 

Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey!

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",queer
My first time eating 🐱,,queer
Journalist: Conversion Therapy Story,"Hi, Internet!
I'm a queer journalist from Canada writing a story about conversion therapy in the country. I'm looking to connect with people here who have gone through it. I know it still exists here, in the shadows, and I'd really like to be able to show other people that. I understand it's likely a very difficult topic for some to discuss. But if you are Canadian and might be willing to share your experience with me, I would love to hear from you. Please do feel free to send me a private message, and I can give you more details about the story.
Thank you so much!",queer
New to the LGBTQ community—how do you date?!,"Hi everyone! As my question says, I’m very new to the LGTBQ community. After a bad breakup with the girl who made me realize I was gay, I’ve only recently started trying to get back out there via online dating, and I’m having some trouble! When I only dated men, I had no problem attracting guys,
 (mainly because I look conventionally feminine, not because I’m super hot). But that standard seems to be different for queer women? One of my gay friends jokes that I look and act like a straight girl who leads worship at church (probably true, since that was my identity for most of my life). But is that a turn off to queer women? Is it possible to look *too* straight? Am I giving off a homophobic vibe? Or are queer beauty standards just different (i.e. higher)? 

 I haven’t had any luck online dating, and as I’m from a conservative community, I don’t know anything about how to connect with other LGBTQ people. Can anyone give me some pointers? 

-Helpless",queer
Meaning of Queer,"What does queer mean to you? What does being queer mean to you, as well?

Im struggling to grasp the concept, in some way. I understand queer in general, translating from peculiar, can encompass the entire LGBTQIA community. However, can queer be a sexual orientation? Is it a placeholder for question?

I myself am ""questioning"" I suppose. I'm a girl, and I've known all my life that I've been attracted to girls. I'm only just now coming out to myself. I've never been able to get off from a guy, never really lusted after men like I do after women, but there was *one* man who I would have given up everything for. And he wrecked the notion that I may be gay. I don't think I'm bisexual, cause again, I'm not really attracted to men overall, especially not like I am to women, it's just this one guy was different. And so that's why I've been using queer as my orientation.

I understand at the end of the day a label isn't the end all, and that it's just a matter of I like what I like, you know? But, at the same time, I sometimes struggle with how to internalize all this change into my identity without being sure of what I am.

TL;DR - what does queer mean to you? Can it be a sexual orientation?",queer
"Moroccan-born alt-pop artist MEHDI BAHMAD releases debut single ‘Rouge à Lèvres’ music video, a layered and romantic appeal for gender freedom 💄💄💄",,queer
Good book recommendation for bisexual refugee?,"Hi there!

I'm looking for a good book for a bisexual refugee in english. She needs something to conquer all the internalised homophobia and to empower her to accept herself. Best case it would be a book about bisexuality on a personal level, but an empowering book about loving other women as a woman may also be good. Looking forward to your recommendations :-)

Greetings,

Erdbeerkind",queer
WICKED ENIGMA - Episode One Mischievous Sabotage,,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",queer
Bisexual vs Pansexual - is there a difference?,,queer
"Hello, I’m LGBT and part of an LBGT Safe space &amp; friendly peer support server. Welcome to The Island!","Hello, I’m LGBT and part of an LBGT Safe space &amp;  friendly peer support server. Welcome to The Island!

*(Mods, feel free to delete if needed)*

* We have venting rooms and support rooms
* We have friendly, laid back staff
* We have great members &amp; and active chat
* We have TWO music bots
* We have events such as cards against humanity and two truths one lie
* All ages (13 plus) welcome
* We are looking for supporters to come and chat with people - come on in today!

Come check us out!

[https://discord.gg/T2m8QFa](https://discord.gg/T2m8QFa) ",queer
if ur queer trans its always self defense,"bash back!

destroy what destroys u!

no mercy

vengeance now

smash the fuckin cistem",queer
ISO LGBTQ+ research participants to take survey!,"Are   you an adult who identifies as LGBTQ+  (lesbian, gay, bisexual,   transgender, queer, nonbinary or gender queer,  pansexual, asexual,   aromantic, etc.)? Please consider taking this  20-30 minute survey to   participate in my dissertation research! The  purpose of this research  is  to explore how LGBTQ+ adult children's  parent-child communication  relates to important mental health outcomes  and parent-child   relationship satisfaction. The survey is anonymous and  participation is  voluntary. I am a doctoral candidate at the University  of Missouri and  this research is IRB approved.

I greatly appreciate you and your time. Feel  free to share this post.

[https://missouri.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV\_80bBBmQhQ9qZWzX](https://missouri.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_80bBBmQhQ9qZWzX)",queer
The Elusive Queer Clothing Store," I've described myself as queer for a a long time now - but recently have become more interested in dressing the part - so to speak. I want to wear stylish 'tomboy' outfits, oxford button-ups made for women, chinos in all the colours but locating a reasonably priced realtor in Canadian dollars is really hard to find. What are other queer women doing? ",queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",queer
Award Winning Australian LGBT Short Film - NOT AGAIN! (18+/Nudity) (Comedy),[https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OhwqPZJ5xnY](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=OhwqPZJ5xnY),queer
"LGBTQ Pride Through Raising Strong, Resilient 'Queerspawn'",,queer
NYC Pride Baby! Check it out!,,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",queer
Pride Rant,"It is nearing the end of LGBTQ pride month and so I feel it is the most appropriate time to air some grievances. Just to qualify the following statements (for those of you who don’t already know) I am a bisexual transman. 

 I thought about writing a really educational, long rant after a really good friend tried to tell me it’s “reverse homophobia” when queer people prefer to hang out with other queer people instead of “straight people”. This was after I complained about all the very Cis-hetero couples who were out bar hopping in Boystown the night before the parade. I wanted to drive home great educational points with her and in this post but I’ve realized I am too tired of educating the herero-normative majority and it is not my job. That shit is EXHAUSTING. You all get the rest of the year to celebrate yourselves. If you want to participate in Pride month, do so as allies. 

LGBTQ Ally Support = walking trans friends into the bathroom, correcting others when they mess up pronouns and names, listening to people’s story and truth about their experience, giving us SPACE to enjoy and experience our month of celebration. Tell/show your queer family and friends that you love and value them. 

Those of us who identify as LGBTQ have been harassed, assaulted, silenced, or shut down when we speak our truth. WE HAVE BEEN MURDERED. I can no longer sit aside in silence waiting for someone else to make a difference. I want to be the difference.",queer
I am LBGT &amp; created an LBGT safe space &amp; support discord online. Welcome to The Island!,"I created an LBGT safe space &amp; support discord online. Welcome to The Island!

Hello,

I created an LBGT safe space &amp; support discord online. I am LGBT myself \[nonbinrary/asexual/aromantic\] and I know how difficult it is to find support in the Discord community - so I made my own.

We have around 300 members and would love to welcome you! We offer:

· Game nights – Cards Against Humanity game TONIGHT, June 27th, approximately 8pm EST! 

· Semi-active voice chat and TWO music bots

· Sweet emojis to use with your nitro or without

· Awesome people to talk to

· Wonderful, LGBT friendly staff ",queer
DA Larry Krasner Charges Trans Activist for Attempting to Burn ‘Blue Lives Matter' Flag,,queer
LGBTQ+ Cancer Screening Survey (Anonymous)," Hi everyone

Posting this again! I'm a medical student working in the Radiation Oncology department at Thomas Jefferson University in Philadelphia. Our team, led by Dr. Nicole Simone, is fighting to reduce barriers to quality health care outcomes in the LGBTQ+ community.

At the moment, we're interested in investigating how barriers such as cost and stigmatization may cause patients to forgo or delay vital health care treatments or cancer screening guidelines. **In short, we want to better understand how equitable, fair healthcare results can be best obtained for those in the LGBTQ+ community.**

\---

If you have a bit of time, we'd love for you to fill out the attached short survey!

[https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW](https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW)

**The survey is entirely confidential** and there is no identifiable material included in it.

\---

Thank you!",queer
"No One is Illegal: This Pride, I Fight for Roxana Hernandez",,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",queer
Love my motherfucking kilt,Its one of my few items that I feel like I wear out in public with out attention. Any ways any body else think that kilts need many improvements. ,queer
Mothr is Queer Pop,,queer
Pride song in Philadelphia called Identity,,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer\-and phone\-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. 

Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352\-214\-4047 to learn more!",queer
R/gatekeeping?,"If you woo when she shouts ""where my straight white girls at?!"", don't tip the Queen, and say ""oh, is it pride?"" when I wish you a happy Pride Month, do you really deserve to be front row at the drag show?",queer
"No, Police Really Don't Belong at Pride Marches",,queer
LGBTQ+ Cancer Screening Survey (Anonymous),"Hi everyone

I'm a medical student working in the Radiation Oncology department at Thomas Jefferson University in Philadelphia. Our team, led by Dr. Nicole Simone, is fighting to reduce barriers to quality health care outcomes in the LGBTQ\+ community.

At the moment, we're interested in investigating how barriers such as cost and stigmatization may cause patients to forgo or delay vital health care treatments or cancer screening guidelines. **In short, we want to better understand how equitable, fair healthcare results can be best obtained for those in the LGBTQ\+ community.**

\-\-\-

If you have a bit of time, we'd love for you to fill out the attached short survey!

[https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW](https://isley.kcc.tju.edu/redcap/surveys/?s=7PX3XLPMMW)

**The survey is entirely confidential** and there is no identifiable material included in it.

\-\-\-

Thank you!",queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer\-and phone\-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey.

Visit us on the web at: www.anchorsresearch. org

Call or text us at 352\-214\-4047 to learn more!",queer
Good Queer chat sites??,What are some good queer chat sites? ,queer
Small crisis,So I'm bi/pan I was on bumble and I matched with this girl. After reading to the end of her bio I see that it says she's trans pre-op. Now I'm afraid to talk to her because I'm not sure if I'm actually attracted to her or if I'm fetishizing  her. The idea with being with someone trans doesn't bother me. My roommate who's like my child ( not really he's 20 lol) is trans. I've watched several different types of porn before this and that's what's causing me to fear fetishizing. ,queer
I'm conducting a research on the Quarter Life Crisis among closeted LGBTQ young adults and wanted to know some good sources/databases for information.,"Hello my good people, so I'm an undergrad Psychology student and would love some insight into some good sources of data for studying the Quarter Life Crisis, focusing on the queer population and their unique problems due to the general identity confusion of being at a novel transitory period like all young adults, along with the added pressure of being closeted, social discrimination.

So these are the factors I'll be studying and I'm going to use the survey method. Any open forums to find respondents would also be immensely useful. The sample I'm targeting is 20-30 year old Indian young adults.

Thank you!",queer
Survey on Childhood Gender Experiences,"We are seeking adults to complete an online survey about different childhood experiences, particularly those relating to gender. Your participation will help us to develop a new questionnaire. We will also investigate associations between different childhood gender-related experiences and adult sexual orientation, gender identity and mental health. For more details and to take part please visit: https://www.surveymonkey.co.uk/r/childgender5",queer
"My bf is trans, I'm a lesbian (?), we have a problem","I don't know what I am anymore. Gay? Bi? Straight? Halp pls...
And my bf, a trans-man, is so insecure and assailed by doubts. This is partially my fault, I guess...


My boyfriend was born a girl.
I've met him ten years ago (he was 15, I was 18) on an anime/manga-convention in Germany. He didn't look like a typical girl, more like a tomboy, but I was used to this look; a lot of my gay friends used to dress like boys and had short hair but... he was different. He told me that he was trans on the day we've met ... because I grabbed his boobs tbh - anime-style! He didn't like that, obviously xD. (sounds weird out of context, maybe even with context, idk)

He told me ""I just don't wanna be reminded I have those milk bags hanging from my chest, ya know... I may be born a girl but actually I'm a boy.""

That made him the very first trans-person I've ever met. We became friends. After a few years of friendship he confessed to me that he was in love with me.

This.... ruined... everything... I couldn't deal with that. He was the best, the cutest, the kindest person ever, I loved him so much but I just couldn't 'LOVE' him back!

He is a boy - I am a lesbian. I never saw him as a girl and therefor gf-material. I just didn't **want** to fall in love with trans-guy, tbh. I had my coming-out when I was 14. I, a femme myself, have only dated femmes, cute skinny girly girls (~~f'cking pillow princesses~~) and he knew that. He knew that from the start.

Our close friendship slowly fell apart. I dated two other girls throughout the years. This must have been horrible for him but... We stayed in contact, mostly because he needed help and support because his family abandoned him (even his beloved grandparants after he was outed), he suffered from anxiety and PTSD and I was (literally the only one) there for him. Even covered for him financially, payed his bills whenever it was possible. And, of course, we both still loved the same stuff; Anime, Manga, Cosplay, RPGs, all that weabo-shit.

We, again, grew closer. I left my toxic gf and moved to his town to take care of him. This is when I realized... Apart from my very first girlfriend, I've never loved someone so much like I love him. I would do anything and everything for him. I even found myself attracted to him (this started even before my realization, tbh).


We've now been together for almost a year. He lives with me at my place because his appartment is a depressing, messy shithole. We have a lot of problems but the one problem that really hurts to admit is...

He felt the need to change for me and now he isn't certain about *what he is* anymore and neither am I.
He's 25 now and admitted to me that he isn't sure if he really wants to change his body (take hormones and shit). I mean, he still wants to get rid of his boobs (we call them moobs, like, man-boobs) and he wants to grow a beard and so on but at the same time he's terribly affraid of the progress and that I wouldn't be attracted to him anymore... And he likes to be the cute, submissive part sometimes... and I enjoy that too. We're both switcher, so I personally don't see any problem with that, even after his transition.

At first he tried to talk himself out of the whole trans-thing because he was in love with a lesbian (me). Didn't work, tho. Of course not. If it was that easy, most of the trans-people would have just „talked themselves out of it“.

We talked soooo often about it. I told him that there were several guys in love with me when I was a teenager but no-one would have ever changed his gender just to date me, nor would I have wanted that.
I love him for who he is; my small, chubby, cute, socially awkward BOYfriend.


And here is what confuses me... I don't find men attractive at all. I had intercourse with some because I was a stupid child who desperately wanted to be straight, even after my coming-out, but I never... loved a man or wanted to be with one and after a few years I finally embraced my gayness. XD

In my eyes, my bf is a man. I'm actually looking forward to him getting a deeper voice, a beard and a flat chest and it confuses me when he's in teamspeak or discord, talking all girly and sweetly because of the „bonus“ girls apparently get in the gaming community, I dunno. I don't like it but ok.

What does that make me...? I mean, I was finally happy being a lesbian and now I find myself questioning my sexuality again... *I still don't find any man other than my bf attractive.* =/ In fact, he's the only PERSON I want. I don't even desire other girls anymore, despite all the problems we have... What does that mean...? Am I suddenly straight now or what? oO I'm bad at this whole queer terminology.


And how should we deal with my bf's insecurities? I already told him that it's okay if he changes his mind and that I understand that he's scared of all the changes, I just wanna support him... A lot of trans-people go through a phase of fear and doubt, right...? The three trans-people we know (all our age) are already at least half way through their transition and never showed any sign of doubt. I can see that it makes him sad that they're so much closer to their goal and everytime I compliment our best friend's beard, he looks so bummed out.

I'm trying to talk him into a therapy atm but he's afraid the therapist tells him to take FEMALE hormones (cause he apparently has a lot of testosterone...? Is it true that gender dysphoria can root in something like that?) or that he has to stay for in-patient treatment because of his anxiety, phobias and diagnosed but untreated PTSD. (I think that would be the best for him but I can't force him...)

Sorry for the long text and mediocre English skills. xD",queer
Why I'm attracted to male high pitched voice?,I'm a straight girl but I'm very very attracted to man who have high pitched voices? Why is that?,queer
Mainstream Pride Events Are Hostile Environments,"Check out this [new video](https://www.facebook.com/blackqueercolumbus/videos/574513509615619/) from [BQIC](https://www.facebook.com/blackqueercolumbus/)!

Columbus illustrates how oppressive mainstream Pride events have become!

Solidarity with the [#BlackPride4](https://www.facebook.com/hashtag/blackpride4?source=feed_text)!

🎀Say no to homonationalism!🎀

☠️Death to U.S. empire!☠️

🚫👮Kick cops out of Pride!👮🚫

🔥Abolish white supremacy!🔥",queer
Can I attend pride with the straight man I’m currently dating?,"Queer femme here. Dating a straight man who is super supportive and loving of my queer body + mind. 
But Im scared to take him to pride. I never want to invade anyone’s space or make anyone feel unsafe. Do you think it’s okay to go to my local pride parade with my straight partner? 
I tend to get salty at my straight friends who go to pride to party. But I just want him there as my person. 
Thoughts? ",queer
REAL MEN WEAR NAIL POLISH,,queer
Femme's/women who like Trans Men? (ftm),"Are there any women here who like trans men?  


If there is can you tell me more about your feelings or interest, how do you identify, what's your type, do you like pre\-everything trans men or more 'passing' trans men \(hairy, muscular etc\) or it doesn't matter to you?  Are trans men a preference or do you prefer cis men or women?  

I'm an ftm who's been on T for like 12 years, I'm kind of struggling to meet women who are interested in a guy like me, I used to go out with femmes when I was more non\-passing, but there seems to be less of them these days and most of them like butch women/pre\-everything trans men. I suppose I just want to figure out if there a women out there!   


If so, Comment here pls! ",queer
I came out to my boyfriend at the age of 17. Here’s how it happened.,,queer
Is the media giving the impression that sexual orientation affects ability?,"News articles all over continually focus on the fact that a person is not hetero-sexual when they achieve something. Does this mean that anyone who chooses a different sexual orientation is not as capable? I would argue that sexual orientation has nothing to do with anything other than the personal relationship between two people. Their ability to do a particular job, or achieve something great has nothing to do with their sexual orientation. Granted there are some jobs which may benefit from their orientation as they are open minded about it, but does that mean we have to harp about it every time a non hetero-sexual person does something notable? Is the media giving the impression that sexual orientation is a disadvantage?

For full disclosure, I am a straight white male. I have no issues with anyone due to their sexual orientation, color, religion, or nationality. I take people as individuals who are living their life in a way that makes them happy. I have friends who are gay or lesbian. I have worked with a huge variety of people from different backgrounds, and I have never considered any of them less valuable than the next person. The lifestyle choices an individual makes honestly has absolutely no effect on how I choose to live my life. By the same mentality, how I live my life should have no effect on how someone else chooses to live theirs. 

Consider for a moment that you are walking down the street, and you pass 20 different people. Can you tell which ones are a different race? Yes, obviously because it is very visual. Can you tell which religion each of them observes? In some cases yes, if their apparel is specific to a religion, but for the most part no. Can you tell what their sexual orientation is? Unless they are very flamboyant about it, then no, you cannot. Is there a reason for them to hold up a big sign saying which orientation they are? Sexual orientation is typically a very private matter, and many people do not feel they have to make it known which they are in public. I would argue that the vast majority of lesbian or gay individuals only tell people if it is relevant. For example if a guy is hitting on a lesbian, she might inform him to prevent an awkward situation. The same woman may not introduce herself to the new person at work as a lesbian. Most people who are not hetero-sexual do not feel the need for the entire world to know. They will let people know that are close to them or who they interact with regularly.

We have a tendency to point out that people are different, but the more we point it out, the more separate they will feel. If we just accept who they are as an entire person, and not focus on one aspect of their chosen life, maybe we'll start to see things shift more. As soon as we form opinions about someone based on color, religion, or sexual orientation, we are being bigots. Things are slowly moving in the right direction with open marriage options being accepted in more and more places with all of the same rights. I just think we don't need to continually point it out at every opportunity because sexual orientation is only a fraction of who a person is, and does not affect their abilities. 

Let me be clear as well that I believe every person deserves to live their life in whatever way they choose as long as they are not harming another person by doing so. They have the right to any job they are capable of doing, live where they want, and not be judged because of their orientation.

",queer
Collaborative Art Project for Queer Wedding Proposal,"Hello! 

I am getting ready to propose to my girlfriend and for the proposal, I want to collect images of mementos of love from lots of different people.

I would love for you to post below or e-mailed me (loveismagicproject2018@gmail.com) a picture of something that makes you feel love, whether it be familial, plutonic, romantic, or self. It can be anything like a note someone gave you, a piece of art, a place, a person, a pet or a poem. You could also include an explanation if you would like. 

Also, if you are interested in being commissioned to participate, please message me with what you are thinking and your prices.

If you are curious about who we are, we are a queer couple in our twenties, living in Los Angeles, and have been together for 7 years.",queer
Thoughts about gender fluidity...,"Hi! Gender fluid pansexual here... I had a thought that I wanted to share and get people’s opinions on.

I was watching a reality TV show, and a beautiful gay man came on and I was instantly attracted to him. But it wasn’t as a female, it was as a male. I felt a longing to be a man to have any type of interaction with him, and it made me sad that I wasn’t. I love the idea of being with a man as a man in every facet... and before asking, I’ve had the serious question if I wanted to transition, but I still love my female body. I just feel that depending on the person, I wish I was the opposite gender. 

Has anyone else felt like that? Please forgive me if I haven’t explained well, or let me know if I can clarify further.",queer
Dating multiple people isn’t as fun as it seems. Here’s why....,,queer
"Esther, a black queer woman in Berlin",,queer
Gender Queer try on Polka Dot Jersey Flounce Dress,,queer
WOULD YOU SIGN UP FOR THIS DATING APP?,[https://youtu.be/hdBw9vXcTt8](https://youtu.be/hdBw9vXcTt8),queer
"Stepping out of the closet, very afraid. Looking for some support.","Hey. So I'm using a throwaway because, as the title says, I'm basically still in the closet.   
Tonight I'll be attending a queer event for the first time and I'm really scared about it. I'm absolutely stressing for many reasons...   
I know some of the people who'll be there from the bdsm scene. And to them I'm the typical straight male dom... Which is so far from the truth it's not even funny. I've been in the closet for 15 years, and while I do have a slight preference for women, I'm attracted to basically everyone (just like I'm not a dom). My current social circle is mostly made up of queer people and they've made me feel very safe to be who I am lately. But to be like this in public?   
Around people who looked down on me for years assuming I'm ""the typical maledom who got into it because 50 shades""? Including one who apparently wants to kick my ass for ""ruining his reputation"" when really it was just that the girls he molested started talking?   
Also, I definitely don't ""look the part"". I look basically, huh, manly. And I attend with my main girlfriend. And I'm extra frightened by rejection because I also have BPD (yay).   
I'm afraid. Getting out is so scary. My closest friends never knew about this, only the ones I met in bdsm events know (way before I told them apparently hahaha).   
Rambling but I think I just need support.   
edit : formatting",queer
Queer v Bisexual v Pansexual,"Hello, all -

I'm a writer (and, well, just a person!) trying to understand the differences between these words and what they mean to someone in the LGBT community.

Here's what I've got (corrections invited!): 
Queer = an overarching term for anyone who wants to use it that is in any way related to the LGBT community (i.e., not heteronormative).

Bisexual and Pansexual = ACTUALLY mean the same thing.  But people misinterpret bisexual to mean that someone is only attracted to cisgendered people (""bi"").  So some people prefer Pansexual because its more inclusive of (or at least doesn't hint at an exclusion of) an interest in genderfluid/transsexual individuals as well.

How'd I do?  Help. =)  And thank you.",queer
UK Gaymers Discord server,,queer
UNCOVERED FOOTAGE OF GAY 80's VIDEO DATING SERVICE!!!,[https://youtu.be/hdBw9vXcTt8](https://youtu.be/hdBw9vXcTt8),queer
WHEN MY ASSHOLE IS AS TIGHT AS IT WAS WHEN I WAS BORN,"I AM THE DOUCHE QUEEN,",queer
please help. i’m desperate and scared.,"hey everyone so i’ve never made a post like this before so spare me. i’m a 21 year old queer woc who’s struggling w severe borderline personality disorder, bipolar disorder, depression, anxiety, and PTSD that has all gone untreated and unmedicated due to loss of insurance. i’ve been having horrible manic episodes, extreme ups and downs, frequent panic attacks, amongst other things. i went to the hospital for emergency medical help and my job fired me even though i had a doctors note, and now i can’t pay for my rent this month. i’m in the process of getting therapy and medication to stabilize me but is going to take about 30 days for my insurance to go through. my landlord texted me that i have 10 days to pay or get out and idk what to do. i need to come up with $305 by the 14th or i’m going to be homeless. i don’t have anywhere to stay. i don’t even have money for food or groceries and i got caught stealing toiletries today which sucks bc i really needed them and now i’m going to get fairly large fine. if there’s literally anything anyone can contribute it would be greatly appreciated. even a dollar. i’m so desperate and scared and i have no idea what to do. [you can donate here](cash.me/$devindeseta)",queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"ANCHORS Study for Florida Residents! This study was designed especially for men who have engaged in sexual activity with other men. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey to provide information for a new intervention. Visit us at www.anchorsresearch. org, call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more.",queer
Recommendations for what to say/avoid saying in letters to LQBTQ+ homeless youth?,"So, as you may know, 40% of homeless people under the age of 25 identify as LGBTQ. Often times, these kids are neglected/abused by families and run away, or they are outright forced from their homes. 

I live in Los Angeles and I want to organize a fundraiser to support the LA LGBTQ Youth Center. I have the money part covered; what I need help with is how to give these people some emotional support as well. I love the idea of giving the center some handwritten cards or bracelets or bookmarks or something to let them know they aren't alone; something they can keep to look at when they feel down. 

I want to avoid saying anything that might come across as condescending or rude or anything negative. But I also want to avoid impersonal messages like ""you can get through this."" 

Do y'all have any suggestions for what you might want to hear (or NOT hear)  from a fellow queer who is more privileged than you are, but wants to use that privilege to help? ",queer
"http://QUEER2k.uk is looking for UK-based millennials to contribute memories, views and experiences of porn to its open archive. Take a look here -",,queer
Transbians,Can anyone help me understand this more? I feel really alone and confused tbh ,queer
"Verbatim recent advice from top LDS church leadership to Mormon parents regarding what to tell their gay children in relationships: Don’t expect us to take you out and introduce you to our friends, or to deal with you in a public situation that would imply our approval of your “partnership.”",,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Research Study for FL Residents! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phone-based intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. 

Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch.org, call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",queer
Research Survey,"We are LGBQ+-affirming researchers (faculty and graduate students in Counseling Psychology) at the University of Florida conducting a study focused on well-being among lesbian, gay, bisexual, queer, questioning, or any nonexculsively heterosexual people in the United States. Participation will involve completing a 25-30 minute online survey. In order to participate you must: • Identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, queer, questioning, or some other nonexclusively heterosexual identity • Reside in the United States • Be fluent in English • Be 18 years of age or older LGBQ+ people of any gender identity are encouraged to participate.

Thank you VERY much in advance for your time and effort. If you would like to participate, please follow the link below. If you would like to participate, please copy the URL below and paste to an external browser window:

https://ufl.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_02PLC32LI8YHp9H

If you have any question about this study, please feel free to contact the Principal Investigator, Sarah Conlin, M.S. (sconlin@ufl.edu). This research has been approved by the Institutional Review Board (IRB) at the University of Florida (IRB#IRB201800391).",queer
Podcast for queer conspiracy theorist/spiritualist.,,queer
Submit your anonymous dilemmas! Our LGBT gurus will answer,,queer
Sheik Who Called For Gays and Jews to Be Killed 'Special Guest Speaker' At Orlando Middle School,,queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"ANCHORS (Advancing New Computer-based Help On Risky Sex) Study for FL Residents! This study was
designed especially for men who have engaged in sexual activity with other men. Possible compensation
if you are selected to complete a web survey to provide information for a new intervention. Visit us at
www.anchorsresearch. org, call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more",queer
"Gay Chechens flee threats, beatings and exorcism - Family pressure has fuelled a sense of persecution felt by gay people in Chechnya, a mainly Muslim region in southern Russia.",,queer
Calling all LGBTQIA POC,"Hey ya'll! My name is Bri and I am a, Indian, non-binary student in Greensboro, NC. I am currently taking a class for my Women's and Gender Studies Minor, and for my final project, I want to create a scrap book featuring tons of different LGBTQIA+ people (especially people of color). This will not be published, and will only be shared with my professor and fellow classmates. All I would need it a photograph of yourself and a bio (can be short and sweet or long and personal). Let me know if you're interested in helping me out!",queer
Learn more about the ANCHORS Study!,"Learn more about the ANCHORS Study! The goal of ANCHORS is to learn more about the alcohol/other substance use and sexual activity of men who have sex with men to inform a new computer-and phonebased intervention that will help to reduce heavy drinking and risky sex. Possible compensation if you are selected to complete a web survey. Visit us on the web at www.anchorsresearch .org, call or text us at 352-214-4047 to learn more!",queer
What can we do about racism/ableism/transphobia in queer nightclubs? &amp; sharing tips on how to set up a club night,,queer
Send me your gayest/queerest thought (for art!),"Your anonymous responses will be transcribed into binary code and woven into the form of handkerchiefs for an art piece that intends to speak to the history of codedness within queer culture. 

*No longer than 120 characters

[Here’s](https://www.instagram.com/p/BgwXvZandRV/) a link to images of some of the weavings. 

Thanks :)",queer
New podcast: The Queer Arabs,"Hello everyone! One of us has been on this subreddit for some time, but for safety reasons, both of us choose to keep our personal social media accounts separate from our podcast. One of us is a Saudi lesbian; the other is a trans Lebanese woman. We wanted you to know that we started this podcast in case anyone is interested. You can find it on iTunes and other podcast apps: ""The Queer Arabs."" And our website is thequeerarabs.com",queer
Have a story you would like to tell?,"I have the beginnings of a project! 
I’m putting together a podcast that tells the sexy and lovey dovey tales that are Queer focused. I’m TIRED of the majority of queer media being sad and tragic. Im tired of having to search for content like I’m searching for buried treasure!

I’m calling for more heat! More passion! More genres! Sci fi! Horror! Goofey Comedies! I’m not just calling for writers though! Share your fantasies, share a true story! How you fell in love, or how awkward it was the first time you got laid.
Anonymous or full credit, however you want it.

If you’re not sure what to talk about, give me
a shout! 


Share it with me, so I can share it with the Queer world💋 

You can PM me or send an email to Howboutdeezepeaches@gmail.com",queer
Queer Muslim sex worker - telling my story,,queer
GET YOUR LIFE!!! 1st Teaser for 'Queens',,queer
Send me or comment with your gayest thought. (For art),"Your anonymous responses will be transcribed into binary code and woven into the form of handkerchiefs for an art piece that intends to speak to the history of codedness within queer culture. 

*No longer than 120 characters

Thanks :)",queer
What do i fall under?,"I always dressed like  a boy. I am a tomboy but I sometimes do like dressing like girl. but somethings been on my mind. recently I discovered I'm bi, it explains for everything i felt. I don't know if that's relevant to this post but, I've been feeling like a boy. I prefer guys clothing such as suits. I prefer hanging with guys. I sometimes act like a guy when I'm with my friends who are girls. but I'm more attracted to men and women who are more masculine. I have an urge sometimes to cut my hair and just become a guy. I feel comfortable being a guy, but also I like dressing and acting girly. I'm really lost rn. I don't know if its just a phase or anything. 

If anyone has any comments please leave it....thank you ",queer
LGBQ Study,"Solicitation Email for Participants

Greetings,
You are being asked to participate in a research study.  In order to participate, you must (a) identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or queer (LGBQ), (b) be 18 years of age or older, and (c) reside in the United States.  Transgender or gender nonconforming individuals who also identify as LGBQ are eligible to participate in the study.  Total completion time is approximately 8 to 12 minutes.
Your participation in the completion of this survey is completely voluntary and your survey responses are anonymous, meaning no identifiable information will be collected. Your informed consent is inferred by completion of the survey. 
There are no direct benefits to you for participating in this study.  If you meet the participation criteria and participate in the online survey, you will have the option to enter a raffle to win one of 4, $25 Amazon e-gift cards. Your participation in this study may enhance clinical practice by understanding how self-compassion may act as a buffer between internalized feelings of heterosexism and psychological distress in LGBTQ individuals. There are no known or anticipated risks associated with participation in this study. If you know of other sexual minority adult individuals who would be interested in completing the survey, please forward the email/link to them. There are no known or anticipated risks associated with participation in this study.

If you have questions regarding the study please contact the researchers Amy Maragos (student investigator amrgc@mail.umkc.edu or Dr. Chris Brown (faculty advisor; brownchr@umkc.edu; 816-235-2491).
If you are interested in participating in this study and you identify as LGBQ, are 18 years of age or older, and currently reside in the United States, please click the link below.  Transgender or gender nonconforming individuals who also identify as LGBQ, are 18 years of age or older, and currently reside in the United States are eligible to participate in the study. 

Click here to participate in the study

This study has been approved by the UMKC Institutional Review Board (Protocol Number: 17-367).  If you have any questions about this study, please contact the investigator: Chris Brown at brownchr@umkc.edu (816.235.2491).  

Sincerely, 

Chris Brown, PhD.
Professor and Chair
Counseling and Educational Psychology
University of Missouri-Kansas City
",queer
LGBQ Study,"Solicitation Email for Participants

Greetings,
You are being asked to participate in a research study.  In order to participate, you must (a) identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, or queer (LGBQ), (b) be 18 years of age or older, and (c) reside in the United States.  Transgender or gender nonconforming individuals who also identify as LGBQ are eligible to participate in the study.  Total completion time is approximately 8 to 12 minutes.
Your participation in the completion of this survey is completely voluntary and your survey responses are anonymous, meaning no identifiable information will be collected. Your informed consent is inferred by completion of the survey. 
There are no direct benefits to you for participating in this study.  If you meet the participation criteria and participate in the online survey, you will have the option to enter a raffle to win one of 4, $25 Amazon e-gift cards. Your participation in this study may enhance clinical practice by understanding how self-compassion may act as a buffer between internalized feelings of heterosexism and psychological distress in LGBTQ individuals. There are no known or anticipated risks associated with participation in this study. If you know of other sexual minority adult individuals who would be interested in completing the survey, please forward the email/link to them. There are no known or anticipated risks associated with participation in this study.

If you have questions regarding the study please contact the researchers Amy Maragos (student investigator amrgc@mail.umkc.edu or Dr. Chris Brown (faculty advisor; brownchr@umkc.edu; 816-235-2491).
If you are interested in participating in this study and you identify as LGBQ, are 18 years of age or older, and currently reside in the United States, please click the link below.  Transgender or gender nonconforming individuals who also identify as LGBQ, are 18 years of age or older, and currently reside in the United States are eligible to participate in the study. 

Click [here!] (https://umkc.co1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_1TFeBGReaSJpeUl&amp;Q_JFE=0) to participate in the study

This study has been approved by the UMKC Institutional Review Board (Protocol Number: 17-367).  If you have any questions about this study, please contact the investigator: Chris Brown at brownchr@umkc.edu (816.235.2491).  

Sincerely, 

Chris Brown, PhD.
Professor and Chair
Counseling and Educational Psychology
University of Missouri-Kansas City
",queer
Scottish trans people need your help! | Government Consultation on Equal Recognition (Open to ALL),"The Scottish Government is currently consulting on proposed changes to Gender Recognition.

The main points are:

* **Self declaration**  
Let trans people get official recognition of their gender without the current requirement of a psychiatric report.
* **16-17 year olds**  
Let trans people apply for gender recognition from 16, the age at which young people in Scotland are deemed to have full legal capacity.
* **Non-binary**  
Let non-binary people have their gender fully legally recognised through self-declaration.

This consultation is **vital** and closes on the 1 March at 17:00 (GMT). If the Scottish Gov gets more negative responses than positive ones it will be extremely difficult for them to justify updating legal gender recognition. If the number of negative responses is large then the rights of trans people are at risk of being rolled back, not only in Scotland but also in the whole of the UK.

**Most unfortunately, the media has been particularly hostile about trans equality in recent weeks and so there is a REAL RISK that this negative media coverage will encourage a larger number of negative responses. So now more than ever we need people to respond to the consultation!**

Please take 10 min to complete a positive response. You can find a guide and link to the consultation at

**http://equalrecognition.scot/consultation/**

Not all the questions need to be answered. Even saying something simple like “I support trans rights” already helps. They do ask for a name and e-mail address but these can be kept confidential.

Responses from outside of Scotland/UK are also welcome - a lot of the negative responses come from transphobes around the world.",queer
Try Not to Cry,,queer
Is this 'romantic love' or 'intimate male friendship' or whatever else?,"UPDATE: Our friendship/relationship has progressed wonderfully since he returned from his home-town. He spends nearly half of his time staying with us at the house, as he promised, while the rest of the time he lives on the University campus to access the library - which also means he spends time with his 'girlfriend'; and i have since discovered this is a casual relationship from his brother/my flatmate. When i express expectations of him spending more time with us at the house, he earnestly explains that he wishes he could spend all his time with us at the house and is constantly thinking of coming over, however, he has to apportion some time apart for his University work. He feels accountable to me for his whereabouts; he will call/msg me to inform that he is leaving town for few days to visit family and our goodbyes always end with the promise of meeting soon. He will play uncontroversially  romantic songs and 'dedicate' them to me for how they address the object of the singer's affection. My flatmate wasn't home a few days around my birthday, and interestingly, this is the first time he chose to spend time alone with me. He came to the house 2 days prior to my birthday, and during one such dinner, he said to me that he loves living with us, believes the place to be 'home' and seriously expressed a wish that the 3 of us continued living together in future. As we sat next to eachother during dinner, he then said to me that this is the happiest he has ever been in his life, and claimed he believes he will never be this happy again in life; and then claimed the same on my behalf as well - that he's sure i too will never be as happy again as i am this day. I smiled and nodded in agreement to him. A tangible development to happen over the months is that now it is commonly understood that him and i sleep next to eachother in the common hall. As we lay next to eachother, we usually talk for sometime before eventually falling asleep. I have consistently noticed that he demonstrates a child-like excitement in being there in the moment with me, he will shift noticeably closer to me in bed and will constantly touch me lingeringly, as if to get my attention. He has even invited me to stay with him at the University over a weekend - just the two of us. All of us went to watch 'Shape of Water', and one night when we were the controversy associated with the film - the representation of people living with disabilities and implication for identity politics versus individual experience, he said to me, ""I have reached a stage in my life where i believe anything is possible...a woman may fall in love with a humanoid sea-creature or a humanoid sea-creature may fall in love with a woman...or a man may fall in love with a tree or a tree may fall in love with a man...i believe what brings two people together/closer is a mystery, and i would rather choose to go along with it than question it...""...He has constantly demonstrated affection and closeness to me exclusively, to the point that his brother/flatmate is positively amused that his otherwise misanthropic brother has found a companion in me...He still believes that i not only am i the best version of myself as a person i can ever be, but one of the best persons he knows...

tl;dr: 38 yr old 'straight' friend and i (30M, gay) share a very cherished and affectionate friendship. He believes and publicly acknowledges that my 'presence' healed him of a debilitating health condition (typhoid) - instead of crediting his younger brother and girlfriend (new and casual relationship) who constantly did all the physical labour during this period for him (while i performed what may only be characterized as 'emotional labour' for him). What does it really mean for a ‘straight’ man to appreciate and acknowledge that a ‘gay’ man has a certain effect on him emotionally and/or physically? He has vaguely expressed a desire for being physically intimate on atleast 2 occasions, and likes sleeping close to me. This story is replete with clichés from romantic legends: I ‘recognized’ him at first sight; I feel like he’s telling me that ‘my love healed him’; he claims he gets poetic for me; his body language responds very powerfully to mine. Should i wait for him to realize he may be bisexual and perhaps feels romantically for me - or is this behaviour or intensity of friendship typical/usual for 'straight' men to share with their gay friends?

I (30M) started renting a home in New Delhi with a friend in July 2017. For nearly 2 months, i noticed a young man in a crowd of friends who used to visit my flatmate occasionally, maybe once in 2 weeks, but i barely ever made contact or socialized with him. I didn't even find him noticeably attractive enough to even be curious about him. One fortuitous day in September, i joined the circle of friends at home and started a conversation with him. I found out he (38/39 yrs) is my flatmate's elder cousin brother who lives in the city and studies cinema. I was supposed to be in bed early as i had an early morning the next day, but i ended up staying up till 6 in the morning talking and listening to him, about cinema and his life. We got along really well for a first time meeting. I stayed up all night despite better sense because i kept saying to myself ""I like listening to him, i want to stay a little longer. He sounds like a kind, warm and passionate person"".

Following week, he visited home again. We had a brief conversation, after which he decided to leave bcoz he wasn't feeling well. I remember feeling intense grief and longing for him, which is when it first struck me that perhaps how i felt about him the first time i met him, maybe more than mere appreciation as a person/friend.

He started visiting home more often now, and i started feeling it was because of me, that he liked spending time with me - instead of his brother/my flatmate. My feeling was corroborate soon bcoz my flatmate had no idea of his brother's whereabouts, but i always knew his whereabouts or whether he's coming home, because he started texting/calling me. I remember asking him 'how he's doing?' those initial few times we met, and he responded with some melancholy on at least 2 occasions, telling me that he's going through a 'low period' in life, work-wise and that there is no woman in his life. Once i knew he is 'straight', i attempted everytime to restrain my heart.

Then, we had 4 glorious days over Diwali, where he spent the long weekend with us at home. After the first day when we had many friends over for a party, we spent the next 3 nights staying up very late, just the 2 of us, talking about our lives. He wanted to know everything about me - right from my childhood, to my growing up years, family, relationships, work, appreciation in music, literature and films - and he listened with immense joy and interest. It wasn't until we were halfway into one of his conversations about his life experiences with family, holding onto a steady job and relationships, that i realized he is trusting me with a lot of information and is a little vulnerable, as he spoke of his 'shortcomings' very unabashedly to me. I felt so honoured and privileged to participate in his life so meaningfully this way, i wanted to hug him for opening up to me so uninhibitedly. He also started reading me very well. He knew exactly what kind of humour offended me, and pre-empted my thoughts even before i had finished forming them. He reached out and placed a hand on my shoulder if he sensed he had offended me and apologized. It freaked me out that he could read me so well, without me even expressing anything. He reached out to me if he saw me lingering in the balcony late at nights, asking after me if i was alright or needed to talk to him. When we stayed up all night talking there were long pauses, where we just sat in each other's company and strolled on the balcony, in silence - and for the first time in my life i did not find silences to be stifling in the company of someone. In fact, i basked in it and yearned for the night to never end. It felt like our minds, bodies and souls are practicing a form of unspoken communication, and we understood each other perfectly. Understanding that i was capable of developing such a sentient relationship with another human being also put me in awe of him and our relationship. My love and respect for him as a person only grew exponentially.

So it's during these 3 days that i believe he first 'blurred the lines'. We were having a conversation about dating/relationships. I told him that as a gay man i've tried meeting people either socially or through the dating apps, but i've always been disappointed bcoz i am not what most people are looking for, and vice-versa. I told him that i have an image in my head where my life turns out like a Nora Ephron movie, where the love of my life will just walk into my life one day, or that i prefer meeting people 'organically'. He responded to my thoughts by saying that he has also had similar experiences as a 'heterosexual' man, and prefers meeting people 'organically' like i do. He then said, ""Just look at the 2 of us. Earlier we didn't know eachother, and didn't speak, but somehow we came together and now we like talking to each other so much"". I thought it was very strange for him to comment on and mix-up our friendship in the backdrop of a conversation exclusively on 'dating/relationships', so i instantly paused him and pointed it out. He considered it for a moment, and replied, ""i feel similarly towards any relationship - friendship or romantic"". I accepted it, but i still felt it was a strange mix-up, and potentially 'misleading'. Interestingly, the very next day when we were having dinner together and continuing our conversation from last night, he once again remarked with a little joy/excitement, ""I agree with everything you're saying. I remember the first time i saw you. You entered the house, put your things in your room, had dinner, spoke to my brother and went to bed. And this is how i saw you for sometime. You didn't say 'hello' to me or acknowledge me. But just see us now, we like spending time together and talk so much"". i was like ""AAARRRGGHHH! Why does he keep doing this?""

Within a week of this beautiful, long weekend, he fell inexplicably and violently ill with typhoid. At first he moved back to his home in the city. His brother and i visited him the following weekend, where he remarked the moment he saw me that he was very happy to see me and later thanked me profusely for visiting him as it made him feel much better than he did in the last few days. After a week, he called me and asked if he could move in with us, so that we could care for him. (Ofcourse, he called me and not his dear brother ! :) ) I welcomed him to our home and told him to stay as long as he wants. While his brother prepared his meals, i would make tea/coffee/soup or breakfast for him, and he was such a darling for it. Even during these days, we had some beautiful moments; like the time i shared anecdotes of arguments or conflict with friends and colleagues, to either vent or seek their opinion - and he always demonstrated the highest faith in me as a person, and never doubted that i could be wrong or capable of hurting a friend. He said i'm a 'good hearted, caring, ethical, nice person'. I was overwhelmed by his unwavering faith in me (more surprisingly, as it was founded on a thin foundation of very recent friendship).

My most intense moments with him arrived in the midst of a very complicated time. After a week, his health worsened, and this is when his 'girlfriend' moved in with us. I was hurt, because for the longest time he led me to believe there is no woman in his life, even as a 'heterosexual' man. Once when i jokingly asked him to visit an attractive female friend who is a physician to check up on his health, he replied very self-assuredly and cockily, ""i do not want to meet any women. I want to explore my male friendships. I am very happy these days"" - which obviously led me to believe that he is perhaps feeling something for me. I was miserable and dying on the inside seeing him in constant pain and misery, and it hurt me more that i couldn't go near him as his 'girlfriend' was there for him. Also, did i mention his 'girlfriend' was more like his child-bride - she must be in her early 20s. Her Florence Nightingale act was really chapping my ass. Now, I will bullet-point the most magical moments, in interest of brevity:

The day after his childbride-girlfriend moved in with us and took-charge of taking care of him, i maintained a safe distance from him bcoz i felt totally fenced out by the childbride-girlfriend. That evening when i returned home from work, i made small talk with him, asked after him, and walked to go to my room. He called me back and said, ""Can you please sit with me for sometime and talk to me? I'm not feeling well, and i believe i'll feel better if you're here and talking to me"". I ofcourse obliged, bcoz was in pain and i wanted to help my friend. At this point i am still under the impression that he just needed anybody's company to humour/comfort him - but as was to learn in the days to come, he meant to seek out for me specifically. After we had a brief chat about my day, work and i shared some jokes, i observed he noticeably looked physically better. He was sitting up straight now, instead of lying in bed. Then he said to me, ""Has anyone ever told you that you have a very nice presence?"". I literally spat out 'What?' - not bcoz i didn't hear him, but bcoz it was such a strangely beautiful thing to say to a person, i couldn't believe anyone could speak this way. He repeated himself bcoz he thought i didn't hear him. His childbride-girlfriend was in the room when this happened. I wanted to hug him and never let him go, for being so vulnerable and beautiful to me.

The very next day was Pride Day in New Delhi. I had already decided to cancel to be home for him. When i woke up by noon (it was Sunday), and walked into the drawing room, he brought up the Pride with me, and explicitly said to me, ""Don't go, stay home"". I obviously told him, ""I'm not going anywhere"". He then shared a funny anecdote for about 10 mins, after which i remarked to everyone in the room that maybe the medicines are finally working, bcoz for the first time since his health worsened he appeared to be physically capable of carrying on a conversation by himself. They all laughed, and his childbride-girlfriend sincerely said, ""He's feeling better because you're here now. He wasn't talking to anyone all morning"" - and his brother jokingly affirmed it. He only smiled and looked away.

One can only imagine how this makes me feel. He's tacitly acknowledging that my 'presence' has a 'healing' effect on him (if you're thinking at this point that i'm too full of myself, wait for it...). I felt special, appreciated and loved like never before.

One day when i was leaving for work in the morning, he was still in bed when he asked me what time i'll be back home by evening. I asked him if he needed something. He said, in the presence of his brother and childbride-girlfriend, ""My health worsens by evening, as the medicines begin to wear-off. I feel terrible and everything becomes unbearable. I'll be better if you're around. I just need you to come home early"". I just couldn't believe he needed me this way, persistently, despite his brother and childbride-girlfriend constantly being at his disposal. I was nearly in tears bcoz i have never witnessed a man who is so vulnerable and reached out to someone so tenderly. I stroked his arm and told him i'll be back soon. After this day, he regularly asked me in mornings if i'll be back home soon. When i came home in evenings and asked him how he was doing, he'd say, ""I'm OK, but i'm feeling much better now that you're here"". I felt like i have someone special in my life and loving to come home to.

Despite all his affection, it was a little overwhelming to come to terms with the fact that he has a woman in his life. So for 2-3 days, i remained quiet and aloof from him, as it killed me to be around them as a couple. One day some common friends visited home to see him. He was talking to a friend and was speaking in pain and exhaustion, narrating a story about how the doctors inserted a drip in his arm, and sadly observed it as the 'highlight' of his day. I felt terrible looking at him feeling like shit, so i tried to lighten his mood by reminding him that our lovely friends had come home to see him. He entirely ignored that and said very matter of factly to everyone, ""Usually, the highlight of my day is when [insert my name] comes home in the evening from work and tells me about his day, his stories and makes jokes. But he hasn't been talking to me much in the last 2-3 days"". I died when i heard him say this, bcoz i never want him to believe that i resent him or hold a grudge against him for anything - even for not telling me that he already had a woman in his life - because I have had the most surreal and beautiful time of my life with him. And it pained me more that he felt this way esp. when he was suffering in such pain. I told myself that i had to learn to deal with the fact that he has a woman in his life, if not for my sake, but for him, bcoz this way i can be there for him again, and i couldn't let him suffer in pain knowing that being with me made him feel emotionally and physically better. I swallowed my problem in one day, and he observed happily how i had 'come back' to him.

After a little more than a month, when he was healthy again, we had a little party at the house and invited close friends. One of the friends couldn't stop gushing to him about how good he looked now and that it was so good to see him like this again. Everyone was in the room, and he said to her, ""It's all because of [insert my name]. Everything happened because of him"". I wanted to hug this tender, beautiful man and never let him go. As much as i fell deeper and deeper in love with him, i was scared his childbride-girlfriend would stab me for 'alienating his affection' :/

[Once he was healed (by love?), the childbride-girlfriend moved out of our home]

He was discussing cinema with me one day, and spoke of some really good queer cinema he had seen. He spoke of the Chinese film 'Lan Yu' - the story revolved around a slightly older closeted man who is in an on and off relationship with a younger man, is in denial for long, even marries a woman and get's divorced and eventually comes back to the young man - and said, ""it's such a beautiful film. It affected me so much. I didn't know i could feel this way."" I froze and didn't ask follow-up questions, bcoz i am still not sure at this time whether he feels 'romantically' or 'platonically' about me. On a separate occasion, when we were having a conversation about gender/sexuality - as i'm a lawyer who works on SOGI issues in India - he admitted that it is his sincere belief that everyone falls on a spectrum of gender and sexuality, and there are no fixed identities.

One Sunday when i was working in my room in evening, he asked if was very busy. I said i'll be working briefly, bcoz it's urgent work. He smiled and said, ""I understand...[hesistatingly] It's just that Sunday is the one day i get to be with you for a whole day...""

One night just before sleeping, we talked about faith/God/divinity. He initiated the conversation, asking me what i thought of it. After i gave him my opinion briefly, I asked him for his and he started by saying he believes God/divinity/energy of the Universe flows through everything (i jokingly referred to him as Pocahontas), and for him personally, it manifests most commonly in the form of natural objects (trees) or people / relationships. Then he said, ""I believe i cannot live with you. If something happens to me, you are affected by it. If something happens to you, i am affected by it"", gesturing at me.

He is well-read in literature and poetry, and he often quotes poetry to/for me, whether privately or publicly. And it is always an expression of fondness or appreciation, particularly expressed for me. One day i told him that it's quite admirable that he gets poetic so often in the backdrop of our conversations / situations. He was amused, as if i was telling him a falsehood about himself, and refused to believe it. I reminded him of the times, and he embarrassedly / shyly noted, ""Maybe i get this way when i am with you...I am a very different person than what my friends know me for, when i am here...I am a happier person...I think it's because of you..."".

By mid-December, he decided to take time off from University and go live with his parents in his hometown for a few months. He asked me, nay, rather told me that he wants me to accompany him to the rlwy stn when he leaves, bcoz he needs ""help with the luggage"". I think wondrously how it worked out so perfectly that of all the people - his brother, his University friends, and childbride-girlfriend - this crazy, beautiful man wanted me to go with him to the stn. on his final day in the city.

Few days before he left, when we all decided to sleep in the hall together, communally. While he and i slept on either sides of the room, the middle space was left out for our 2 friends who were still working in their rooms. We were having a conversation, making small talk and jokes. There was a lull in the conversation. The next thing he said was, ""We are sleeping on extreme sides of the room"" and sighed. The first thought that entered my mind was, ""Me thinks thou dost protest too much!"". On a simple reading of the situation, that line by a straight man to a gay man did not read like a harmless comment to me in any Universe. I asked him, ""What about it?"", and he only repeated himself in response. I registered that comment as a protest/complaint, and took the first chance i got to sleep next to him. At one point in the night, i felt his hand on my back, intently. I felt so much love in his touch.

The day came for me to drop him off at the rlwy stn. We were more or less quiet throughout the cab ride, except making small talk. After i helped him settle down in the train, i asked him if he was excited to be home. He walked away from me w/o answering the question. When he said goodbye, he had the look that said ""i don't even know why i'm leaving/what am i doing?"", hugged me tenderly and left.

We have been constantly in touch over the phone; in fact he often speaks to me just before he goes to bed. He said the thing he misses most about being home with us is some of times we spent together.

I either feel like we are lovers presumptive, where nothing needs to be said and we should let things take it's natural progression - Or - i am dealing with a very intimate, heterosexual male friend.

My sincere belief from the point where he first blurred the lines of the nature of our friendship/relationship: i believe for sure there is a lot of fondness, affection and love as friends here. But just based on how he expresses himself about how he feels towards me and is sometime confused on where to place our friendship / relationship, leads me to believe he may be in a process of discovering he is bisexual. And if he is indeed undergoing a process of discovery, i do not want to interrupt it by rushing 'the talk', ask questions, seek answers and ruin everything. I want him to have the time to understand himself better while he's away. I do sincerely hope he loves me back completely as i love him, spiritually/romantically. All those precious moments we shared, he made me feel like magic.

Well, that's the best i can do to explain his behaviour or emotions. What do y'all think?",queer
Gay poem I wrote about starting to date again after coming out,"I think you’re really cute

And you have blue hair

And sometimes its green

Or black

And you laughed 

At a stupid video I showed you

And we both like Vonnegut

And Steven Universe

And Kimya Dawson


I want to kiss you

But I’m afraid

Cause if you don’t want to kiss me

Its gonna be weird

I like being weird with you

But I don’t know if you like being weird with me

In the same way


I wish I had met you in the summer

When my brain chemicals were 

Balanced

And I felt capable and fun


You make me want to be better because I want you to like me

And I’m not who I am

Right now 


And so I’ll try

For myself so I can share

Myself

With you

You make me want to be more 

QUEER


Could I hold your hand

This Friday at the movies? 
",queer
Sir Ian McKellen Chokes Up While Reading Emotional Coming Out Letter,,queer
illstrated guide to queer astrology,"heya folks, i made this illustrated guide to queer astrology, wondering what you think :)
https://medium.com/@marszhausgradiva",queer
Actual Queer People Playing Queer People Finding Love In New LGBT Short Film! Very Cool!,,queer
Come join our Lesbian (WLW) Server :D,"Our [community!](https://discord.gg/zUYR4Mp)is dedicated to **all lesbians** *(or others identifying within the feminine spectrum; cis, trans or non-binary)*, who are attracted to others within the feminine spectrum! 


Join our mature community to seek advice and support, or just chill out with like-minded people. This server has plenty to offer. Hope you'll help our family grow, and that I'll see you there soon ^:3


https://discord.gg/zUYR4Mp

PS: WLF = Women who Love Women. ",queer
LGBTQ+ Workplace Experiences,"Hi! We are LGBTQ-affirming researchers (faculty and graduate students in Counseling Psychology) at the University of Florida conducting a study focused on the experiences of stigma and oppression of sexual minorities (e.g., lesbian, gay, and bisexual people) in the United States. Participation will involve completing a 20-30 minute online survey. Every 25th person to complete the survey will receive a $20 Amazon.com gift card. These awards will be given and all e-mail addresses discarded prior to accessing any survey data.

In order to participate you must: a) Identify as lesbian, gay, bisexual, queer, questioning, or some other nonexclusively heterosexual identity, b) Reside in the United States and be currently employed and c) Be 18 years of age or older

LGBQ people of any gender identity are encouraged to participate. If you would like to participate, please follow [this link](https://ufl.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_e3Ee4kIrhefjCrH)

Thank you VERY much in advance for your time and effort. Please feel free to pass on this link to other people who might be eligible to participate.

If you have any question about this study, please feel free to contact the Principal Investigators, Richard Douglass, M.S. (rdouglass@ufl.edu) and Ryan Duffy, Ph.D. (rduf@ufl.edu). This research has been approved by the Institutional Review Board (IRB) at the University of Florida (IRB201703215).

",queer
Discord server - Queer Friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.

Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+ due to the nature of the server having 'dating' elements)",queer
"This is the first year I wasn’t invited to my given family’s Christmas celebrations. I started to say that it’s because I’m queer, because my partner is trans… but this isn’t on me. I wasn’t invited because my family is toxic",,queer
Any information on Latin queer families raising children through the gender binary due to machismo? Or rejection of the gender binary when raising their kids?,,queer
Discord server - Queer Friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.
Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+)",queer
Discord server - Queer Friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.
Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+)",queer
Queer rapper releases crying in the club track,,queer
Discord server - Queer friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.

Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+)",queer
LGBTQ webshow. This episode is satirical and about making protest posters.,,queer
Love Wins in the Land Down Under!,,queer
Hello! Codeswitching in the LGBTQ community.,"I hope this message finds you well. Our research team is currently working on a study devoted to researching how, why, and when gay and bisexual males code-switch between “straight speech” and a register associated with the LGBTQ community. We are conducting a research project to fulfill course requirements. We are inviting gay males &amp; bisexual males, in the LGBTQ community to contribute to the data pool for the current research. We would greatly appreciate if you could help us collect the data. We expect that it should take approximately 15-20 minutes for you to complete the survey. All data collected will be anonymous. Please read this consent form.Thank You! https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/XM5DQ3L",queer
Discord server - Queer friends &amp; Dating 18+,"I've created a Discord server for queer/lgbt people for friends &amp; dating as I'm tired of not seeing any dating spaces aimed at the queer/lgbt commmunity.

Check us out if you're interested and see for yourself :D

https://discord.gg/KbJdQme

(You must be 18+)",queer
Kathy Griffin: A Hell Of A Story about Harvey Levin and Andy Cohen,,queer
Crazy Christian Preachers protest Yoga Pants ft. The Young Turks,,queer
Survey about Homosexual Stereotypes facing Men!,"Hi! I'm Kane and I'm a gay student from the UK. I'm currently doing a project about gay men and stereotypes and I'd love hearing from fellow gay men about their experiences!

I've made a short survey and I'd love it you could fill it in for me! It's totally anonymous and the data will only be used by me in my project. Don't worry, it won't take 5 minutes!

https://docs.google.com/forms/d/e/1FAIpQLScHBIk95IgDnixIgETrMuvbdkryxJk3U20oNhJq5FLjSnokwA/viewform?usp=sf_link

If you've got any questions then feel free to message me or comment on this post. THANKS!",queer
Guided Meditation thru the horrors of Columbus Day,,queer
Surprise! Cis white men stealing work from a Trans WOC,,queer
Understanding love across different types of romantic relationships Survey,,queer
Cypriots answered YES or NO to a hypothetical referendum about same sex marriage! Here are the results,,queer
Should LGBTI Groups Provide Relocation Assistance For LGBTIs In Small Town Areas?,"Do you think LGBTI groups should provide LGBTI people stuck in small, rural, ""out in the middle of nowhere"" type areas relocation assistance with mentoring? 

Why or why not? Thanks. ",queer
Brian and Karl How gay men used to speak A short film in Polari.,"Brian and Karl.  
How gay men used to speak - A short film in Polari 
https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Y8yEH8TZUsk",queer
NEW LGBT Channel Premieres On Vidme 🌈 Diversity Dialogue,,queer
"Life is Strange obviously features queer characters, so why is it so coy about it?",,queer
The victim-hero. Stigma. Trauma.,"[Serious] Looking for evidence https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Evidence of stigma is challenging. Many in our communities examine a notion of stigma with respect to HIV/AIDS human immunodeficiency virus infection and acquired immune deficiency syndrome. 

It could be stigma is more often an excuse. For example, not getting tested for STIs/HIV.
Shame and narcissism too difficult, too challenging to examine as well.  The victim-hero idea. ",queer
Entanglements of trauma in Australia's divisive debate over same sex marriage,,queer
Looking at use of the word aboriginal in bad blood blog with Amnesty Australia article.,"Looking at use of the word aboriginal in bad blood blog https://badblood.wordpress.com/2017/09/18/understanding-community-trauma/ Comparing Amnesty Australia article https://www.amnesty.org/en/latest/campaigns/2015/08/why-saying-aborigine-isnt-ok-8-facts-about-indigenous-people-in-australia/

Languages of Australia https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Languages_of_Australia",queer
any tips on dealing with self-erasure?,"any tips on how to deal with self-erasure? i'm a polyamorous queer woman monogamously dating a straight man. my prior history has been in open relationships with women, nobinary people, and men, most of which also identified as queer. i'm feeling like i'm not queer enough and don't belong anywhere even though on some level i know that's not true. help?? ",queer
Afonso Medeiros desmorona ataque do MBL à exposição Queermuseu em Porto Alegre,,queer
SHOUT OUT TO THE TWO OTHER PEOPLE ON HERE,HOPE Y'ALL ARE HAVING A GOOD TIME,queer
Queerness &amp; Religion,Does anyone know of a religion that upholds God as a genderless being/spirit and that does not base its worship on the Bible?,queer
I'm going to Sf this sept. Any tips on finding a husband?,"I have posted on r/SFr4r, r/queersf, r/sanjose, r/siliconvalley and r/asksf.

I'm 37, effeminate, gay, darker skinned, asian and I've never dated. Any tips would be appreciated. If u like me, then pm me or if u know someone who likes my type, then u can pm me or tell them to pm me.Thanks.",queer
I painted my nails and I feel pretty good. Male 👨,,queer
on queer peer pressure,"so i am an afab non binary person. more so that my concept of my gender doesn't bother me that much.. i identify as queer and recently got into a heated argument with a member of my family who told me i was taking up space by calling myself queer because i'm not actively having queer experiences or relationships.. that in itself is complex. I have had relationships wherein i hadn't been aware boundaries were being crossed or that the other person wasn't on the same page, miscommunication. 
I'm currently in a headspace where i want to grow into myself and be slow about it. but i have family members (who're trans and queer) who tell me i am doing it wrong. it makes me doubt myself, what if i am not behaving queer enough? am i queer enough? am i actually taking up someone else's space and taking away a platform for someone else to speak on???
 i have dated cis men before, a femme partner briefly, who have had queer relationships and experiences (they're queer if they want to date me, so i make a point to have those discussions). i am polyamorous, the idea of dating multiple people doesn't bother me. I have had some very deep connections and it's always with the soul of the person, not their body, like i can't not see deeper than the surface and there are so many complexities to people. who knows what you can teach one another! who knows what you can learn just by making friends or finding lovers in all shapes and forms and genders. 

I guess i just wanted to get this thought process out of my mind (i have never posted something like this before), and maybe there are other people out there too who have people around them who make them feel isolated, like your identity isn't good enough. When, at the end of the day, my mind and body and soul are going to be there when i sleep or when i wake, when i go for a walk or have a cup of coffee. someone else's projections of what you should be are harmful if you seriously let them get to you..

i'm tired of struggling to prove who i am. i just want to be.",queer
What's that!? Queer media that won't make you angry or sad?! I'm Scottie and I'm creating a comedic web series made by queer people for queer people!,"I wanted to break free of the stereotypes within the queer genre, so I wrote a half hour script called ""The L Train."" I was sick of seeing super serious, incredibly depressed, and smoking hot white girls fall in love only to cheat on, be murdered by, or murder each other. As a long time consumer of gay media (duh) I made sure that this project defies all of the tired stereotypes.


[BUT WE NEED HELP GETTING THIS OFF THE GROUND! If you are interested, you can find more information here! Right now we are trying to raise money to make this thing REAL and any contribution helps! Even just tweeting the link is a huge help.](https://www.kickstarter.com/projects/1794308679/the-l-train?ref=user_menu)

We live in a world where 'I'm gay' is no longer met by 'are you sure?' but rather, 'me too, but it's 12PM at Sweet Green, can you please keep moving, you're holding up the line.' I wanted to create something that reflects that experience.

Feel free to AMA!
",queer
Seeking interview subjects for student project,"I am a grad student studying new media. For my thesis, I'm going to create videos highlighting people who proudly live outside of social norms. (Gender, sex, family, etc.)

I'm seeking diverse individuals who would be willing to speak to me about why the way they live is great. We can do email, Skype, phone, etc. 

The end result will be a twitter account that features video/audio clips, animations, and illustrations telling the stories that people share with me

If you would not like your voice or face to be shown, please let me know. These will be on the internet, so please be aware in case you aren't comfortable being outed due to work, family, or other circumstances. 

Direct message or comments are okay!",queer
Research into the experience of sex and sexuality in women who have OCD,"My name is Elicia Boulton and I am a student at UWE undertaking my Professional Doctorate in Counselling Psychology. As part of this course I am undertaking research into the experience of sex in women who have Obsessive Compulsive Disorder (OCD). The aim of the current project is to listen to women’s voices and understand their experiences of sexuality and sexual practices when they have been diagnosed with and/or undergone therapy for OCD. This research is supervised by Victoria Clarke (Victoria.Clarke@uwe.ac.uk).

This research is open to women aged 18 or older who have a formal diagnosis of OCD and/or have received treatment for this condition (including women who have recovered and are willing to write about their past experiences). The research is open to all women so please feel free to share the details of the research widely. I hope to hear from women with a wide range of sexual experiences and identities (including women who identify their sexuality as heterosexual/straight, lesbian, bisexual, queer, and trans and cisgender women).

Participating in the study involves completing an online open-ended survey - you'll be asked to provide some basic information about yourself (nothing that will identify you), and then answer a series of open questions about your experiences of sexuality and OCD; you respond in your own words (this is not a click box style survey). The survey will take around 20-30 minutes to complete depending on how detailed your answers are.

Please use the following link to access the survey if it is something you are interested in or would like to share, and many thanks in advance for taking the time to read this: -https://uwe.eu.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_7Ptf1L1YvxWhivj

The survey link can also be found on the following Facebook page: https://www.facebook.com/theexperienceofsexinwomenwhohaveOCD/

Ethics: My research was granted ethical approval by the UWE Faculty of Health and Applied Science Research Ethics Committee. The ethics committee can be contacted through Leigh Taylor (Leigh.Taylor@uwe.ac.uk or Tel: +44 (0)117 32 81170), and the reference number is: HAS.16.08.006.
",queer
Queer Youtube Content,"Hi folks, I make queer and social justice youtube content and am trying to get the word out about my channel, right now I only have a few videos up but I'd love for you to check it out and give feedback. 

First is Gender F×cked, a short film about my some of my experiences as someone who is a specific type of gender queer that I call Gender Fucked. (https://youtu.be/HXsUujhufjA). 

Also I have this video with Trans youtuber and gamer Youtube.com/alexjbrimmer (https://youtu.be/SsMbEYiwWUQ) where we discuss youtube, coming out as trans, and privilege.
",queer
"Survey on Sexual Fantasy &amp; Relationships (18+, in relationship, 30 mins)","I am currently conducting a research study on relationships and sexual fantasy for my Master's thesis at the University of Michigan, and am looking for LGBQ participants! It's important to me that participants of various sexualities are represented, as research historically excludes non-heterosexual participants or their data.


Eligibility: 
• Be at least 18 years old. 
• Reside in the U.S
• Be in a committed relationship with someone that has lasted at least 6 months. 
• Be sexually active with this relationship partner. 
• Have sexually fantasized about this partner OR another person, while engaging in sexual activity with this relationship partner.

This study involves a 30-minute online questionnaire. All responses remain anonymous. As compensation, participants can enter into a raffle for one of five $50 Amazon Gift Certificates. 

To begin this study, click this link: https://umich.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_cOtL12hwPzkgelD
For more info, please contact fantasyproject@umich.edu or 734-763-7121.
This research is
 being conducted by: Sari van Anders, Ph.D., Associate Professor, University of Michigan For more info, please contact the lab at fantasyproject@umich.edu or 734-763-7121.",queer
She’s had a gay bar in Mississippi for 20 years. And she thinks Gen Z needs a lesson in LBGT history.,,queer
A look at Tommi Parrish's comics that tackle the challenge of society's hetronormative scripts,,queer
Help for undocumented LGBTQ immigrants fleeing persecution,,queer
He spent 30 years fighting for marriage equality. This is why.,,queer
What are other sweet online store that makes queer pride tshirts? My fav is revelandriot.com,I want to make my wardrobe all queer,queer
Study on Transgender Peoples' Discriminatory Experiences,"Hello,
My name is Laurel Watson, and I am an assistant professor of counseling psychology at the University of Missouri-Kansas City. I am currently conducting a study investigating transgender individuals’ experiences of discrimination. In order to participate, you must a) identify as an individual of transgender experience (for example, gender queer, trans woman, trans man, nonbinary trans individual, gender fluid, and so on), b) be 18 years of age or older, and c) live in the United States, and d) be willing to participate at two different time points: now and 2 to 3 weeks from now, for a total of 10 to 20 minutes altogether.  

If you are interested in participating, you will be asked to complete an anonymous online survey twice: 1) now and 2) 2 weeks from now. You will be provided with an email reminder two weeks from now to complete the surveys again. Your email will be disconnected from your survey responses, maintaining anonymity. The surveys will take about 5 to 10 minutes to complete each time, for a total of 10 to 20 minutes altogether. If you are interested in participating, please click on the following link: 

https://umkc.co1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_8vOUBeUNW3eJncV

Or, if you would like further information, please message me.

For your participation, you may choose to enter a raffle to win one of two $25.00 Amazon.com gift cards.

This study, protocol number 16-113, has been approved by University of Missouri, Kansas City’s Institutional Review Board. If you have any concerns about your rights as a participant your concerns please call 816-235-5927

Thanks for your consideration and have a nice day!
",queer
Congress wants to make sure transgender people are not a protected class,,queer
Not sure how to say it,"So, I'm out as pansexual to everyone who I want to come out to, except for my dad. I'm 99% ready to tell him, yet he's probably the one family member who would be the the least accepting (not to the point of voilence or anything, maybe just getting a bit pissed off/angry) so I'm not sure how to tell him. 
He lives in a different country, so it's not really possible to do it face to face. I'm not sure how to break it to him. I mainly want to come out to him as it feels like this is the last major hurdle I have to cross to feel really relaxed about it around my family and friends.
(I hope this is the right sub for this, and I hope the above makes some sort of sense).",queer
How do I know if I'm grey-ace or if I'm aceflux? How do I differentiate?,,queer
Pls some advice pls,"My parents are lesbian and bisexual, so I have grown up around queerness and been fine with it (they are now divorced, not looking for pity points, it's important to the plot). They recently both moved to oakland and have been living in separate houses. I recently decided to identify as pansexual, and I know my parents would be fine with it, but recently, I got into an argument with one mom. I don't know how to come out to her (and I can't come out to the other one because she would tell the mom I'm having an argument with). Furthermore, I go to a school that's very anti-queer, anti-belief, and even though I have come out as an atheist, I am not sure what reaction I would get from my ""friends"". And, my other (straight, lesbian parents) friend might push me away for a super racist (i am part Asian) anti-belief, anti-queer cis girl he is crushing on. Another concern of mine is he will think I am crushing on him (I am not). Thank you",queer
http://www.critical-theory.com/20-must-read-queer-theory-books/,,queer
Leg shaving tricks,"I didn't grow up shaving my legs, so I never learned any classic tips and tricks. I've been doing it for the last 3 years, so I've learned a couple of my own, but the biggest thing I'm struggling with is how to avoid any skin soreness directly after and avoid ingrown hairs. I've tried pumice scrubs and lotion, but nothing is seeming to resolve it fully. 

Does anyone have any suggestions on the matter?",queer
The 25 Best (and Worst!) Companies for LGBTQ Rights In America.,,queer
[Article] High school student challenges gender roles with scholarship video,,queer
An open letter to gay men: judgement is ruining our community,,queer
LGBTQ+ Discord Server,,queer
What's your remedy when your asshole hurts? :(,"Hi there!
What's your go-to proven remedy when your asshole is irritated/hurts/burns and bleeding (slightly, not an urgent care case)? 
Any advice greatly appreciated. ",queer
[Article] Tig Notaro says there’s work to do in the place she considers home — Mississippi,,queer
possibly trans,"EDIT: This post is very long, but it IS in chronologically order, so it shouldn't be terribly painful to read. But it might be. Sorry!

I've been questioning my gender identity since around 8th grade. It was all vague back then; I didn't really know how I felt, but I've learned more about myself. I am 19 now.

Here's the story.

I was born female.

Growing up, my favorite toys were stuffed animals - dragons, or horses, or pokemon, it didn't matter much. However, I distinctly remember asking for the boy's toy at McDonald's 99% of the time because I thought they were cooler.

But I didn't play or hang out with boys. I hated sports, so what they did on the playground looked boring. I liked to make up imaginary worlds. In fact, I LOVED it, and would spend hours with my best friends crafting towns and shops on in the playroom using stuffed animals, blocks and other toys.

I didn't like skirts very much, and had no sense of style at all. I made my mom pick out all my clothes because I didn't care what I wore. I had hair on my arms and people were mean to me about it, and I was embarrassed.

I don't remember ever wanting to ""be"" a boy as a kid. I liked some boyish things but nobody seemed to care or mind. I didn't really think about it, I was just me. 

Middle school was...a blur, but more of a time where I figured out my sexuality than my gender. Things got interesting at the end of eighth grade where I started talking to Jackie, now Jack, about gender. She felt like she was a boy inside, but I wasn't sure about myself. 

Around this time, though, I finally found clothes I liked! Freakin' button downs, jeans, and blazers. That's what I wore and I looked damn hot in them. Y'know... for a 14 year old. I also started to become really obsessed with androgyny, and I even saved pictures of female androgynous models onto my computer to draw or just to look at. 

I came out to my mom as pansexual in 9th grade, and around then started identifying to myself as genderqueer. Why?

I don't feel like a woman. I'm just not. I don't know. When girls talk about ""girly"" things like makeup or shopping for clothes, I tune out. I also usually don't shave anything except armpits, I used to but I don't think there is a point, I only did it before because social pressure. My mom still brings it up sometimes but I refuse to shave just because someone wants me to. It's so weird, I was in a play recently and I had to go in the girl's dressing room and the whole time I felt like they were talking about makeup, foundation, bras... I didn't have anything to contribute to the conversation except say ""no"" to their offers of giving me makeup.

And the costume designer - ugh -, she was like ""are you sure you don't want to put on makeup?"" and it bothered me.

When I was 16 years old I got my hair cut short, and it was the BEST DECISION OF MY LIFE! I felt amazing, I loved how I looked, I was just badass and amazing! My face literally HURT from smiling so much in the mirror at the haircut place. It's the happiest memory I can think of.

Then there was about a year ago, my high school prom. I wore a tuxedo. It was a huge drama. My mom basically didn't talk to me for a couple days, and we're usually really close. It was only able to happen because my sister paid for it. My mom left the men's warehouse store in tears because she was ""embarrassed""... how did she think that made me feel? :(

But, after some talking, we finally made up, but damn it was a tough week. I was relieved to be able to go to prom with her support.

(And I looked damn amazing and those pictures from that day are the sharpest I've ever looked.)

Anyway, I remember, she kept asking me, ""Do you want to be a boy? Why do you want to wear this?"" and I just said ""No! No! I just like the way it looks."" I just wanted her to let me wear it.

Then, last fall at college, I bought a binder. I was really excited. I have it, and I like it, but it definitely wasn't as dramatic as getting my haircut. I already have really small boobs, so maybe that's why. I do wear it sometimes when I go out, but back at the beginning I wore it like every day. It felt legitimizing. 

Also, online I use a masculine pseudonym, and usually list my gender as other or prefer not to say. This username I have now is the most obvious its gotten.

I've also, cautiously, started referring to myself as a boy to one of my close friends. For the past few years, when asked my pronouns at queer gatherings, I say ""he and she are both fine.""

I feel not right when I get cards that say ""for my daughter"" and stuff like that. I even made a collage about it where I cut up a card my dad gave me (obviously didn't show that to him, lol).

But the one thing that has puzzled me about transgender as an identity is the dysphoria aspect. I don't get it terribly bad... in fact I've only noticed anything at all very recently. I wonder if I'm just making things up so I can be like ""oh yes I'm trans."" I don't know why I'd want to do that since I know it's a really hard identity to live with... I didn't get a binder because I hated my boobs, I got it because I thought it would look good and also be interesting to try...

OH! And I forgot something important. I identify VERY STRONGLY with certain male characters on television. Maybe this doesn't sound important but there are certain characters I actually consider part of me, so much so that I once considered them as within my conscious. I guess what I'm saying is I've been really obsessed. In particular, I find the gay male identity completely fascinating. I often wish or feel like I should have been a gay man, and that if I were I guy I'd certainly be gay. This shouldn't really make sense since I mostly like females (albeit masculine-presenting) in real life, but it makes sense in my head.

I roleplay a lot online and I always play a gay male character. Even sexually, I imagine men together, despite the fact that I am female and mostly attracted to other females. I feel that if I ever had sex, I would need a partner that would adapt to these fantasies. 

I've had a couple dreams where I had a strap-on, and I also had a dream where I was about to have sex with a man and I was a man, too. I've also had dreams where I have a vagina, though. But the dream where I was a man about to have sex with a man was my favorite.

Maybe there's no reason for me to even be thinking/worrying about this. Unless there's something I want to do, does it matter? I guess I'm trying to make sense of my feelings. And maybe being referred to as a girl has gotten to me, a bit.

Kind words, anyone?",queer
Queerly Beloved: Thoughts on a Queer Christian Identity,,queer
Any married LGBT people willing to be interviewed for a national research study?,"Hi, all! I'm a researcher at Syracuse University, where I'm conducting interviews with currently married LGBT people. If you are over 18 years of age and are currently married to a same-sex spouse, you're eligible to participate! (This study has been approved by the University's IRB, and I'm happy to share documentation of that with anyone who has questions or concerns.) During the interview, we'd talk about the strengths and weaknesses of your marriage, your relationship history, and your relationships with your other family members. Most interviews last between 60 and 90 minutes. Your confidentiality will be protected! If you're eligible and interested in participating, please contact me either through reddit or my University email, amhoy@syr.edu. Your story could make a contribution to our knowledge of LGBT families, knowledge that policymakers and service providers need! ",queer
Is kissing romantic or sexual?,"As you know, aromantic and asexual identities are distinct - people can be romantic but asexual, or sexual but aromantic, or sexual and romantic. 


But that makes me wonder - is kissing romantic or sexual to people? I think this can be debated so feel free to discuss your personal ideas!

One argument on the romantic side is that kids movies show it. You know, always. Every Disney movie climaxes (heh) with a kiss of true love, it seems. Kissing seems to be ""innocent"" as long as it isn't prolonged. 

But when you think of cartoons, they often show the character being kissed have their whole body turn red, as if in - arousal?

And of course it's no mystery that kissing can cause arousal. But is it still just ""romantic""?

And what even IS romance? If I cuddle with a friend platonically, which I have, how is that different from cuddling romantically? For me, I call it platonic and simply realize that it will never lead to ""something more"" (which I had to be aware of since I had a crush on the person previously). Then, if we define romance as the flirting, the leadup to sex, getting back to my original question, kissing is sexual insofar as it suggests a lead up to sex.

Obviously, kissing isn't sexual when it's something done out of habit, or in your culture. For example quick pecks on the cheek or lips to children, or in countries that use kisses as a greeting. 

Its also interesting to watch how kissing in television changes as you mature and also in different relationships. For example the kissing in a show like Orange is the New Black is much different than kisses in Disney. In the former, it is much more obviously sexual; in the latter, it just seems like ""OMG LOVE"" but when you think about it pressing your lips to a total stranger you just met seems so obviously compelled by some sexual attraction -

Ah! So much to think about. Anyway, what are your thoughts on this question?

Also is anyone familiar with that lion king clip where Nala gives Simba the bedroom eyes? Pretty amusing.",queer
Spidarlings - The Queer punk rock musical is coming to Troma!,,queer
[Article] 'The screams were getting louder': He helped save two in the Pulse nightclub shooting,,queer
"Radical Queers Disrupt Capital Pride (Washington, DC)",,queer
Queer Ball Culture and the vocalizations in voguing,"Hi all, I'm pretty well versed and am always trying to further educate myself, on queer culture. I'm still a youngen (21) and growing up in Australia, voguing and ""Balls"" didn't happen around me so much as drag performances in the 2 queer venues i have access to in Perth, Western Australia. I can't seem to find any ""notable"" information about the beginnings of the a cappella often spouted ad-lib by the vogue performer or the MC at a Balls and in songs by Rupaul and Bob the Drag Queen.
Examples of the kind of vocalizations i'm referring to are; ""Kack to the kack, kack, kack, kack boom"" and ""Tatata, tatata, tatata, boom""
Hopefully my question makes sense to some of you and i get get some cool new knowledge about one of the oddest yet most fun parts of voguing (personally).
Failing this i will just watch ""Kiki"" or ""Paris is Burning"" again ahaha",queer
Being LGBT in the rural south isn’t always easy. Hear their stories on our new podcast.,,queer
What's the most creative way your queer in-the-closet Significant Other has hidden you from their family?,,queer
"Survey for individuals ages 12-20 -- $250 Visa gift card grand prize -- your responses help Brave Trails, a leadership camp for LGBTQ+ youth. Thank you!",,queer
Hey! I'm a graduate student working on my thesis research project. Please participate in my study for LGBT Christians!,"My study is about the relationship between religiosity and psychological well-being in LGBT Christians. In order to participate, you must be at least 18 years old, reside in the U.S., and identify as Christian and LGBT. The survey is completely anonymous! It takes 10-15 minutes to complete. If you would like to participate, please click on this link: https://uofmississippi.qualtrics.com/jfe6/preview/SV_ahCEqP6QVBHqm6V?Q_CHL=preview Thank you!",queer
"To the left, my puppy and I when I was a lesbian. To the right, my dog and I after I was blessed to be able to transition.",,queer
Have you ever been worried about holding your partner's hand in public? (A DePaul University IRB-approved research survey on public displays of affection among LGBTQ+),"Hi /r/queer!

&amp;nbsp;

At DePaul University we are conducting a research study to learn more about public displays of affection (PDA) among gender and sexual minorities (GSM). The research consists of one anonymous survey that can be completed online and takes approximately 30 minutes to complete.   The term, ""gender and sexual minorities"", is used in this study to represent the entire spectrum of sexual orientations - such as gay, lesbian, bi, pan, asexual, etc. - as well as people who identify as any minority gender identity - such as transgender, non-binary, or genderqueer, among others (whom may or may not be heterosexual).

&amp;nbsp;
  
In order to participate in this research study you must be a sexual orientation minority, a gender identity minority, or both a sexual orientation and gender identity minority. Some people may prefer to use labels other than ‘sexual minority’ or ‘gender minority’ to describe their sexual orientation and gender identity. I use this term in this survey as a convenience, and I ask for your understanding if the term does not completely capture your sexual and gender identity.  This study will examine what makes GSM more or less likely to show public affection.

&amp;nbsp;

To be eligible to participate you must be all of the following: 


* 18 years old or older


* Any gender and/or sexual minority, such as gay, lesbian, bisexual, asexual, transgender, nonbinary, queer, etc.


* currently living in the United States 


* in a current monogamous relationship for at least one month or have had a past monogamous relationship that lasted at least one month. 

&amp;nbsp;

The following link will take you to the consent form that contains additional information on the project, the purpose of the study, how we protect your anonymity, and more. For more information or to participate, please visit: [This link](http://depaul.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_aUU6aoX3irQAMBf)

&amp;nbsp;

 For more information please contact: lgbtqpda@gmail.com

&amp;nbsp;

* DePaul IRB Approved
* Protocol #JB120916PSY
* February 2, 2017 Through February 1, 2018",queer
Gender independent gift cards?,Trying to find a birthday card for a genderqueer person. Not finding anything cool. Got any ideas? Links? Advice?,queer
Have you ever been worried about holding your partner's hand in public? (A DePaul University IRB-approved research survey on public displays of affection),"Hi /r/queer!

&amp;nbsp;

At DePaul University we are conducting a research study to learn more about public displays of affection (PDA) among gender and sexual minorities (GSM). The research consists of one anonymous survey that can be completed online and takes approximately 30 minutes to complete.   The term, ""gender and sexual minorities"", is used in this study to represent the entire spectrum of sexual orientations - such as gay, lesbian, bi, pan, asexual, etc. - as well as people who identify as any minority gender identity - such as transgender, non-binary, or genderqueer, among others (whom may or may not be heterosexual).

&amp;nbsp;
  
In order to participate in this research study you must be a sexual orientation minority, a gender identity minority, or both a sexual orientation and gender identity minority. Some people may prefer to use labels other than ‘sexual minority’ or ‘gender minority’ to describe their sexual orientation and gender identity. I use this term in this survey as a convenience, and I ask for your understanding if the term does not completely capture your sexual and gender identity.  This study will examine what makes GSM more or less likely to show public affection.

&amp;nbsp;

To be eligible to participate you must be all of the following: 


* 18 years old or older


* Any gender and/or sexual minority, such as gay, lesbian, bisexual, asexual, transgender, nonbinary, queer, etc.


* currently living in the United States 


* in a current monogamous relationship for at least one month or have had a past monogamous relationship that lasted at least one month. 

&amp;nbsp;

The following link will take you to the consent form that contains additional information on the project, the purpose of the study, how we protect your anonymity, and more. For more information or to participate, please visit: [This link](http://depaul.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_aUU6aoX3irQAMBf)

&amp;nbsp;

 For more information please contact: lgbtqpda@gmail.com

&amp;nbsp;

* DePaul IRB Approved
* Protocol #JB120916PSY
* February 2, 2017 Through February 1, 2018",queer
Discord for bi and pan adults,,queer
"queer rituals—looking for examples, any tips?","Hi there! I'm interested in queer rituals, ceremonies, and magic in a PRACTICAL way—so not theory about, history of, etc... but examples, either text or video... anyone got any leads??

To be more specific, I'm interested in ways of affectively manifesting a space that feels set apart from the 'real world' in a way which includes EVERYONE in the space, so without a 'spectator / performer' divide... the context I'm working in is particularly concerned with linking creation, movement, the body, affirmativity, and support to the notion of a 'queer community'. 

Any suggestions for reading or viewing material would be appreciated! ",queer
I'm looking for readings about LGBT representation in media for a research project,"I'm putting together a research project as an application for a master's program and am looking for good academic books, essays or articles about LGBTQ+ representation/portrayal in media, specifically in film. I imagine some of you are enrolled in college classes queer studies and the like, I'd love to have a peek at your syllabus! thanks in advance!",queer
"I'm starting a small LGBTQ+ apparel business, what do you want to wear?","Hi y'all, I am a young gay/queer screen printer in Alabama and I am looking to start a small queer apparel business catering to what people in our community actually want to wear. I'm looking for your input. Simply, what do you want to wear?

I'm starting small. I'll mostly do standard t-shirts to begin with and hopefully expand to things like hoodies, beanies, tanks, and hopefully some cute undies. 

If you have any ideas for designs, base shirt suggestions (brands you like to wear already), or even tips on running a small online business. I want this to be by us and for us! ",queer
Queer Art Questionnaire,"Hi /r/queer!

My name is Tina and I'm creating a data visualization art project that is based upon the queer community members that are closeted in their place of worship. This project is called Noah's Ark and I need your help! The questionnaire is short and simple and the answers will remain anonymous. These questions should take no more than 2 minutes to answer.
https://goo.gl/forms/z1Vbae2eKBYYYR6i1
Thank you so much for helping my artistic vision come to life!

Much love, Tina.",queer
Massive thank you to those who took part in my online survey!,"I just want to take a minute to say a huge thank you to all of those who participated in my online survey for my dissertation! I greatly appreciate how much time and effort some of you spent on giving me honest and meaningful answers. I am very new to reddit and can say that this has been a very positive experience for me! So thank you :)

Ellen x",queer
"During the Renaissance, the city of Florence had a widespread homosexual culture",,queer
"Invitation to take part in an anonymous online survey for my undergraduate psychology research project exploring online communities! (particularly in reference to members of lesbian, gay, bisexual, trans, queer, asexual or pansexual groups)","https://uwehls.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_a8YS2NLZhLezmqV

Hello :)

I am currently an undergraduate psychology student conducting research for my final project. The aim of my research is to explore people's understanding of communities, especially those which are established and maintained through the internet, particularly in reference to members of often marginalised groups (e.g., lesbian, gay, bisexual, trans, queer, asexual or pansexual groups). Recent studies have outlined several benefits related to participating in online interaction although there may also be particular frustrations or challenges in being a member of online communities. I am therefore particularly interested in exploring what motivates members to join an online community, and what their experiences of them are, as well as whether their experiences and behaviours online differ from their experiences in the physical world.

The survey should take no longer than 30 minutes to complete. At no point will you be asked to provide your name or email address if you choose to take part. Instead, you will be asked to generate your own personal ID code. To give me a picture of the range of people taking part in the research, the survey includes a number of demographic questions (e.g., age, sexuality etc). Every effort has been made to ensure all information collected will remain completely confidential and no one be identified at any point during my research.

If you are keen to take part, please follow the link below:

https://uwehls.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_a8YS2NLZhLezmqV

Thank you in advance for your time and effort, it is greatly appreciated!

Ellen xx",queer
Current mental health screening questions for LGBTQ need improvement: Survey study to help change them,"* Who I am: Mental health researcher and Clinical Psychology Ph.D. student (doctoral candidate) \([My Website](http://matthewpodlogar.com/)\)  
* Affiliation: [Florida State University](https://psy.fsu.edu/~joinerlab/)  
* Target group: **LGBTQ in the U.S.**  
* About: 5 minute screening survey for potential eligibility into an anonymous 1 hour online mental health study and computer matching task. Purpose of study is to improve mental health screening. Study questions ask about mental health and suicide. Participation requires a contact phone number (only for record of participation, NOT linked to anonymous survey data).  
* Compensation: Upon full study completion participants may choose to receive a guaranteed $10 amazon.com gift card OR voluntary entry into a raffle for up to $100 amazon.com gift card. Gift card code sent to an email address participants provide in separate page after study completion.  
* Link: [https://fsu.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_eXxAKxCe3c4DRdP&amp;rdt=1](https://fsu.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_eXxAKxCe3c4DRdP&amp;rdt=1)  
  
*This research project is approved by the Florida State University Human Subject Review Board. More information for questions is provided on the [study website](https://fsu.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_eXxAKxCe3c4DRdP&amp;rdt=1)*",queer
Two cute girls in love,,queer
The Uh Huhs - Wrong Young Lady,,queer
Consistently having feelings for people that aren't romantically or sexually attracted to my sex and/or gender. Looking for thoughts and similar stories.,"I kind of want to express a trouble I've been experiencing and also would like to hear some stories from others who also might be frustrated or dismayed with similar ish. 

I'm a queer cisman (for clarity I mean ""queer"" as I'm  simply not straight) and yet I've had sexual interactions with roughly an equal number of men and women. I've had SEVERAL girlfriends in my life, but never a boyfriend, despite being open and out for years as being far more romantically and sexually attracted to men (perhaps a topic for another time or post). 

I'm at a point where it's extremely difficult to see myself with any woman, but like 98% of the men I'm romantically attracted to are all straight. They mostly have more open personalities - the type of men who wouldn't surprise many if they were gay, but aren't (not necessarily feminine). A lot of times I have feelings for them before I find out they're straight and it KILLS me to know that the very rare guy I'm even slightly interested in pursuing a relationship with couldn't really reciprocate the feelings.

I know there's nothing I can do about it, but it's just really crummy and it's happened so much now that it's got me feelin' a little more down than usual. I'm not looking for any ""oh you'll find someone"" because I'm not actively looking for any kind of relationship, but I would like to know how common this is. 

Any other stories? Thoughts?",queer
"What does ""queer"" mean?","So this is probably going to make me sound like an idiot, but I really want to know &amp; figured Reddit would provide some good insight.  Here goes:  I'm in my late 30's.  I grew up in a gay friendly household and was taught that the word ""queer"" was derogatory and on par with the word ""fag.""  But now the word queer is everywhere, with people proudly self-identifying. So I guess my question is- what does ""queer"" mean? And has the meaning changed over time or was I just raised with the wrong info?  Thank you!",queer
Sex trafficking study,"Hey guys, I'm conducting a sex trafficking survey for my experimental class and it would be a great help if you guys took it. It should only take 10-15 mins we hope to present our data to legislators to improve the lives of trafficked victims.
If you are willing to participate in my brief study please click the following link:
https://pace.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_02LZDu76Z7mLgkB

If you have any questions, please feel free to email me at 
nr79386n@pace.edu or message me on here. 
Thank you so much for your time!",queer
Study on Same Sex Male Relationships,"Hi there! I am a graduate student at the University of Memphis. Along with my colleagues, I am conducting an IRB-approved study on factors that impact same sex male relationships. We are particularly looking for anyone who identifies as a gay or bisexual male and is over 18 years of age. Your participation in this study is entirely voluntary and would involve completing several questionnaires that will take approximately 20-30 minutes to complete. Your responses will be confidential and your participation will help in a small way to advance this field of study. If you would like to participate, you may click on the link provided.  

The link to access the survey is:  

https://memphis.co1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_0xsnuh6zJpdWzyt

Thank you for your consideration. ",queer
[survey]Share Your Experiences as a Bisexual Mother,"https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/bisexualresearch

Hello my name is Meghan Cromie, a  bisexual student at New College of Florida. I am conducting research on the experiences of bisexual mothers and I am inviting you to help. Click the link below to be taken to a survey if you are over 18 years old and have given birth, or had a partner who has given birth. The survey should take approximately 15-20 minutes.

If you are friends with any other bisexual moms, feel free to share this link with them.

Thank you for your time, and for helping conduct needed research!
",queer
spiky,spiky,queer
Genealogy + Being Queer,"Hi folks! I'm starting a blog series about genealogy and LGBTQ and each week I want to focus on different issues we may come across as genealogists with members of the LGBTQ community and what I am looking for from you are ideas, problems, etc. things that people who aren't familiar with the LGBTQ community may come across. Thank you!",queer
Looking for bloggers/writers/instagrammers!,"Healingthroughpositivity.wordpress.com 
HEALING THROUGH POSITIVITY is a webpage focused on education for youth and young adults, specifically those in the LGBTQ+ community. This is a one stop shop for fantastic information, ridiculous stories, support during your dark days as well as fun tools to lead a more positive life! 
We at HEALING THROUGH POSITIVITY are dedicated to making sure all of the information brought to you are factual from professional sources and subject experts, while the personal experiences will be varied so that anyone can find a relatable topic.
The website is a skeleton so if any topic interests you, please feel free to reach out either through our instagram healingthroughpositivity.instagram.com or at healingthroughpositivity@gmail.com. 
Looking for writers, bloggers, photographers, apparel companies, instagrammers, subject experts and media to collaborate with. We already have 20+ involved, plus an apparel company and radio slot! 
Our soft openning is on February 15th 2017 at 9:00 AM EST.",queer
Did you have a baby in the last 18 months? are you raising your baby with a partner?,"I am conducting research on the co-parenting relationship that develops when two people have a baby together as part of my Master's Thesis in Infant Mental Health at Mills College in Oakland, CA. I am in particular need of more LGBTQ participants!

If you are in a relationship with a committed partner of any gender and raising your first baby (under the age of 18 months) together, I want to know about your experiences! Your participation and information will be completely anonymous.  To participate, you simply fill out an online survey about your experiences, which takes around 15-25 minutes. You can do the survey on a computer, tablet or even on your phone! You can also enter to win
one of two $50 e-gift cards, to thank you for your participation.

The survey can be found at: https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/coparenting",queer
ART IS GAY,"Are you an artist? Do you want to be part of something positive and focused on queer art? We're looking for writers, but also any other kind of artist to contribute. 

Check out www.artisgay.com to see what's up. ",queer
Queer Gaming Teamspeak,"Hey there! You like to play League of Legends, Hearthstone or Battlefield 1 ?
We got a new Teamspeak Server and are looking for some queer bros to join us.

You can find us at TS³: 5.135.250.145

Looking forward to meet you

Dimi :)
",queer
[survey] Sexual Minority Women &amp; the LGBTQ+ Community,"My name is Shelby and I’m a Psychology and Gender Studies undergraduate student. I’m conducting a brief survey on sexual minority women, gender presentation, and the LGBTQ community for my thesis research and would love your participation. I am looking for sexual minority women above the age of 18. Your participation should take about 10 minutes and will enable you to provide your voice in research that directly impacts your community. 

Here is the link to the survey: 
https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/D2FSQY5

If you have any questions, contact me at shelby.statham13@ncf.edu. 

Thank you!",queer
How We Got Together!,,queer
"$50 Amazon Gift Card Raffle- 15 minute survey: MUST BE 18+, LGBQ, American, in therapy","https://rutgers.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_9nLtE9V1qBthdYx

((www.facebook.com/lgbt.therapy.study or email lgbt.therapy.study@gmail.com for more info)) Winner every Sunday. Eligible if over 18, living in America, LGBQ, and you saw a therapist/counselor this year! Please let me know if this post is unwelcome!",queer
WHY ARE GAYMERS SO MAD,,queer
I'm having a hard time recognizing how I identify..,"I'm a female who is primarily attracted to females but sometimes males, just females more. I don't feel like lesbian, bisexual or pansexual really fit me, I don't feel like I identify as them at all.. would that be considered queer?",queer
Fresh tracks daily at /r/queercore,"Hi folks! I have been posting daily songs in /r/queercore for a couple months now and am planning on keeping it up for a while. I'd love others to join in or just enjoy the music. The vast and expanding landscape of queer music is one of my favorite parts of our culture, and I hope we can celebrate it together. Thanks and happy listening!

P.s. I also post daily tracks at r/femalevocalists if you're into that sort of thing!",queer
Exceptional Bullshit! Two genderqueerdos and Chaz play video games. Today we’re playing through Crowtel Renovations~,,queer
FUCK THE QUEERS,,queer
"Seeking participants for research- must be LGBTQAP+, 18 y/o+, and a U.S. citizen",,queer
Three Albums By LGBTQ Rappers You Need to Hear,,queer
12 Freedom Fighting Bands to Get You Through the Trump Years,,queer
Seeking Participants for Research Survey,"**Participant Recruitment Post**
We are a research team of faculty and graduate students at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln and Texas Tech University, and we are conducting a study on the body image experiences of trans women (male-to-female; MTF) individuals. We encourage all individuals who would be included in the “male-to-female” umbrella to participate, regardless of specific gender identity and whether or not individuals have or have not begun, or desire to, undertake any aspects of gender transitioning. We hope that this study will contribute to the understanding of the health and well-being of trans individuals, and will help to promote future work including federally funded initiatives to benefit trans communities. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so we hope that you will take part in our online survey study.

In order to participate, you must:
• Be 18 years of age or older 
• Identify as trans and be included in the MTF umbrella. We include in this umbrella individuals whose gender identities are non-binary and regardless of whether or not any aspects of transitioning have been undertaken or are desired to be undertaken in the future.
• Reside in the United States

If you would like to participate in our study, you may click this link: https://ttupsych.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_6KbpNqr2DhCMIOp

Your responses are anonymous and your data will be removed from the server soon after you complete the study. Depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network. It is possible that they may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes or provide it to third parties. You may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link above into a new web page.

If you have any questions about this study, please feel free to contact us using the contact information listed below. A list of local and national resources will appear at the end of the survey for anyone interested in additional support. This research study has been approved by the Texas Tech University Institutional Review Board. You will be able to enter a drawing for a chance to win one of 15 $20 gift cards, in thanks for your participation. To enter, at the end of the survey you will be redirected to a new survey database where you will be able to enter an email address to be contacted should you be selected.

Your email is stored separately from your survey responses and the two cannot be linked.

Please feel welcome to pass on this message to other individuals who might be interested in participating as well.

Thank you very much for your time!

Michael Parent, Ph.D. Texas Tech University Department of Psychological Sciences Email: michael.parent@ttu.edu

Elliot Tebbe, Ph.D. University of Nebraska – Lincoln Counseling Psychology, Department of Educational Psychology Email: etebbe2@unl.edu",queer
Coming Out During the Holidays???,,queer
I miss strap-on.org. Anything out there like it?,"I guess the site only ran from 2000 - 2003, but it played a huge role in my life. 

All the feminist webpages these days seem loaded with threads about parenting and crafts. Frankly, I don't really consider these my primary interests. Also, they all seem to lack whimsy. 

There was a genuine sense of community, with regional meetups across the country. 

Were you on the site? What debauchery are you up to now? I don't really remember many screen names, but I sure do miss that place.

Does anybody happen to have the contact info or former handles of the folks who ran it? I'd really like a copy of the forums that were public. The site is excluded from Wayback Machine. ",queer
Queer Islam,"Hello! First post here. I'm wondering if there're any queer Muslims on here? I'm considering taking my shahada soon, and I'd love to speak with queer muslims and gain more perspective. Exegesis will only get you so far...",queer
How a 1990s Media Trend Is Making Gay Media Less White,,queer
Question about terminology,"Disclaimer: I know I'm typing this into reddit, and that I have an equal chance of getting no answer, a hundred thoughtful suggestions, or seventeen people fighting in the comments over who can be the biggest dick. It's not a matter of identity; I know how I work, I just want to know what the right vocab is. :)

I am a cisgender woman, who identifies as ""female"" if you ask, but otherwise don't think about it much. That is, I have a female body and it's definitely mine and I like it, but I had a weird childhood and there's a lot of stuff that people assume I've experienced as a ""woman"" that's totally confusing and alien. If someone called on all the women in the crowd to, I dunno, form a bowling team, someone would probably have to poke me to remind me that they probably meant me. I'm a ""woman"" because that's what I look like and I don't care enough to argue with the default guess.

The people I'm attracted to, at least so far, have all been male-bodied. (I might develop a sudden interest in boobs, but I'm in my mid-thirties and it hasn't happened yet, so I'm not gonna hold my breath.) Some of them identify as male but not very masculine, i.e., gender non-conforming. Some of them are explicitly genderqueer/genderfluid, with an identity and/or expression that is intentionally androgynous, wobbles back and forth, or exists 'between'. I don't go for male-bodied people who are dressed up *as* a woman (drag queens are awesome people, but I don't crush on them), but boys in their own dresses are A-OK by me. They basically just have to be comfortable with their male body, because I am totally not qualified to deal with the alternative in the context of a sexual relationship.

(I don't screen for sexual orientation -- when I hit on people, I'm only interested in whether they're available and interested in *me* -- but a lot of the people I've dated turned out to describe themselves as pan or bi. I think this is correlation rather than causation, tbh. If you're a guy who's come to terms with digging other guys, it's probably way easier to come to terms with also not wanting to be terribly butch.)

What's the right word to describe this? I'm not looking for a community or anything; I already hang out with a group of people who are queer in every sense of the word (gender minorities, sexual minorities, generally artistic weirdos) and if nothing else, I am definitely an ""ally"". I just want to know if there's one single word that covers all that up there, or if the description I've already got is the shortest accurate one there is.

I've got a background in sociology/anthropology, so if someone is tempted to go into super-deep academic wankery, do! I've run across the term 'skoliosexal' recently, but 1) it seems to describe an orientation that's *only* attracted to genderqueer/non-binary/'third gender' people, which is not me, and 2) I've never heard it before, which means it's either very new or very niche, and it stands a good chance of being misunderstood.",queer
"If you're in America, LGBQ, 18+, and recently were in therapy/counseling, you can take this survey and enter a $50 AMAZON GIFT CARD raffle! ((www.facebook.com/lgbt.therapy.study or email lgbt.therapy.study@gmail.com for more info)) Please let me know if this post is unwelcome here! Thanks!",,queer
I just realized I'm queer,"As a kid I always went to the boys section at toy stores and felt bad about it, my clothing never confirmed a gender, sure I always shop at the ladies section, but the random shirts, jeans and skinnies are very gender neutral. 
I always used the term 'gay' instead of 'lesbian' to identify my sexual orientation, just because gay sounds so neutral to me.

The more I read about it, the more I identify with the term Queer. I dislike labels and conformations, I hate it when people say 'man up' 'you sound like a bitch' or that men aren't supposed to cry and females aren't supposed to be strong.",queer
Seeking Participants for Research Survey,"**Participant Recruitment Post** 

We are a research team of faculty and graduate students at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln and Texas Tech University, and we are conducting a study on the body image experiences of trans women (male-to-female; MTF) individuals. We encourage all individuals who would be included in the “male-to-female” umbrella to participate, regardless of specific gender identity and whether or not individuals have or have not begun, or desire to, undertake any aspects of gender transitioning. We hope that this study will contribute to the understanding of the health and well-being of trans individuals, and will help to promote future work including federally funded initiatives to benefit trans communities. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so we hope that you will take part in our online survey study.

In order to participate, you must: 
• Be 18 years of age or older 
• Identify as trans and be included in the MTF umbrella. We include in this umbrella individuals whose gender identities are non-binary and regardless of whether or not any aspects of transitioning have been undertaken or are desired to be undertaken in the future. 
• Reside in the United States

If you would like to participate in our study, you may click this link: https://ttupsych.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_6KbpNqr2DhCMIOp

Your responses are anonymous and your data will be removed from the server soon after you complete the study. Depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network. It is possible that they may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes or provide it to third parties. You may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link above into a new web page.

If you have any questions about this study, please feel free to contact us using the contact information listed below. A list of local and national resources will appear at the end of the survey for anyone interested in additional support. This research study has been approved by the Texas Tech University Institutional Review Board. You will be able to enter a drawing for a chance to win one of 15 $20 gift cards, in thanks for your participation. To enter, at the end of the survey you will be redirected to a new survey database where you will be able to enter an email address to be contacted should you be selected. 

Your email is stored separately from your survey responses and the two cannot be linked.

Please feel welcome to pass on this message to other individuals who might be interested in participating as well.

Thank you very much for your time!

Michael Parent, Ph.D. Texas Tech University Department of Psychological Sciences Email: michael.parent@ttu.edu

Elliot Tebbe, Ph.D. University of Nebraska – Lincoln Counseling Psychology, Department of Educational Psychology Email: etebbe2@unl.edu",queer
"Queer short film ""Arrival/Departure"" in development",,queer
The Exquisite Mirror,,queer
[OC] No Girls Allowed — Substance,,queer
"Minor Prophet - The F!#&amp; Nia Show Cleveland, Ohio LGBTQ...",,queer
"Interesting blogging at badblood. wordpress. com could consider the use of stigma as an excuse not to get tested today, now for HIV Human Immunodeficiency Virus including a variety of STIs Sexually Transmitted Infections.","Interesting blogging at https://badblood.wordpress.com/ could consider the use of stigma as an excuse not to get tested today, now for HIV Human Immunodeficiency Virus including a variety of STIs Sexually Transmitted Infections.",queer
Where is bi culture?,,queer
How to trigger everyone in 5 words.,,queer
"I want to learn. TW *If you are easily offended read it carefully, I will try to not offend anyone because that is not my intention do.*","Hi, I'm a 17-year-old white cis guy so I have no knowledge about this community sadly. And I want to change that, I want to learn as much as possible about you guys and maybe share this information to some of my friends to help them get a better understanding of the queer community(not sure if I'm supposed to write community sorry.). So Here are some questions that you may found ignorant or plain stupid but please try to understand that this is actual questions I would like to get answered so I get to understand more and help friends to understand as well or to explain to some random comment on youtube. 

Question number one (my question)
_______________________________________________________
Biological the ""female"" and ""male"" body are different and need different care in medical how are someone(a doctor) suppose to know what to give to a certain person? would it work with some sort of number system or how?
______________________________________________________

question number two (internet question)
______________________________________________________
Sorry for this one. This question was from a comment on a buzzfeed video.
What make you feel as neither of the gender?
If you grew up as a boy playing with dolls why aren't you a boy who likes dolls instead of confused or genderless? What if we removed labels so we only hade two genders but made them mean nothing.
I know that that would be hard but why not? (remember it will be hard for me to counter answer this question scenes I didn't question it).
_______________________________________________________

Question number three  (my question)
_______________________________________________________
Do you think toilets should be divided by genitalia or gender?
with toilets i mean more like bathrooms where there are urinal.
_______________________________________________________

Question number four ( internet question)
_______________________________________________________
straight copied from the comment. This comment got 28 likes in 12 minutes so it must be somethings people wonder. This comment is about rasing a child Non-Conforming. (https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=u2Zem9ILPbc)

What I don't understand is how forcing your child to not follow the ""norm"" of gender identity any different than forcing your child to be straight. You say there're more than 2 genders but how is it that forcing your child to be straight is wrong but anything else is ok? I don't want to sound rude but I just don't get it﻿
______________________________________________________

Thank you so much for reading this and hopefully, you managed to read my bad spelling and such. But hopefully, you can answer some of my questions and maybe some of the internets questions. 


Thank you so much and have a good day and a continued life of happiness. 

Love Otto ",queer
Hartford CT Community Holds Vigil for Orlando Shooting Victims,,queer
How Love Bailey's Savage Ranch Became a Queer Escape for the Digital Age,,queer
advice about being queer dating a cis boy?,"i'm a afab bisexual nonbinary demigirl, and my serious boyfriend is a cishet man. he's never made me feel bad about my gender, and we have a healthy, good relationship, but he's got a lot of subconcious cis crap going on. men who act 'flamboyantly' gay make him uncomfortable, etc, but he's never an asshole to them. the issue is that i've been kind of wanting to experiment with gender presentation and stuff, and that's suuuuper upsetting for him. i have big boobs and long hair and i present femininely almost all the time, but i mentioned getting a packer to him and he freaked out. does anyone have any advice about helping him understand this stuff or dealing with his discomfort?",queer
Plata LGBTQ Performance Nightclub - San Miguel De Allende's only dedicated performance space for the LGBTQ &amp; Allied Community,,queer
"Starting a queer radio show, care to help?","Hello, I'm Chloe. I'm a 33 year old pansexual woman who also just happens to be transgender. I'm trying to start a non profit radio show for queer people. (although for now it doesn't officially have that status until i can afford to do all the paperwork and stuff) I'm wanting to make it an international show for both america but with a focus on other nations too, giving them community in places where it may be dangerous to do so, taking advantage of SW radios radical christian missionary organizations pass out to places they visit. I feel we can offer information on asylumn, give a relatively safe form of community (radio listening can't be tracked), a requiem from the stress of being in such a situation, digital communications in the form of one way text and image transmissions, and of course include our own first world culture, fighting back against bigoted politics and radio stations by claiming our place on the airwaves. Radio is a powerful medium because it can not be tracked, filtered, or blocked. Once the signal starts as they say in the movie ""Serinity"" ""you can't stop the signal"" please have a look at my indiegogo. The transmitter cost for our first month is $200 dollars ($50 per show) american for a one hour show every week. With time we may get better rates even. I need at least a month worth of funding before I'll start this. I CAN make this happen, and I can make this a quality show. Here is the link to the indiegogo https://www.generosity.com/community-fundraising/queer-radio-international--2/x/10225256",queer
By Nathaniel M. Lewis. Urban encounters and sexual health among gay and bisexual immigrant men: perspectives from the settlement and aids service sectors,,queer
[Survey] Resilience Among Gay Men and Lesbians (Gay Men and Lesbians 18+ needed!),"Hello wonderful people,

First off, Happy International Day Against Homophobia and Transphobia!

My name is Nathan and my 4th year psychology research group are currently running a study that is looking at how hope and mindfulness can help in the reduction of suicidal thoughts and behaviours. We are currently looking for adults who identify as gay or lesbian to complete a quick survey which will take about 10 to 15 minutes.

Upon completion you can also go into the draw to win one of two $50 Myer gift vouchers if you live in australia (sorry international people!)

Click the link below for further information and to complete the survey.

Thank you for your response and interest in the study!

When results become available, I will be posting them here so you can all see the outcome!

https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/KVJQD32",queer
help completing survey on dating and sexual preferences,"Hi!

• I’m a graduate student conducting research on men who have sex with men (MSM)’s dating preferences

• I need your help in completing this survey

• The link to the survey is: http://uofmississippi.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_2tzwSDga7UwFBGZ

• The research question is: if different experiences and psychological characteristics affect gay or MSM men’s preferences for dating or sexual partners

• If you have any questions, feel free to send me a PM on Reddit or email at ybhambha@go.olemiss.edu

• Thank you! Have a good day!
",queer
Seeking 18+ HIV Negative Men for Research Study with PAID options!,"Hi, my name is Jessica Cunningham, I’m a research assistant at the University of Massachusetts Boston. Working in conjunction with gay, bisexual, and queer-affirmative researchers at UMASS and Suffolk University in Boston, MA, I am looking for sexual minority men to participate in a study investigating psychological strengths and sexual health.
If you identify as male, are over 18 years old, HIV-negative, identify with something other than heterosexual, and have experienced adversity in life, we would love to get the chance to interview you as part of this important research! Participants will be paid for their time and receive referrals to legal, mental health, or physical health services.
If interested, get started by taking the 20-min online screener, then sign up to be interviewed at: www.surveymonkey.com/s/MensHealthStudyPhase1 Participation in the study includes completing a 20-minute online screening to determine eligibility, and two anonymous interviews over Skype (using only audio, not video; interviews would be between 30-90 minutes long). All research has been approved by the human ethics committee (IRB) at Suffolk University.
Also, if you participated in this study over the summer or more recently, please don't participate again! If you have any questions please send me a PM or email me at MensHealthStudy@Suffolk.edu Thanks!",queer
"Hey all! EU queers, I need your opinion!","Hey beauties,

I'm French and currently working on a research project on the **perception by EU LGBT of their rights situation in their country**. 

Every year, [The Rainbow Index](http://www.ilga-europe.org/resources/rainbow-europe/2015) publishes a report which ranks each EU country based on their handling of LGBT rights and issues. I want to find out whether these results reflect reality. I would love it if you could help me do that.

If you live in **any European country** and you're interested in giving me a hand (hehe) for this project, here are questions you should answer (you can PM me your answers if you'd rather):

You can access the [survey here](https://www.surveymonkey.com/r/TNKPC8S)

* 1- How do you **perceive** the state of LGBT rights in your country? (Let me know how you feel on a daily basis at home and **where you are from**)

* 2- How do you **reach this perception**? (What means do you use: personal experiences, social media, news, organisations...)

* 3- Are you **familiar with** the Rainbow Index?

If there is anything else you'd like to add, please feel free to do so! 

I'm also available on Kik for a chat, find me on: JoWhte.

A million thanks and hoping to hear from all of you soon! Don't hesitate to ask questions.

*Ta*",queer
Queers of the Western Zombie Apocalypse,,queer
LAST CHANCE! Bay Area Clinical Care for Trans* Youth Study- Participate &amp; Share!,"The trans-led study is a joint needs- and services-assessment of gender-specialized care in the Bay Area for trans* and gender-creative youth.

The 5-15 minute anonymous online survey can be found here: https://smithcollege.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_ezCKU4B87en6cNn

Folks who are eligible: trans* adults (18+) who lived in the Bay Area at some point between ages 12-24; OR gender-specialist providers (MDs, MSWs, PhDs, etc.) working in the Bay Area currently.

Please consider participating, and share widely! The anonymous data you provide will help this research be a tool with which to share histories of need and transform them into legacies of care.",queer
Looking for a Bicycling Crew name for a queer bike meetup!,Any suggestions? ,queer
"SURVEY: Stigma Experienced by Transgender Individuals from Mental Health Providers (18+, Transgender, Live in US)",,queer
A new range of coffee with Tom of Finland erotic drawings,,queer
One of London's most fabulous cabaret duos Bourgoise &amp; Maurice,,queer
Be Sexual a new explicit movie from Antonio Da Silva,,queer
Anyone else crushing on Mandahla Rose from All About E?,,queer
Bay Area Clinical Care for Trans* Youth Study- Participate &amp; Share!,"The trans-led study is a joint needs- and services-assessment of gender-specialized care in the Bay Area for trans* and gender-creative youth. The 5-15 minute anonymous online survey can be found here: https://smithcollege.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_ezCKU4B87en6cNn

Folks who are eligible: trans* adults (18+) who lived in the Bay Area at some point between ages 12-24; OR gender-specialist providers (MDs, MSWs, PhDs, etc.) working in the Bay Area currently.

Please consider participating, and share widely! The anonymous data you provide will help this research be a tool with which to share histories of need and transform them into legacies of care.
",queer
Help us out with our survey? :),"We are Pace University undergraduate psychology students who are conducting a survey with members of the Lesbian, Gay, and Bisexual community focused on their experiences of having support in one’s community, home, and schools. We aim to examine how this support is associated with mental health, sexual identity outness, and eating habits. If you identify as lesbian gay, or bisexual, we would greatly appreciate your participation in our brief survey, which you can access with the following link:

http://pace.az1.qualtrics.com/jfe/form/SV_1N5GmOnv6rxSrkx
",queer
ive been feeling like i am both queer and a lesbian. i prefer women but ive started to see non binary femms as attractive as well. more of just a rant,,queer
[Repost] Sexual Minority Women's Health Research,"Participant Recruitment Post

We are a research team at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln and the University of Florida conducting a study about the life experiences of bisexual, lesbian, and queer women. We hope that with this study, we can contribute to the understanding of the experiences of sexual minority women. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so we hope that you will take part in our online survey study.

In order to participate, you must: 
• Be 18 years of age or older
• Identify as a woman and as lesbian, queer, bisexual, pansexual, gay, or any other sexual minority orientation. Anyone who identifies as sexual minority and as a woman (including trans* or gender nonconforming individuals) is invited to participate. 
• Reside in the United States

If you would like to participate in our study, you may click this link: https://unleducation.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_8v5FMx6tSgHDCdL

Your responses are anonymous and your data will be removed from the server soon after you complete the study. Depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network. It is possible that they may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes or provide it to third parties. You may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link above into a new web page.

If you have any questions about this study, please feel free to contact us using the contact information listed below. A list of local and national resources will appear at the end of the survey for anyone interested in additional support. This research study has been approved by the University of Nebraska-Lincoln Institutional Review Board (UNL IRB# 20151215698EP) as well as the University of Florida Institutional Review Board (UF IRB# 2012-U-0639)
Please feel free to pass on this message to other individuals who might be interested in participating as well.

Thank you very much in advance for your time!

Sexual Minority Women’s Health Research Team

Elliot Tebbe, Ph.D. 
University of Nebraska – Lincoln 
Counseling Psychology, 
Department of Educational Psychology 
Email: etebbe2@unl.edu

Bonnie Moradi, Ph.D. &amp; Alex Lenzen, M.S. 
University of Florida Counseling Psychology, 
Department of Psychology, 
Email: moradib@ufl.edu",queer
NEOCAMP X OSCAR OUK,,queer
"I just finished my first short film! It's 90 seconds, check it out. Tell me what you think!","https://youtu.be/VIUOP8s36io 
This is my first short film and my application film to Ryerson University. It could be a maximum of 90 seconds and had to be about perception. I'd like to hear what you think!
Link to Youtube: https://youtu.be/VIUOP8s36io",queer
"What are current rules?... for donating a) blood, b) bone marrow, c) corneas, d) organs, e) tissues from men who've had sex with another person of the same sex.",,queer
Texas House Candidate Using Grindr to Engage Voters,,queer
Guy asks 100 random guys for their number in London,,queer
"What ""qualifies"" you as being ""queer""?","I am married and for most of my life considered myself ""straight"". But as early as high school I had strange urges (wanting older men to mess with me) and I had a thing for Michelanglos ""David"" statue ( I liked it's dick....ALOT). But I enjoy sex with my wife and yet I also love gay porn and fantasize often about sucking cock. Does that make me ""queer""?",queer
Bisexual - Why it is so hard to accept yourself,,queer
Support LGBT Rights in Reddit's Model Parliament!,"Hello! I’m posting today to ask for just a quick moment of your time (and apologize for intruding on your subreddit, kind of).

Reddit’s Model House of Commons (a parliament simulation) has just begun voting in it’s 5th General Election and it’s open to anyone interested in voting (which is easy, fairly anonymous, and fast).

I’m asking for your vote for the Green Party, a massive supporter of LGBT rights in parliament. We’ve passed countless pieces of legislation on every aspect of LGBT rights and have the largest (to my immense enjoyment) LGBT party population in parliament (around 45%-50%). LGBT rights and social justice are always two of our largest pillars, on top of environmentalism (of course, which we’re huge on), and economics. 

I hope you take a brief moment of your time to help our subreddit continue to function, since we run off of the votes of the public. While it is just a simulation, this of course is very real and very enjoyable for all of us, and your time is a huge help. Every vote matters!

Please come and vote GREEN here: https://www.reddit.com/r/MHOC/comments/46xtgq/general_election_v_megathread/

Here’s also a full link to our manifesto if you’re interested: https://issuu.com/df44/docs/mhoc_greens_gev_manifesto_final

If you want to join our simulation and party, or have any questions, you can also PM me for help :)

Thank you so much for your time!",queer
queer and asexuality,"At times there are arguments that asexual people are not allowed to use the word queer because the word has never been used as a slur against them. Well, those arguments often come from people in the current generation. I am a 49 year old asexual male and I was called queer and gay through high school and college because I didn't want to date or have sex with women. That word has been used against me in my history. I even had gay people call me a repressed gay man. I got it from both sides. So don't tell me that asexual people can't reclaim that word. It's only been during this current generation asexuality is even been acknowledge as an orientation. Just remember when you make statements like that, you have absolutely no idea what someone other person has been through in their life. ",queer
"First Reddit post, Heyy all",,queer
Sexual Minority Women’s Health Research,"Participant Recruitment Post

We are a research team at the University of Nebraska-Lincoln and the University of Florida conducting a study about the life experiences of bisexual, lesbian, and queer women. We hope that with this study, we can contribute to the understanding of the experiences of sexual minority women. Your participation is essential to achieving this goal, so we hope that you will take part in our online survey study.

In order to participate, you must: 
• Be 18 years of age or older 
• Identify as a woman and as lesbian, queer, bisexual, pansexual, gay, or any other sexual minority orientation. Anyone who identifies as sexual minority and as a woman (including trans* or gender nonconforming individuals) is invited to participate. 
• Reside in the United States

If you would like to participate in our study, you may click this link: https://unleducation.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_8v5FMx6tSgHDCdL

Your responses are anonymous and your data will be removed from the server soon after you complete the study. Depending on your privacy settings, the Internet host you are using may track and save user actions. For example, social networking sites may record and maintain information about the sites and pages visited and links activated while within network. It is possible that they may use that information, linked to your identity, for marketing purposes or provide it to third parties. You may access the survey outside of a social networking site by cutting and pasting the link above into a new web page.

If you have any questions about this study, please feel free to contact us using the contact information listed below. A list of local and national resources will appear at the end of the survey for anyone interested in additional support. This research study has been approved by the University of Nebraska-Lincoln Institutional Review Board (UNL IRB# 20151215698EP) as well as the University of Florida Institutional Review Board (UF IRB# 2012-U-0639)

Please feel free to pass on this message to other individuals who might be interested in participating as well.

Thank you very much in advance for your time!

Sexual Minority Women’s Health Research Team

Elliot Tebbe, 
Ph.D. University of Nebraska – Lincoln 
Counseling Psychology, Department of Educational Psychology 
Email: etebbe2@unl.edu

Bonnie Moradi, Ph.D. &amp; Alex Lenzen, M.S. 
University of Florida 
Counseling Psychology, Department of Psychology, 
Email: moradib@ufl.edu
",queer
"Introducing r/bicommunity, a new subreddit for conversation, discussion, and, of course, community!","We built r/bicommunity in response to a interest over in r/bisexual in a more community-oriented subreddit for bi, pan, omni, poly, and queer redditors.

r/bicommunity is here for that. Conversation and community, for those of us who want to talk about more than just our crushes or crises.

We're not sure yet how the conversation will develop or what it'll look like, but we'll have regular weekly and monthly themed threads, beginning with a coming out thread, followed shortly after by a competition to design images for our header.

Stop by and check us out; we're looking forward to building a place where people make friends and get to know each other.",queer
LGBT Planet,"Hi, I just wanted to let everyone know about a new social, business and relationship community we are creating for the LGBT community. Here you will be able to participate in blogs, suggest articles, create groups , post events and use our relationship tools and so much more. We are about 90% complete but you are welcome to join and tell your friends about us. Please help our community grow by spreading the word about us. visit us at http://www.lgbtplanet.com

Thank you, Ken
",queer
White And Black girls for sEx here pJ_3_g5H6Tn,,queer
Trans Model Recreates #mycalvins Underwear Campaign,,queer
Love Songs for the Rest of Us: NO SHAME (music video),,queer
My bf and I have unleashed our inner drag queen through puppetry!,,queer
Not born this way – Other liberation movements have rejected the idea that biology is destiny. So why should gay rights depend on it?,,queer
Are you interested in collaborating on a queer writing project?,"I'm starting up a website geared towards the exploration of queer theory, personal experiences, and feminism. I started a popular newspaper (print) column in 2012, and am now converting it to a digitalized form. 

Right now I only have a couple articles up, but I really want disparate voices on the site. So, if you've ever had a story you've wanted to tell (anonymous or otherwise) please feel free to message me about it. 

Here's the blurb and format -
Message me to publish your work (500-2,000 words) on Cultural Kaleidoscope. CK is an independent, advertising-free publishing space for a wide range of radical, progressive, anti-racist, feminist, queer, anthropological, and sociological ideas, stories, and testimonials. We are inclusive, and welcome submissions.

We're also looking for graphic artists who would like to see their work published on CK. The stories and images should be personal in nature, and if you have a different medium you work with - I would absolutely love to hear about it. 

Right now, the site is brand new, and there is no pay. I'm hoping to find individuals who find passion in writing, and are looking for a quality platform to express themselves. Thanks for reading!

Here's the link to the site,
http://cultural-kaleidoscope.com/about/",queer
If Humans used Animal Mating Rituals,,queer
How would queer men advocate for the bone marrow registry?,,queer
/r/IAmA tomorrow at 12pm ET: demystifying HIV,"Tuesday is World AIDS Day, and one of the biggest challenges facing the fight against the HIV epidemic today is combatting discrimination and stigma fueled by public ignorance. Swing over to [/r/IAmA](https://www.reddit.com/r/IAmA/) tomorrow at 12pm ET, as Founder and Executive Director of The Center for HIV Law and Policy, Catherine Hanssens, Esq., answers questions about the legal and medical realities of HIV. And make sure to tell your friends!",queer
Genderqueer/nonconforming people: How do you deal with people asking stupidly invasive questions about your identity?,"Stupid shit like ""when are you REEAAALLLYYY going to begin your transition?"" Or ""so do you feel female some days when you wake up and male other days?"" Or even worse, ""are you just afraid to have the surgery?"" (when I a. am not even considering it, b. know it's not just ""a surgery"" - it's many surgeries) It was annoying and bearable at first, but now it's hitting a point where I want to yell at the next person that asks me something along those lines again.",queer
Three Fashion Films Centered on Queer Identities by BULLETT Magazine,"BULLETT Presents: Triptych, Featuring Exquisite &amp; Queen Sateen: http://bullettmedia.com/article/bullett-presents-triptych-featuring-exquisite-queen-sateen/

BULLETT Presents: Triptych, Featuring Sussi Suss: http://bullettmedia.com/article/bullett-presents-triptych-featuring-sussi-suss/

BULLET Presents: Triptych, Featuring IMMA/MESS: http://bullettmedia.com/article/bullett-presents-triptych-featuring-immamess/

",queer
Share your funny situations! Thanks!,"Hi there! It's me again....trying it in a different way...
So! I am working on a project for a funny ad! Would be cool if you could tell me sme short funny stories that might be suitful for an ad/spot!
Thanks!!!",queer
How to include a gay couple in an ad?,"Hi there!its me again!
 Me and my project team would like to create an ad for a body care brand. We want the brand to set a statement for tolerance regarding sexuality and gender. Thats why we thoght of a starter by showing a gay couple in an ad. But how do you think we can incrporate a funny situation the the gays withot stressing the whole point too much. It has so seam funny yet normal....thank you so much!
",queer
How to prove you are born this way,,queer
Center for a Stateless Society » Queer Liberation and Jury Nullification,,queer
MY PRIVATE GO-GO - Film von Cory Krueckeberg - USA 2013,,queer
How to get more feminine?,"So I'm thinking I'm gender neutral but I have a very male body that I'm not full comfortable in. Does anyone have any pointers on how to get more feminine legs and a thinner rib cage? Cause my legs are just naturally muscly and I feel my chest is just way to ""manly"" ",queer
We're just baes. I'm queer but he's straight.,"Last night after reading an article on LGBT Nation “College guy realizes his best friend might be his boyfriend…” got me thinking about the current relationship I’m in.  In the same way that this article details a reddit user’s friendship, that might be more than a friendship, I came to the realization that the friendship I have with Tommy is the same one but there’s one big difference. I identify as a queer man and he’s a straight man. The complexities of our relationship has made many of our friends question our sexualities, but more specifically his. It seems that being in a platonic nonsexual relationship with a queer man disrupts patriarchy and other peoples’ masculinities seem to feel threatened. First let me tell y’all how I met Tommy. 

Before joining the Salsa team I am a part of I decided to attend one of the social dance nights hosted by the same team. It was there that I met Tommy. As someone who grew up learning to lead, a role predominantly assigned to cis men, I have been continued to only know how to lead. As a queer body I wanted to challenge that notion and take on the role of a follow, a role predominantly assigned to cis women—asking male leads to lead me as a male follow is a whole different conversation for another post, that brings me to Tommy.

As soon as the dancing started I was immediately captivated by the way tommy danced, right away I knew that I was going to dance with this person before the night was over. After working through the right pitch to have him agree to lead I went up to Tommy and asked him if he would be comfortable leading me. He agreed and I immediately fell in love with the movement. I learned a different side of Latin Social Dance that I was never exposed to due to the fact that it was not acceptable for me as a cis male to follow but as a queer identifying male I was ready to challenge that. After dancing with a couple of other male leads I went back up to Tommy and asked him to lead one more song. He seemed a bit hesitant the second time around so I figured I was probably making him uncomfortable and in my mind I labeled him as a jerk. 

He didn’t wait long to prove me wrong. Once I auditioned and joined the team it was time to learn our partner choreography where I decided to dance the follow role as a way to challenge all of the other cis men on the team. We were asked to find partners relatively close to our height so my immediate reaction was to go for the taller men in the team. Since Tommy was standing next to me I turned to him and said “you’re gonna be my partner” to which he agreed.

Fast Forward to today: Tommy is my best friend. I am the “girlfriend he flirts with, but doesn’t sleep with.” When we go to rehearsal we’re always taking snapchats of each other and posting them on our respective stories. I always call him bae and he calls me boo. We text every day from sunrise to sunset, he is always the first “good morning” and the last “good night” I send. I have met his family and have spent time with his friends and he has met mine. We hold each other accountable and help each other be a better version of ourselves. We have talked about our relationship and the way that it functions and we both came to the conclusion that it feels like we’re dating. 

This is where it gets complicated. Because I am queer all of my friends believe that so is Tommy. And I always have to say “No, he’s not.” Maybe in the beginning of our friendship I fancied the idea but after the development of our relationship I realized that I would never pressure him into being sexual with me at all. I would never jeopardize the beautiful relationship I have with this person all for some instant gratification that can be found with other queer folk. Tommy is just bae, we function as a relationship that isn’t sexual and that is fine. The fact that a straight male is loving a queer male this much is political and it’s helping redefine masculinities. At the end of the day Tommy is my friend, my partner, my homie, my vato, my person. In any vernacular there is always a word for him. 

At the end of the day this type of love is radical. Being loved by a straight cis Latino male the way that Tommy loves me is only a reflection of my community loving me. In a culture where machismo and homophobia are so predominant the relationship I have with Tommy is a way of dismantling those exact systems that have seemed to oppress my queer identity. You know what sometimes your soulmate isn’t romantic.  ",queer
Survey: Healthy Eating in the LGBT Community and Others,"Greetings,
	You are invited to participate in a research study of healthy eating behaviors in the LGBTQ community and others. The purpose of this study is to examine healthy eating behaviors and related issues.
If you agree to be in the study, you will do the following things:
 
	You will complete a one-time online survey on a computer and time of your own choosing. The survey includes requests for information (ex.""With which gender do you identify?"", ""What is your sexual orientation?"", ""Do you consider yourself a vegan?"", ""Are you currently pregnant?"", etc.), as well as two questionnaires about eating habits and feelings towards eating (ex. ""When eating, I pay attention to the calories in my food"", ""I believe some foods are pure and some foods are impure"", ""I think some foods are healthier than other foods"", etc.), and questions pertaining to career and social pressures (ex. ""My career path motivates me to eat healthy foods and take care of myself"") . The survey should take you 15 minutes to complete. The online link will be active until December 13, 2015.

	The study is being conducted by Christian French, a senior at Indiana University Southeast, as a part of his Seminar in Psychology course.

	A link to the online survey is provided below, if you wish to participate.

Survey link:
	https://newqtrial2015az1.az1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_9SvsN4lkgq7S1wh

Thanks, and all the best,
IU_CRFrench
",queer
My sister did a queer parody of 'Jessie's Girl'. It's pretty funny!,,queer
"Queer Female Rock Musician on Danger, Sex and Gender on the Road",,queer
What is Queer?,"Is queer more of a term used for gender, or for sexuality? I have seen it used more and more lately and am always unclear on whether it's exclusively for trans people, or if lgb people can use it too.",queer
Is this even a thing?,"Ok so I've been recongising some changes lately in myself that leads me to believe that my gender isn't quiet what I thought but I don't know what to call it. 

So a little info I am a gay male, and I enjoy being a male with he/him pronouns etc but I've all ways had a problem having the male plumbing, I'm just not a fan.

I just wanted to know if anyone else has this issue, or knows of existence? Is it even a thing? Andrew can I sort of make myself more comfortable with the down stairs situation?",queer
Have you heard of any of these 'queer' bands?,,queer
Why Equality Is Toxic to the Transgender Movement,,queer
Best Queer movies,"I'm new. I want to know the best queer movies (Latin queer movies preferentially). 
I want to watch them with my best (straigt) friend, I always watch with him movies about love and friendship but in a straigthly way. 
I hope this is not offensive or break the rules. ",queer
Filming a documentary on Queer sexuality aaannd...,"I have a few questions. 


1) What would you like to see in a Queer focused documentary? (I've done some research and it seems there aren't any specific docs on queer sexuality.) 


2.) What kind of issues/subject matter would you like addressed in terms of your sexuality or life as a queer individual? 


3.) What kind of questions would you find more difficult/controversial to answer? Maybe you're afraid of how other people in the community would perceive you etc.. 


The documentary I'm filming will be focused on the queer community here in Boston, and I'm in the pre-production phase at the moment. I'm looking for ideas. I already have a good amount of queer individuals interested in telling their stories, but I'm looking to also focus on asking the hard questions. The aim is to showcase the community from an unbiased POV but to also illuminate the general public on the evolutionary state sexuality has arrived to (there's still a lot of people who don't even know what 'Queer' means). 


Any thoughts or ideas would be immensely appreciated. Thank you for your time! ",queer
this gay guy is live tweeting his dates,,queer
Casting call for documentary on rape culture,"Award-winning documentary filmmakers looking to talk with people who want to share their stories of rape and abuse survival. The project hopes to help dismantle rape culture and the stigma associated with sexual assault. The film will be produced by sexual assault survivors who hope to amplify meaningful conversations about consent, safe spaces, and life after traumatic experiences.
Please email consentcasting@gmail.com if you would like to speak with us potentially on camera or anonymously.",queer
"There's this book called ""Faithful to the Truth: How to be an Orthodox Gay Catholic"" by Stephen Lovatt. It defends SSM from a traditionalist Catholic perspective.",,queer
The Feds' RentBoy Raid Is an Attack on LGBTs and Sex Workers,,queer
Casting call for documentary on rape culture,"Award-winning documentary filmmakers looking to talk with people who want to share their stories of rape and abuse survival. The project hopes to help dismantle rape culture and the stigma associated with sexual assault. The film will be produced by sexual assault survivors who hope to amplify meaningful conversations about consent, safe spaces, and life after traumatic experiences. 

Please email consentcasting@gmail.com if you would like to speak with us potentially on camera or anonymously. 
",queer
Survey on LGBTQ domestic violence. Please Respond if you meet the criteria.,"I'm working on my thesis this summer and I'm trying to get more responses. It's on LGBTQ survivors of domestic violence and their experiences with seeking help from different sources (family, the legal systems, domestic violence organizations, etc.). Please only answer if you meet the survey criteria: are currently over 18, identify as LGBTQ (please note that this includes anyone who currently identifies as LGBTQ, no matter the gender of your partner or if you did not identify as LGBTQ at that time), have been in a violent intimate partner relationship, and live in the US and sought help in the US. If you know any groups or individuals that might be able to answer my survey, please share it with them. Thank you for your help and participation! https://docs.google.com/forms/d/1vbXdCHPet_rKuwefQmbBGubD2r4B4i-an72Xx7nCX2Q/viewform",queer
Just Need Someone to Talk To,"I had an extremely emotionally abusive roommate. Possibly assaulted me as well, but I had been in the ER the day before for heart problems and was heavily sedated, so I don't really remember. Maybe she was just too touchy in trying to take care of me.

The thing is, I consider myself a bisexual woman, and so did she. We started out really good friends, but she was very needy, so I asked for space. She became extremely jealous and hostile after this interaction, supposedly because I was dating and sleeping with multiple men. I was accused of using women and not actually being interested in them. She would subtly insult my intelligence, looks, ambitions. When it didn't work I was torn apart for being arrogant. Eventually, she screamed at me for hours while I was studying for a final -- not letting me leave our dorm until I was sobbing and threatening to kill myself.

And, even with no evidence, I think she may have assaulted me because since the night where something maybe-sexual might have occurred (the sedatives messed with my memory) I literally can vomit when thinking about the female body sexually. I can't date or flirt with queer girls anymore because I just end up crying without knowing why. I feel like she stole my queer identity.

I am worried I'm becoming homophobic as I am instantly terrified of any butch presenting woman I meet.

No one I have told believes me because she is gender queer and extremely vocal in activist circles. As wonderful as the queer community can be it sometimes protects its own in questionable situations.

I can't talk to anyone about this. I am starting to hate queer women based on one trauma. Please someone tell me how to fix this. I have been debating suicide at times for months even with the help of my lovely boyfriend.",queer
Am I queer? Thoughts?,"So I went on a study abroad program this semester with 25 other people and I realized pretty quickly that there were a lot of LGBT people in the group. I interacted with them and it gave me some motivation to examine myself, and I realize one thing: I might be queer. 

For years, I've strictly identified as a normal heterosexual guy and I still consider myself mostly heterosexual, but I notice that I could also consider myself queer. Sometimes I feel attracted to other men, and I'd say thats about 10% of the time. I've been turned on a couple of times by men, but most of the time I've been turned on by other women. But what really convinced me was that I have a lot of fantasies about being a woman, if only temporarily. I'm attracted to women being carried by men, thats def a fetish of mine. But sometimes I like to roleplay being the woman and then go from there. And I've played female characters in video games and other simulations mostly for the sexual experience.

I feel that in this complicated way, I am a queer. But Im not sure if I can since in my romantic and sexual life, Im still mostly heterosexual. What are your thoughts on this?",queer
Study on LGBTQ/domestic violence,"Hey everyone, I am an undergraduate sociology student at the University of Louisiana collecting data for my honors thesis on LGBTQ domestic violence and individuals' experiences with seeking help (in the United States) as a result of that violent relationship.
Please only respond to the survey if you are over 18, identify as LGBTQ, have been in a violent intimate partner relationship, and live in the US and sought help (from friends or family to legal and other support) in the US. Thank you for your help and participation. Each response helps me to gather more accurate data for my thesis and will hopefully gain a better understanding of this pressing issue.
I will post a copy of my thesis once it is published. If there are any questions or concerns please feel free to contact me via message or through the comments, or you can contact my thesis director. Thank you so much everyone!
Here is a link to the study, please make sure you meet the criteria: https://docs.google.com/forms/d/1vbXdCHPet_rKuwefQmbBGubD2r4B4i-an72Xx7nCX2Q/viewform",queer
"Can straight people use the term ""Queer""?","If so, why is it different than other reclaimed words (slut, bitch, or racial slurs)?",queer
PARTICIPANTS NEEDED!,"Hi there,

You are invited to participate in an on-line study that investigates the relationship between aspects of social support, family acceptance and resilience in the LGBTQI community. Social support has consistently been identified as a predictor of resilience in people, however the specific aspects of social support that enable people to achieve resilient outcomes in the face of trauma, stress or adversity are still being understood. The aim of the present study is to explore how aspects of your social supports and family acceptance affect your level of resilience. If you are over 18 years of age and self-identify as LGBTQI, then you are eligible to participate in this research.

If you would like further information regarding this study, please contact the supervisor of the study, Professor John Reece (email: john.reece@acap.edu.au).

This research has received full approval from the Human Research Ethics Committee at the Australian College of Applied Psychology.

Survey link: https://jfe.qualtrics.com/form/SV_77ivky0qGiUSccJ

With thanks,

Miss Eden Campbell 229889@my.acap.edu.au

Professor John Reece john.reece@acap.edu.au
",queer
I really need some kind help right now.,"These are a bunch of thoughts, I can't get them straight and I just need to talk to someone because I'm going through a pretty rough time right now. 

I just want to stay home and cry. I feel I don't really have anyone else to talk to. And I'm sorry I don't have all these thoughts straight but I just can't just keep holding on to this. 

It's pride weekend here in Vancouver BC. Friday at lunch I met a guy my wife of 12 years dated a few times. He doesn't feel right to me. She gets to make her own decisions. I think he doesn't know what he wants and I am suspicious of his intentions (or lack thereof). My first pride parade 4 years ago, I had been out of a religious cult for about a year. It hit me really hard and and 4 years later I'm still reeling. I learned there is such a thing as non-monogamy and I brought it up to my wife. It was a revolution in my head. She took it hard but ultimately knew it was right. We love each other. I know alot of people say that but I mean it when I say it. She's bisexual and has said many times that she is so lucky that I'm super supportive.

I went shopping for a dress  Friday and found one but not the one I had envisioned. I'm not gay, I may be bi-situational. I'm not a ""cross-dresser"". For me it's not a kink, I just have a vision in my mind of a dude in a dress wearing jack boots and big huge red sunglasses. Being a musician I'm imagining this for a show but my dream of playing mid-size stages isn't true yet so I figure I'll do it for pride because that's allowed right? And people will get it and accept me right? My wife didn't get it and it made me feel gross (though she was very helpful in helping me shop for the dress). I started feeling shame at her reaction to my idea. I'm so hurt! I've been pushing myself so much! Challenging myself at every turn and it just feels like I still have no support network. I've gone to polyamorous meetups, the discussion kind and the just hang out kind and I just don't feel I fit in. I feel so alone. I wish I would get recognized but I feel rejected. I'd like friends who would be allies and support me and be on my side as I try so hard to sort this out but I've been having to do all of this alone and my heart hurts. All I can think to do right now is cry. 

My wife was getting pretty anxious that pride would not work out well and that we'd miss the good parties but I felt worried that I wouldn't fit in. So I researched and found a party that advertises as ""pride is for everyone"" bi, gay, trans, queer, *cis*. I felt there was hope but then I started thinking about actually going and not knowing what to wear, feeling gross about wearing a dress like I wanted feeling dishonest if I wore anything else and I just couldn't go. And now this whole thing just hurts. I need kindness, I need allies. How do I do this? I'm just trying to be myself and hoping someone will recognize me. Fuck, I'm not getting any younger here (37 years old). I don't want to miss the boat and be left behind while the rest of the world has fun and finds community. 

My parents don't love me unless I'm in the same religion as them. Fuck them, I hate them so much! How dare they love me conditionally. They are cruel. I don't know how or where to find love except on the stage playing my music. I want to go to a queer support group but what do I say? I need support for being a probably straight white guy who doesn't know the next step? Is that ok? There's folks out there who are actually gay, or trans and going through hardcore rough times. They need help. And I don't even know what's happening with me? I don't know what the label is. People with a label (queer, trans, gay), they've gone through a lot to wear that label with pride. And reasonably so, they're a little territorial. But I don't how to get in and get support. I can't go to a gay or bi support group because that's not appropriate.  Polly support groups don't seem to have welcomed me. I have an intense face and demeanour, lots of charisma and am attractive, I've learned that people assume that means I'm tough and that I have everything figured out and that it all comes easy to me. I feel rejected and hurt.

I can't expect my wife to support me the way I'd like, she's going through her own tough things right now and she deserves to explore unhindered. I can't expect her to know what I need from her if I don't even know myself. 

I'm sorry for the info dump. I just need to start a conversation with someone about this from a safe distance. Because I don't feel safe anywhere else right now.

If a kind person out there reads this and it resonates or you have it in you to send me a kind message, I'd really appreciate it because I really need some help right now.

I'm going to see the parade now after a good hard cry. It's gonna be tough, because I don't feel very celebratory. Like last year, it's gonna be tough to see others celebrating and being joyful. Because I'd like to be there too. I too would like to know who I am and celebrate it despite everything. I too would like to feel ok having the kind of sex I like and with the people I like. But I can't just hide from everything so I'm facing it anyway. It may not seem like much to some, after all, it's just a parade. But it's difficult for me and I have to go without any friends. Just a straight middle aged white guy in a crowd right? Nothing special going on right? He probably has a decent job and a happy marriage right? Just a regular old monogamous happy man.

This is just so tough right now.",queer
Has anyone ever made fun of you for identifying as queer?,So right now if people ask I tell them that I'm bi. And bi is pretty close to how I feel but something about queer just feels right. It seems to fit perfectly where as bi has always felt just slightly out of place. Do you ever feel awkward explaining your label to people? Has anyone ever accused you of just making it up? ,queer
Guy asks 100 men for their number on the street,,queer
Queer Atlanta Stages High School Do Over,,queer
"r/AllWomen is a new subreddit about intersectionality in feminism, including empowerment of LGBT+ ladies.","Hi r/queer! I am a bisexual girl who just recently started a subreddit called r/AllWomen, which as the title says, is about encouraging and studying intersectionality in feminism. 

This includes women in the LGBTQPIA+ community, so if any of you are interested, we'd love to expand our small community. Thanks for reading!

(This thread has been approved by a mod at r/queer.)",queer
Confused about separate subs...,"Fairly new here, enjoying this sub. Just wondering why not combine with r/LGBT under r/LGBTQ?

PS- asking the same question over at r/LGBT.",queer
Go to Russia for IVF,"Hello everyone. 
I have a question for those of you who have ever thought of having a kid. Would you go to Russia for IVF? The cost is much more affordable there. And if u knew a local lesbian couple who did a reciprocal IVF and now have a kid and would guide you there.",queer
I'm getting romantically involved with a girl for the first time and I don't have anyone to talk to.,"I would define my sexuality as 'fluid' : all my past sexual experiences and SO's have been male, but I have had a grand total of 3 crushes on girls (the current girl being the third).

I am definitely attracted to more masculine types and the girls I've had crushes on in the past have never came to fruition due to me being terrified and unsure of their sexuality and my own definition of my sexuality. 

I met Anna* through work and one night, as a group, we went out to a drag show and afterwards we danced. Anna &amp; I danced together and there was a moment on the dance floor where we looked at each other and didn't stop looking and I felt something, but quickly broke eye contact and shook it off as nothing.

Anna &amp; I texted the next day and it came around to her confessing to me that she is incredibly attracted to me. This was about a month ago and we're seeing each other casually and taking things slowly because she knows I have no previous experience with females and want to go slowly.

Basically, I feel isolated because I have no one outside of Anna to talk about Anna and talk about what I'm going through, emotionally and mentally with this budding relationship.

I talked to another coworker I am close to and basically, she was shocked that Anna has a crush on me and then said, ""I could never do that. I could never be with a girl."" I just felt hurt and confused and haven't reached out to her to talk about Anna since then.

I don't know whether anyone will respond to this or not, but I just want to talk to someone about this because I don't have anyone to talk to that understands what I might be feeling or going through. 
",queer
One fragment of Belgrade queer youth,,queer
Making money with a queer appearance.,"I'd like to start this by saying that I am sex worker positive, but I've had a lot of friends who have felt pressured into sex work because the job market can be harsh for appearances that dont conform to a hetero normative society. So I started a mission to see how much I could make through passive earning. I have a Fiverr where I personalize what I've learned to individuals, but it's something I want to offer to the  queer community for free. Before I compile all that info, is anyone interested? ",queer
A photo project exploring narratives of love and affection vs hate and violence in graffiti and public spaces,,queer
Gender Nihilism: An Anti-Manifesto by genderkills,,queer
Interviews and event highlights from the Korea Queer Culture Festival [ex-post from LGBT],,queer
What to term individuals who are sexually attracted to couples?,"Is there a label to describe people who are sexually aroused, not necessarily to any specific individual in a committed relationship (hetero-normal or otherwise), but instead to the couple in-itself? I think it seems like voyeurism superficially, but then the person is actually romantically attracted to both parties, who may not reciprocate the attraction in the same way. Or is this actually too specific, or niche a queer to label?

For illustration, for anyone who has been watching Sense8, the character of Daniela comes to mind.",queer
Research team needs your help to better understand how love and connections of all kinds affect health,"I am part of a research team at The City University of New York. We are passionate about the physical and emotional well-being of people across the entire spectrum of human sexual and gender identity. We'd love your help! Complete this 30-minute confidential survey if you:

* Are between the ages of 18 and 65
* Currently Live in the United States or U.S. Territories
* Identify as lesbian/gay, straight, bisexual, asexual, or otherwise

You will be helping us to expand the state of scientific knowledge about the diversity of human relationships and the impact of these connections on health and well-being!

Some participants will receive gift cards of up to $100 for participating in the study, as a thank you.

Click here to begin: http://hal.ccnysites.cuny.edu/

This research has been approved by the Institutional Review Board of The City University of New York. The primary investigator is Margaret Rosario, PhD. You can contact the research team at healthandlovestudy [at] gmail [dot] com.",queer
are there any other self identified queer anarchist here ?,,queer
The ‘right to marry’ is the most boring fucking thing in the universe…,,queer
Elephant Journal Article: I am Straight Woman Who Fell in Love with a Transgender Woman,,queer
Michel Martin. A ‘Queer’ Argument Against Marriage,,queer
The Secret History of Gay Marriage,,queer
Re-Queering Pride,,queer
Study on LGBTQ/domestic violence is in need of more participants,"Hey everyone, I am an undergraduate sociology student at the University of Louisiana collecting data for my honors thesis on LGBTQ domestic violence and individuals' experiences with seeking help (in the United States) as a result of that violent relationship. 

Please only respond to the survey if you are **over 18**, identify as **LGBTQ**, have been **in a violent intimate partner relationship**, and **live in the US and sought help** (from friends or family to legal and other support) in the US.  Thank you for your help and participation.  Each response helps me to gather more accurate data for my thesis and will hopefully gain a better understanding of this pressing issue. 

*I will post a copy of my thesis once it is published.* If there are any questions or concerns please feel free to contact me via message or through the comments, or you can contact my thesis director. Thank you so much everyone!

**Here is a link to the study, please make sure you meet the criteria:**
**https://docs.google.com/forms/d/1vbXdCHPet_rKuwefQmbBGubD2r4B4i-an72Xx7nCX2Q/viewform**
",queer
Is ok for non gay to use the word queer to refer to gay people?,I hear it occasionally and thought it was a taboo word. Then I realize that its mostly gays that use the word. So is it like when blacks use the n word? Only gays can use the q word?,queer
HELP IM A LONELY LOST QUEER,"I got out of an abusive relationship came out as trans and just graduated college. All of my social scenes have been turned upside down and i just dont feel comfortable around a ton of heteronormative people because they often make transphobic or homophobic jokes and think somehow its 1funny, and 2ok which oppression is not fucking funny especially stated from an uppermiddle class white heteronormative mouth (fuck you).  Any way long story short Im a bitter queer looking for queer friends in the tacoma area.  I cant create a #tacomaqueer subreddit for a month so I would really appreciate anyone who is queer in the area commenting and helping me meet people in our community.  I need solidarity in my friendships.",queer
calling your self queer,to me personaly i feel like queer is a better term to used  then just lesbian  bi gay  how do others feel about this ,queer
"Introducing a new subreddit, QueerKikPals!","Hello all!  As a queer person who likes to chat with internet strangers, I've been frustrated recently trying to carve out a queer space to talk to people.  I am a big kik user (it's a mobile app for instant messaging), but places like /r/kikpals narrow queer identities to a single tag, ""trans.""  Though a useful umbrella term, tagging a post ""trans"" will fill your inbox with both questions about genitals and people who want to objectify your body.

Enter /r/QueerKikPals: it's a private subreddit for non-cis redditors to find platonic and/or dirty chat friends.  We are a new subreddit trying to gather users and moderators, so please consider [sending a message to the moderation team](http://www.reddit.com/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FQueerKikPals) with a brief description of your queer identity to be added to the list of approved submitters.  Thanks everyone!",queer
No idea where to post this...I don't feel feminine!,"I'm a biological girl and also identify as a girl, but I feel as if my body is very masculine. I'm tall, broad shoulders, small boobs, large nose, small lips, short hair (I'm working on the hair thing). What are some things I can do to feel more feminine? I already wear tight fitting clothes and makeup. Is this even part of the queer/genderqueer category? Please direct me to a different sub if this isn't the right one.",queer
Help with identifying myself?,"Hi r/queer,

I've been quietly questioning my gender for a long time, and I'm of course planning to do some formal research, but I wanted to ask some nice redditors their opinions and/or advice as well.

I was born a girl, I like to do my hair and makeup pretty and wear 'girly' things, and I definitely take on the brunt of the domestic work around the house, which I love, but have also been brought up to consider those activities and behaviors pretty sharply feminine. But I'm not sure to what degree those traits can be said to determine my gender. All of my friends from preschool through adulthood have been male because I'm infinitely more comfortable around them than I am with females, although I've definitely warmed up and become less anxious around women in my late 20s. Even as a kid, I never felt like I could identify with most things girls talked about or were into (except boys). Now, on official forms, I generally 'decline to state' my gender when the option is available, and something has just always felt a bit off about checking the 'F' box. When reading over the recent additions to gender choices available on facebook, the definition for 'bigender' felt most right. 

Now, I guess my question is - is that enough to be considered queer or non-binary by the LGBT community? I feel like if I actually edited my profile to bigender or something else, that I'd get a slew of confused comments from friends or strangers who only view me as hyper-feminine. Also, the last thing I would want to do is insert myself ignorantly into a category whose members don't feel I belong. However, I sort of feel like I have the final say so as to what or who I am. What do you guys think? Thanks so much :)",queer
"""Kapeng Barako"", A Filipino Indie Pink Film about how a coffee shop owner tries to save his coffee shop from being mortgaged.",,queer
need advice: found nudes on boyfriends comp,"So I was using my boyfriends comp last night and I had to send a photo attachment. When I went to the folder to select, I saw a bunch of dick and ass pics he had taken last summer -- when we were together -- but these pictures were never sent to me.
This normally wouldn't be concerning, but my boyfriend and I have never exchanged nudes the entire 2 years we have been dating. He's really modest, and sometimes even hesistant about changing in front of me.
I love and trust him completely -- and there's nothing that's happened that has suggested he has sent stuff to someone else -- but this just seemed so dramatically out of character both for him and our relationship that I feel strange. I know him so well and it was very surprising for me to see these photos of his boner, etc, when he is very conservative about that kind of stuff. Like, why would he take these extremely sexual photos, just for himself? That wouldn't be like him.
I don't want to say anything to him because those photos are his private property, but it's eating away at me and I don't know what to do. Should I just try my hardest to forget I saw these, and let it go&gt;",queer
"Survey on Bi Women's Experiences of Discrimination and Distress, please help out","Bisexual Women's Experiences of Discrimination and Distress. Laurel Watson, an assistant professor of counseling psychology at the University of Missouri, Kansas City is currently conducting a study regarding bisexual women’s experiences of discrimination and distress. In order to participate, you must a) identify as a bisexual women, b) be 18 years of age or older, c) live in the United States, and d) be able to read the English language. If you are interested in participating, you will be asked to complete an anonymous online survey that will take approximately 30 to 45 minutes, one time only. If you are interested in participating, please click on the following link: https://www.surveymonkey.com/s/bisexualwomen Or, if you would like further information, please email Laurel Watson at watsonlb@umkc.edu For your participation, you may choose to enter a raffle to win one of six $25.00 Amazon.com gift cards. This study, protocol number 15-025, has been approved by University of Missouri, Kansas City's Institutional Review Board. If you have any concerns about your rights as a participant your concerns please call 816-235-5927",queer
In Massachusetts how would you setup a Cambridge Queer Community Center!?...,,queer
figuring shit out/advice please!,"Hi all, I'm posting this to a few different sub-reddits because I really could use some advice..
I'll try not to keep this too long. I am a cis queer(ish) woman who is 21. I say queer(ish) because I'm still figuring stuff out. For most of my life I identified as hetero....up until about 6.5 months ago when I realized I had this really really intense crush on a classmate who is non-male identified. This totally changed my perspective on my sexuality...its been such a roller-coaster for me. I'm beginning to identify less as straight and more as queer. I'm realizing that I am finding myself more and more attracted to women and gender non-conforming folks. I've told lots of friends and even tried to talk to my parents about it (something which I regret because I was not ready at all)...but I still am not publicity identifying as queer, to me it just still seems kind of scary...and I have been struggling with internalized homophobia...also, I still have feelings for my classmate who started me questioning. I told them about my feelings for them a few months ago, but they don't feel the same way. There has been other drama(ish) stuff that happened between us, that just makes things even more complicated. I feel heartbroken whenever I think about them. My queerness seems so related to them....that coming into my queerness seems really fucking painful, because queer romantic/sexual feelings in my mind are still related to them....I'm also beginning to develop a crush on a queer/gender non conforming friend of mine...and fuck....I'm scared because they are in a monogamous relationship...and the last thing i need is queerness being associated with more heartbreak/pain. Part of me wants to say ""Okay, I'm queer"" but there is another part of me holding back....and I really want to break through that...but part of me doubts that I'm queer, even though deep down I know I'm most likely not straight....I don't know why I question this. (my family/friends are very very accepting of lgbtq+ folks)

Sorry for this long rambling post, but I guess I want to know that I'm not alone...I'd also like advice from people who've been in my shoes before.

Any advice that you could give I would really appreciate, thanks so much :)
",queer
NEW SKETCH COMEDY WEB SERIES W. REAL QUEER CHARACTERS - DOWNWARD MOBILITY,,queer
My qwoc family are in need of some help,"Hi all, My partner and I have recently got back on our feet after being homeless, we now both have stable jobs and are back in school so we can eventually have careers and were working on our credit so we could get the stable housing we've always wanted. We bought a used car because having two jobs and class in a town with a horrible public transportation system isn't plausible without one and of course, things never go smoothly, our down payment check bounced, we weren't aware of this until a week ago (after having the car for a month and making our first payment and insurance payment) we received a beautiful certified letter in the mail in Monday letting us know that we are being sued for 3550$ and if we don't come up with the money by the last week of May they are pressing criminal charges on the base that it's considered check fraud (even though there was no intentions) being that we both don't make enough combined to pay then within the time constraints we are trying to reach out on all forms of social media to see if anyone with a good heart(or a bad one haha) would be willing to donate (a dollar, legal advice, ext) to help us get out of this bind. We don't deserve to go to jail for a simple mistake that people make every day. Thanks for reading.
",queer
"Susie Duncan Sexton's Blog - Enough already. #Indiana, simmer down.",,queer
Need help,"I wake up from one day to the next and I'm either attracted to women or attracted to men.

I'm not 'bisexual' (that term is bullshit because it implies that the attraction is sexually based) because I'm repulsed by the notion of having intimacy with the other sex depending on the day. I'm 100 % attracted to either sex in any given day.

I'm looking for a support network to find the resources that can explain why I feel this way. I'm a man and have no desire to be a woman, I just want to know that am not alone in this way -- even thigh we're all beautiful and perfect.

Any suggestions? ",queer
LGBT Research Study,"IRB approved wellbeing study for LGBT community. Raffle for $50 Amazon giftcard. To participate: 

https://memphis.co1.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_08ophVAWR5XUDhb",queer
"Queercore - Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia",,queer
"Queer anarchism - Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia",,queer
Rainbows and Sports: What does Gay Pride Have to Do with America's Favorite Pastime?,,queer
I think the Criterion Collection should totally release But I'm a Cheerleader on Blu-ray.,,queer
"English study looking into LGBTQ/GSM Youth self-harm and suicidal feelings: Online Survey, 15 Mins Long- Living in England, U26 Only",,queer
ESPN Correspondent Kate Fagan Gives FIRST PERSON the Inside Scoop on Coming Out on the Court,,queer
Your kids will love a cookie-decorating party,,queer
"/r/LGBTlibrary - for educational studies, sources, videos &amp; discussions","I'd like to invite everyone at /r/queer to join us over at /r/LGBTlibrary, a subreddit for educating yourself on all things LGBT+ and keeping up to date with the latest study.",queer
We're Here to Queer the Conversation Around Pop Culture and Media! Check out the podcast Media Queery!,,queer
Blogger Nicolette Mason Talks Queer Fashion on New PBS Show “First Person” - Video feat. Nicolette &amp; Arabelle Sicardi,,queer
"The Green Party of Reddit - We're Here, We're Queer - Vote For Us!!","So for those of you who don't know, Reddit has its very own House Of Commons [(MHOC)](/r/mhoc) and we have a general election going on!

The Green party of Reddit fight for people and planet we want to build a society that works for everyone, looks after the environment and stops climate change. 

We are genuinely passionate about queer liberation not least because more than half of of members our members are LGBT+!

Take a look at our [LGBT+ Manifesto](http://mhocgreenparty.dudaone.com/lgbtmanifesto) as well as  [our general manifesto](http://mhocgreenparty.dudaone.com/minimanifesto) and if you like what we are about
[**PLEASE VOTE GREEN HERE!!**](http://www.reddit.com/r/MHOC/comments/3066mz/general_election_megathread/)

Also think about [joining us](http://www.reddit.com/r/MHOC/comments/3066sl/join_a_party/), MHOC is great fun and a good way of learning more about political issues.",queer
My flatmate did a movie about children who grow up with gay parents. Have a look and spread the word!,,queer
Hey nyc queers! I think we can reinvigorate /r/queernyc,"Hey nyc queers! I think we can reinvigorate /r/queernyc with some new peeps. Last post is from 2 years ago and I don't know about you, but I think that's pretty sad considering the thriving queer community in nyc alone :)",queer
'Maroon' - an autobiographical tale of growing up mixed race and genderqueer in Britain,,queer
GET HIGHER BE GAYER - SECOND SERIES OF THE EIGHT PAGE ZINE SAGA,,queer
queer radical novel,,queer
"You, Me, And Fantasy: The Impact of Sharing Sexual Fantasies on Intimacy in Committed Relationships. Participate in a research study looking at the interplay between the disclosure of sexual fantasies and intimacy in committed relationships!",,queer
Perception and Sexual Risk Study [Academic],"Hello All, 

You are invited to participate in our study: 

The Perception and Sexual Risk Study. With this study, we hope to further understand the role perception plays in how we conceptualize sexual risk taking behaviors. 

Participants must be at least 18 years of age or older to complete this survey. Participation is completely voluntary and all responses are kept anonymously. No identifying information such as your name, date of birth or ID number will be collected. This survey will take approximately 30 minutes to complete.

You will be asked questions regarding your demographics, sexual history, and your perception of sexual risk regarding certain sexual behaviors. Your responses to the survey are appreciated and helpful in the further understanding of sexual risk. 

If you would like to participate in this survey, please follow the link provided below:
https://bsu.qualtrics.com/SE/?SID=SV_1RKWnoEybhK33QV

Thank you for your participation!


Principal Investigator:

Sara Comstock, Masters Candidate 
Department of Psychological Science
Ball State University
secomstock@bsu.edu 

Faculty Supervisor:

George Gaither, PhD, HSPP
Associate Professor
Department of Psychological Science
Ball State University
ggaither@bsu.edu 

Reviewed and approved by the Ball State University IRB (protocol # 710415-1)
",queer
The radical queerness of Kate McKinnon's Justin Bieber impersonation on 'Saturday Night Live',,queer
"Ohio dad stabs gender nonconforming child to death, tells police that ‘son was in a cult’",,queer
New subreddit for LGBTQ/NB kinksters!,"All are welcome!!

/r/queerkink is born!",queer
A Blog About Making Gaybies (Gay Babies),,queer
TV Show Casting - families,"My name is Ari and I'm the Casting and Development Assistant at Lucky Dog Films in Washington, DC. We are currently working on a new TV show for a major cable network that will feature same-sex families at different stages in their relationships or lives. 
 
I found this subreddit and I'm hoping either whoever's reading this is interested or that you can help point me in the right direction and give me some guidance on where to cast (maybe you know someone who's more interested or know of a better subreddit / forum for me to post this in). 

I've been browsing reddit for a while but have never had an account before (personal or business) so I'm not sure how to attach our casting call flyer, so here's the text: 

Casting Call: Same Sex Families

A nationwide casting call is underway for same-sex families from across N. America. We're looking for all types of families in different stages of their relationships.

*Are you recently married/joined in a union and starting a life together?

*Are you raising or looking to raise biological/adopted children with your partner

*Are you in a long-term relationship and thinking about taking it to the next level?

If any of these describes you, then contact us! Email us at castingluckydog@gmail.com with the subject line ""Family."" Please include pictures, a bio and a 2-minute video about why your family should be chosen.


I look forward to speaking with you and answering any questions you may have!

Thank you!
Ari",queer
By Felice J. Freyer. State’s steps to control HIV seen as model for nation,,queer
So I just found this subreddit and am wicked freaking excited! Let's make it more active!,"So yeah the word queer means so many different things to each person.  I was wondering what things we could for this subreddit do to make it more active? Do you all feel like this is a subreddit that includes all of your's identities?  Maybe we could list blogs/tumblrs/books/youtube accounts that people would like to share?  
So Yeah I guess i'm making this so that I can see more posts on here and maybe we can throw around some ideas to make it more awesome",queer
"/r/queer, tell me your favorite queer anthems [xpost /r/trans]","Hi /r/Queer -

I am the assistant director on a new play about gender transformation called ""[The T Party](http://forum-theatre.com/the-t-party)"" produced by Forum Theatre in Silver Spring, MD. In the lobby, we're going to have a trans &amp; queer themed karaoke booth, and I've been tasked with compiling the list of songs. What are some of your favorite trans &amp; queer anthems?",queer
"Looking for help with an lgbtq youth project, please submit your stories!","[x-posted]

I am compiling a collection of personal stories and anecdotes for a book that will be given away (at no cost) to schools and students. I want to do this for a couple reasons:

1. To help spread awareness of our community and some of the things we go through, especially in our youth. Also, to make people aware of little known genders and orientations that they may otherwise be ignorant about. Awareness often brings acceptance, which is very important to the members of our community.

2. Second, because it was the anecdotes and stories of others much farther along in their gender journey than I that helped me to realize my own identity as nonbinary. I want this to help anyone else struggling with their identity to discover who they truly are by giving them something they may be able to relate to.

So, if you are trans/queer/gay/bi/asexual/demiromantic/pan/or in any other way a part of the lgbtq community and would like to contribute your story to this project, please do so, and help me help our struggling youth. I am especially looking for stories about your journey, before and as you realized your true gender and orientation. Anything from difficulties you faced, to the times you realized for the first time you were not exactly like all of your peers, or anything else you find important enough to share.

Unless you specifically add a name to attribute the story to, it will remain anonymous, rather you submit it anonymously or not.

Please send all submissions, questions, and offers to assist with the project to:

theanecdoteproject@gmail.com

or I will accept them via pm on reddit and right here in the comments.

Thank you!",queer
A war against the straight world order,,queer
Parents place 'retraction' to birth announcement to show support for trans son,,queer
25 LGBTQ Harvard Students: Marriage Is Not The End,,queer
LGBT Research Survey,"Hi guys,

I am currently carrying out a research project exploring differences in gendered behaviour, well-being, and acceptance. As part of this I am looking for people to complete a short survey that takes around 5-10 minutes to fill out. There are no requirements in order to complete it, anyone can take part.

I am really hoping to find some meaningful results that will be a help to the LGBT community, so the more people taking part the better. Please forward this on to your friends if you have the time!

If you are interested, the survey can be found here:
https://jfe.qualtrics.com/form/SV_a9vAMnLk2S5KJ7L

Thanks so much for your time!",queer
Queer Musicology (reading+connections),"Hey, everyone!

I'm applying to a graduate program to study queer musicology and I'm looking for connections and readings on the subject.

My current interests are in the possibilities of queer modes of listening to art music and the possibilities of a queer aesthetics of western art music. Other tangental interests are in overcoming inaccessibility to institutions and reluctance to embracing art music.

Looking forward to future discussion!
-Ryan

Stuff brought up here:
Tchaikovsky:

* Rictor Norton, [""Gay Love-Letters from Tchaikovsky to his Nephew Bob Davidof""](http://rictornorton.co.uk/tchaikov.htm), Gay History and Literature, 19 October 2002, updated 22 November 2011 &lt;http://rictornorton.co.uk/tchaikov.htm&gt;.
* Malcolm Hamrick Brown. ""Tchaikovsky and his music in Anglo-American criticism, 1890s-1950s"". Eds. Fuller, Sophie, and Lloyd Whitesell. Queer Episodes in Music and Modern Identity. Urbana: University of Illinois Press, 2002. Print.",queer
What is Queerness to you?,"Queer is a term that everyone has a different definition of, and that is in fact why I love it so much. 
Queer is always changing and encompasses all.
Queer is oneness.

I was hoping that you kind people of reddit could share what your definition of the term means and how you believe you live a queer lifestyle.

If you do feel passionately about queerness and want to share issues of sexual frustration, acceptance, or any problems you do not feel comfortable on this post, message me personally! ",queer
"At 51, I'm going to define myself as queer - not gay, queer.","What does this mean to me? First off, I'd be traditionally considered a straight black male. Loved girls since day one. But at six, I was sexually assaulted by an older boy, at 14 I'd had consensual sexual relationship with a 25 year old female cousin. It ain't been some straight and narrow path. 

I've had a few long term relationships but I've never been married and I'm pretty sure I never will. Never had kids and not seeing how that will ever happen considering where I am now.

Today, I consider myself largely asexual, as in as much as I'd like companionship, for the last several years I've been non-sexual (2 one-night stands and a strip bar.) I masturbate but only occasionally and more as a sleep aid or a pipe cleaner. Looking at traditional porn leaves me sad and wistful (not attracted to gay porn or men at all) so I usually rub one out to T-girls which seems to be my preference.  I've even had my share of t-girl escorts and even dated three in my younger, wilder days but the truth is anal sex with a t-girl is kind of not my thing. At some point fecal matter on my penis is inevitable and I don't like that. Also, I don't like the little things that differentiate MTF trans bodies from CIS female bodies namely the lack of vagina... but I have no problem with a small, ""feminine penis"" (which makes sense when you see a pretty, delicately framed t-girl. Recently, I've entertained the thought of having a t-girl peg me, as much  for the sensation of her laying on my back and grinding (my favorite thing for a female to do to me.)

I think this confession might be way to get ownership of myself in a way I've never done. Because I figure if you define yourself, there's no box they can put you and I think I'm queer (or Q in some circles.) 

Full confession, this woke me up. It's something I've thought about for years but didn't know how to work it out. I never felt gay but knew I was something other than straight (I guess.)",queer
OkCupid expands gender and sexuality options,,queer
Being Called It,,queer
"Hello! Me and my friend wants to make a fashion brand that makes unusual clothing like what you see in the Capitol in Hunger Games, and we're aiming to be very queer-friendly as we're both agender - but we could not agree on a name! Please help us by voting in this strawpoll. Have a very nice day!",,queer
QUEER STUDIES EVENT - LOS ANGELES,,queer
Book suggestions,"My gender studies in literature class allows us to read a book of our choice with an understanding that it is relatable to the class. I was wondering if anyone had any suggestion. We will also be having to write research papers on the book, so it may need to be popular enough for literary discussions going on. We have already read things like Middlesex, Written on the Body, and Sula, and I have read Maurice before. Does anyone have any suggestions?
Thank you in advance sorry for misspellings.",queer
"Political Nerds and Roleplaying Enthusiasts of the World, Unite!","Comrades,
 
We are the Model House of Commons (MHOC) Communist Party. We are currently running for seats in the General Election, and we would like to ask your help in helping us achieve victory. Please note that this is a roleplaying community, and we would appreciate your cooperation.
 
__________
**What is the MHOC**
 
The Model House of Commons is a community of political enthusiasts who have come together to debate and legislate. It is a mock British House of Commons that consists of 8 parties, loosely based on their real-life counterparts:

* Communist Party
* Celtish Workers League
* Greens
* Labour
* Liberal Democrats
* Conservatives
* United Kingdom Independence Party
* British Imperial Party
 
Please visit /r/MHOC for more information.
 
____________
[**What we stand for**](http://imgur.com/a/7Ar7N)
 
[Please click to read the full manifesto of the Communist Party]( https://docs.google.com/document/d/1zTLdM3lKWfzvXy9cYUNKAeHkGZm2p_CQehToGtdn2ZI/edit?pli=1)
 
* Economic Democracy – supporting worker-owned cooperatives, 30-hour workweek, and raising the minimum wage until our ultimate goal of a classless, moneyless, stateless society is achieved.

* [Green Economy](http://i.imgur.com/pzSHo8q.jpg) – We pledge to make concrete strides towards Britain being entirely free of fossil fuels. Invest in electronic automotive technology and mass-transit infrastructure.
* [Education]( http://i.imgur.com/1n1tiXo.jpg) – Success is not high marks. Success is the capacity to develop academically, socially, and emotionally. We will expand the primary and intermediate level curriculum to focus also upon the social skills and personal development. Teachers, students and parents will have democratic control over the education system to ensure that each school's curriculum can be tailored to ensure the best possible education for its students.
* Science &amp; Technology – Increase government spending on R&amp;D to 1.5% of GDP. Research into labour-saving technology, sustainable technology and energy efficiency shall be highly incentivized, and all government-funded academic work shall be openly accessible and free of charge to the general public.
* [Liberation Issues](http://i.imgur.com/PVByJUb.jpg) – The Communist Party is committed to the complete liberation of all people from the social antagonisms formed within class society.
* [Nuclear Disarmament](http://i.imgur.com/WWJe0yV.jpg) – the atom ought to be used as a source of power and life, not a means of coercion and death. We propose unilateral nuclear disarmament.
* Military Reform – We are committed to demobilizing all but 30,000 active duty soldiers and 20,000 reserves. Instead of a large standing army we will create popular militias. Every able-bodied citizen will be encouraged to train and be prepared to defend their home from counterrevolutionary invasion.
* [Defense of the Working Class]( http://i.imgur.com/HJaWAU0.jpg) - There is no assurance that the capitalist class will give up their rank without resorting to despotic means. Any citizen who purchases arms would need certification and training to ensure proper use and safety.
 
________________
**How to Vote**
 
*Note that your Reddit account must be at least 2 months old to vote*

If you're not from the UK, please select any region to vote in.
 
* Please vote here: http://www.reddit.com/r/MHOC/comments/2kew00/general_election_megathread/
 
**AND**
 
* Confirm your vote here by posting: http://www.reddit.com/r/MHOCGEVOTES/comments/2k0hey/verify_your_vote_below/
 
IF YOU DO NOT VERIFY YOUR VOTE THEN IT WILL NOT COUNT
___________
[**Join the Communist Party!!**](http://i.imgur.com/lpLsrsm.jpg)
 
We’re always looking for new members. If interested, please post in the Join a Party thread: http://www.reddit.com/r/MHOC/comments/2kima2/join_a_party/
 
Then please private message /u/audiored in order to verify and expedite your party approval.
 
__________
 
Thank you for your votes, comrades. Please feel free to ask any questions about it!
",queer
Major Marriage Majority,,queer
"Just thought i might try and get some advice from here as well. A slight twist on the classic ""does my straight best friend crush love me""(x-post from r/gay Maybe slightly NSFW, slightly graphic story)",,queer
Why same-sex marriage is annoying...,"...because there are literally 2-3 wedding ""congratulations"" cards that are appropriate in any card store we visit. And they all suck.

My wife and I have 2 dear friends who, despite being together for &gt;20 years, have been unable to be married in Pennsylvania. Well, thanks to our courageous attorney general, we finally have marriage equality! Which is awesome, and, our dear friends, as of yesterday, have tied the knot!

So, this brings me to the problem. We stopped in hallmark first, only to discover that half of the cards in the entire wedding section referred to ""his and hers"" ""she and him"" ""husband and wife"" ""man and wife"" ""mr and mrs"" or something else based on traditional marriage. Then, the rest of the cards usually had pictures of wedding cakes, with a topper of a man and a woman, or silhouettes of a man and woman, etc. The few that didn't fall in that group were either ""to the grooms"" or ""mr and mr"", but they all were meant for brand new couples. The interior messages saying things like, ""Congratulations on your new journey!"" which would be great, except they've been living together for well over 20 years.

So, on to papyrus.

SAME DAMN THING. Seriously, check out their website:
http://www.papyrusonline.com/greeting-cards/wedding-cards/same-sex-wedding-cards.html

Those are just the explicitly ""same sex"" cards, but the rest of their wedding cards nearly all have some other sort of problem with them.

We finally found a card wishing them congratulations on their marriage, and telling them to have a fantastic life together. It's simple, sweet, and gets the point across. 

But seriously? That was frustrating! What's worse is that they're pretty popular guys, and I am pretty damn sure that someone else out of their scores of friends is going to get them the same damn card! I mean, they really have like 8 total to choose from.

On the upside, the store clerk in Papyrus came out to us when we told him what we were looking for, and we ended up talking and laughing for about a half hour about the absurdity of the lack of cards for same-sex marriage.

So, someone needs to start a business, pronto. I'm delivering the business idea to you here. Go for it! Make some millions!",queer
Check out the TOP 5 of straight characters played by gay actors...,,queer
Is there a word for my sexuality?,"I'm a girl. I have only ever been attracted to one person, a girl, in my life. I love her very much, but I was attracted to her before I started to love her. I guess I have no desire to have sex in the traditional sense, but I am a mutual gainer.

I've tried to find a word that describes my sexuality, but I haven't found one. Does anyone know what to call me? It gets annoying when people ask and I have to either explain or just (inaccurately) say I'm gay.",queer
My Voice | Why I Am Not Transitioning My Voice | MTF Transgender,,queer
Fucking Foucault!,http://50shadygays.wordpress.com/2014/06/24/fucking-foucault/,queer
"On Being a Rad, Mad, Queer Mama, by Nina Packebush [X-Post from /r/neurodiversity]",,queer
Indiegogo Campaign for LGBT Short Film Double Date,,queer
My Queer Prom Experience | Apology | Update,,queer
WHAT TO EXPECT When You Tell Someone You're In Love!,,queer
"When meeting me, a queer woman of color",,queer
WHAT TO EXPECT When You Tell Someone You're A Lesbian (PART 2),,queer
Could you help me find some academic sources about fluidity in female sexuality please? (x-post),"Hello!  I am writing a research paper for my college LGBTQ psychology class, and the topic is about fluidity in female sexuality.  Could any of you help me in finding some academic sources relating to this?  It can include information on lesbian-identified women, straight-identified women, bisexual-identified women, queer-identified women, ""heteroflexible"" women, ""barsexuals,"" any experimentation, etc..  Also since this is a research paper, all of my sources have to be from peer-reviewed journal articles or books.  Thanks!",queer
WHAT TO EXPECT When You Tell Someone You're A Lesbian,,queer
All I wanted was To love and be LOved,"“All I want is love”
(Part I)
First wound
When I was a kid all I was told by my parents and teachers that we are supposed to spread the message of love that god has blessed all of us with. Ever since my kinder garden days I was fascinated by the idea of falling in love…… when I was I my teens I was so much dreamy about what would it be like when I fall in love….will the violins play and butterflies fly and was nearly sure that the time will stop for that moment when I see the love of my life standing right in front of me. For me love was the most passionate moment as they say in mills n boons, the strongest emotion which triumphs over every evil of life like our Bollywood movies describes.
It was a kind off a aim of my life to fall in love with someone.
By then I didn’t knew the concept of cast, community, religion, sect, color or any form of discrimination until our great education system actually sowed a seed of casteism and likely terms in form of knowledge in my dumb mind. 
I got my education from a public school which isn’t very fancy but the best my parents could afford and mind it I was the best student they ever had (they certified it on my farewell) so all the high society urbane stuff was a bit alien to me.
Well it was my ninth grade I remember clearly immediately after the science period in which we came across a term of artificial insemination, since I was more of a loner in school so I was always into reading books, henceforth I had read theory of reproduction like in my 6 or 7 grade so it wasn’t new to me at all. And my class mate asked me what it was so, me being a super helping hand explained it all in detail to him. And he just asked me how many times did I jerk off out of all the blue’s…..well I must say I was a bit startled that where did this come from, so I just said may be twice or sometime thrice a day and sometime not even once in weeks. 
And the discussion went on and he asked me how did my thing looked like and I told him and I reciprocated the same question and he told me. I found his description a bit dissimilar to me so I went home and opened my books and found out what was that difference and it came to me that he’s circumcised, so it was all clear in my head all over again.
Few days later it was all summer vacations going on and I was home with my mom enjoying my vacation (they sucked badly I hated staying home), I normally had to stay indoors because my parents won’t just let me go out and play on streets so me got all back into my books again. They one day the same class mate called me up and asked about my holiday homework and all. And they some days later he called me again and I was kind of happy that may be I have finally made one friend yeppie. Then once I called him and he said he was busy and will call me later, and after like 20 min or so he called me back and we started chit chatting, he was kind a bit too excited so I asked him what’s up so he told me he was watching a porn flick and told me what it was and stuff, I didn’t had computer at my house or DVD player or even CD player at my place so I was not into them, in fact I didn’t even knew what it was. So I went to my dictionary and found what it was. And I was, to use a proper word super horny and wanted to see it. So I asked my friend. He refused me as his parents were home and a 10 more reasons. So the idea just faded away lately but with a nice time in visualization of course.
Then vacations gone by and school came up and usual school routine. My friend started having lunch with me, it was a shock to me because I was the last person whom anybody in whole school would talk because they thought I was a jerk who stayed into books and sissy because I loved art when other boys liked football and maybe a million more reasons and yes I was a cry baby. Sobbing over every senti thing. But him sitting over lunch with me was something I never expected. So I was definitely happy, over lunch we talked about various things 90% about pornos and sex though, the changes coming in our bodies and girls and all. One day I again asked him if he could show me porno. So he said I’ll have to show him my thing, well it wasn’t big thing for me because I thought he’s a guy I am a guy and yes I wanted to see a circumcised thing. 
So it was a deal and I was amongst the students on duty to send students to classes after lunch break from grounds and I was allowed to enter class 10 min later in lecture. So I asked him to accompany me and after the student were gone we went to washroom, entered the a small cabin for pooping and I stood in front of him shying like a girl, so he showed his thing first and obviously I was oh!!! Wao…then I showed him mine. He touched my and smiled and said “yours is big and funny” well I was super hard and he was semi. But the funny element was my foreskin going up and down. We smiled and he said lets jerk off. 
I knew we had 7 mints and that would be enough so we started and then I don’t know who did it first but we held each other’s thing and jerked each other off. Then we entered the class happy happy and I was super excited because he invited me to his house next week. 
Then 2 days later we landed up in the bathroom once again but this time he had something in his hand well it was like a greasy balloon rolled in nearly impossible tight role, and I was guessing in mind what it could be and he told me that it was condom. It was quite different from what I had imagined from books but it was eyuck! The greasy was too smelly. He said he wanted to try something and he said if I participated equally and didn’t tell anyone about it then I will have unlimited access to him house i.e. pornos. So I told him yes. And next thing I knew was that he wanted me to bend over and I did. Then he rolled that condom on his hard male member and tried to thrust it into my butthole. It was the sharpest and the most painful physical pain that I ever experienced. I tried to stop but couldn’t help gasping and low screams. I asked him to stop and tried to withdraw myself but he held me tight. And tried again but his thing was too large for my tight hole to penetrate. 
Then he asked me to stuff my handkerchief in my mouth. I knew if I screamed then the washroom maid would come in and we will get busted badly and suspended. And after all I had first said yes to the deal so I did it and put my handkerchief in my mouth. And then all I knew was that tears were rolling down my cheeks and I had immense uncontrollable painful moment in my life, then in few more strokes he was completely inside me and it was even more painful and he was thrusting himself in me again and again fast and hard. It was a nightmare. But I controlled myself from breaking down and became bold enough to ask him to stop and let me go. But he pacified me that it was just about to get over. And I could do the same to him but maybe there was something else in my mind that I didn’t wanted him to go through that pain. (We’ll get to that later). Then he had his first real sexual orgasm as I put it. And he withdrew himself and kissed me on cheek saying thanks and left the cubicle along with me lying there withering in pain trying to hold both of my thighs and cheeks firmly together as possible. Finally picking my courage I touched myself deep down there and when I saw my hand then all my tears went dry and it just blacked out for a moment it was blood. I was scared and frightened, but thanks to whatever thought came into my mind at that moment I just washed myself but it was still bleeding and I still had to go to my class and attend the next 3 lectures before school could get over so all I did was fold my handkerchief and place it like a pad in the inners of my butts and wear my pants.
I don’t know what I should call the phenomenon that happened in that bathroom cubicle. But I was not the same person coming out of it, I was somehow a new person. 
I had always been loner and quite in my life whose face never said much to anybody. So I knew all I had to do was make a dead face and walking into my class upto my desk and sit down and wait for school to get over.
But I don’t know why I felt that everybody I crossed from the ground floor to fourth floor till my classroom looked at me in a very very creepy way. And was mocking at me and I felt like a laughing stock. But I walked and entered my class and sat next to the guy to whom I had lost my virtue.
We didn’t talk the whole time it was I guess awkward silence in between us. And after the school got over I went home unable to ride my bicycle or walk properly so I deflated my bicycle wheel and took a rickshaw home and went to washroom as soon as I could and took a long shower and cried my heart out and washed all the wounded area. And when mum asked me why am  I looking so devastated the reply I gave was my favourite girl in a novel died in to story without meeting her love and she laughed at me. And all she said was “son, that’s life” her words had meant something quite different to me.
 Few days later as the second part of the deal he invited me to his home, introduced me to his family and they were really good very good to me, god bless those noble people. Then we went to his room and started talking and he showed me his video games and stuff and we played Mario for a while, soon his parents left for office and some places wherever they had to, and he logged in to his internet and we watched porno. And then out of nowhere he got gay porn on and showed me how it was being done and it was cool. I felt a bit relieved that it was not un-natural and I wasn’t the only one who got my “ass fucked”.
Then we jerked off and thank god he didn’t have condom and we didn’t wanted to do it bareback thankfully I had read a lot about STD’s (AIDS to be precise) or else I would have been doomed. And then few days later he got me a card saying “to my best friend” I was in heaven. Yes may be I was in love with him and maybe he too. And I was happy about it in fact super-duper happy. 
For me it wasn’t that I was in love with a guy or girl which mattered, what made difference to me was that I was in love and I had to be honest and loving to my partner. Though he never said that he loved me or anything of that kind but may be my ass-o-holic mind thought he was. We started hanging out together in breaks. And it was fun. And then once we were at his home I had bunked my tuition and then again we did it. It was again that very painful for me and I did cry but he hugged me later and I was kind of fine and happy.
I was in love, I blushed when he was around me, butterflies did fly and even violins played the most romantic tunes, all off a sudden life seemed to have found a meaning. Rain felt as if it was a blessing and everything was beautiful.
Well it was exactly one month later when he was absent in class and one of his friends came to me and said “hey, launde/faggot!!! I know your little secret, but don’t worry it will remain a secret as long as I get something similar” and then he told me all had happened between me and my “so called love” with details. And my castles of love had the earthquake and they were in ruins. 
My only reply to that fellow was “go ahead and tell everyone and I will make sure that you and your friend are suspended in a RAPE case” though I was hurt enough to do it. But that bastard saint in me told me leave it. It happened because I was the one who invited it. Now shut up and forget it. And also I was too attached to him that I didn’t want to hurt him at all. I just wanted him to be happy even if it was on my cost. 
But I did dare to go and ask him a question “WHY” and all I got as an answer was that “dude! Everyone knows you are a sixer/ launda/gay/bondu/gandu etc etc. and I thought you might help me lose my virginity and you did.”
Well, all I did was cry for like whole ninth and tenth grade till I became too involved in my studies that I didn’t had time to think.
I don’t still have an answer to my question “WHY” but this time it’s not for him, this question is for someone deep within me.
I just loved someone without knowing what love was. For me it was special and I was honest. 
Off all those years of being all alone, being commented on, being tormented on, being insulted all I wanted was someone who could just stand by me and say “I am his friend and I am proud of him”.
All I wanted was to love and be loved.
I lost my virtue when I was 14 years old (13’ July’ 2004)
",queer
"an oral history project documenting the diverse experiences of rural, small town, &amp; country LGBTQI folks in the U.S.A.!",,queer
"Hey guys! In my college English class, we are currently attempting to define queer gender/identity in order to better analyze the book of poems To Go Without Blinking by Aimee Herman. Would anyone here be able to help us out?","If this question is offensive to anyone I am truly sorry. I don't mean it to be malicious or degrading at all. Rather, I want a better understanding on the subject. Thanks so much in advance for your help.",queer
"Hey queers, are there any movies/tv shows in which queer ladies and queer gentlemen are actually buddies? I feel like almost everything I've seen has either been about gay men OR gay women.","So I've recently discovered and fallen in love with the web series Kelsey (www.congestedcat.com/kelsey--check it out if you haven't, but don't read the description on the site, it doesn't do justice), and part of what I like about it is that it's super refreshing to see a show about a close group of friends of different sexual orientations (and races). There are some things I don't like about the show too, and there are plenty of movies about just queer men or just queer women I like, but since watching Kelsey I've sort of had an itch to watch something not specifically about gay men or gay women, but about, well, queers. And I've found that itch difficult to scratch.

I dunno. I'm a lesbian and I have friends all over the spectra of of sexuality and gender. I'm also a writer, and kind of a nerd about stuff like the role of narratives in shaping our identities etc., and I think there's a lot of power in seeing one's experience rendered in art and/or popular culture. And I guess what I'm saying is, I'd like to see this particular aspect of my experience rendered. 

So: queer buddy movies? Movies in which queer men and queer women (and if possible queer non-binary people, although that might be setting the bar a little high for pop culture) don't live in separate worlds, but in fact play important roles in each other's lives? The only one I'm really thinking of is But I'm A Cheerleader. Anything else? Am I missing something obvious?",queer
"Queer and Trans Subjects in Iranian Cinema: Between Representation, Agency, and Orientalist Fantasies",,queer
"Djuan Trent, Miss Kentucky 2010, Comes out as Queer",,queer
A queer feminist Muslim you should meet,,queer
Ratchet Islam: Rethinking Muslim Gender,,queer
"Irish sensation Panti Bliss: ""Why accept low levels of homophobia?""",,queer
Support Trans* Inclusive Healthcare at the University of Illinois at Urbana-Champaign,,queer
The Pakistani Closet: On Coming Out,,queer
Arizona Mormon mom defends her gay son against the dodos in her state and church [Video],,queer
"Blog dedicated solely to queer headcanons, discussions, fanfic and fanart of comic characters and superheroes",,queer
"Did you enjoy Looking? ""HBO’s ‘Looking’: A Breath of Fresh, Queer Air""",,queer
A letter to my fellow queers. You are powerful.,,queer
Leave a voicemail to participate in making ART about GENDER.,"CALL TO PARTICIPATE IN MAKING ART! I am a queer artist making a video art piece on the gender binary. So:

If you have EVER felt like your gender and your biological sex were not in harmony, or if you have ever crossed gender boundaries; if you ever thought gender ""rules"" were standing in the way of you doing what you wanted to do; if you have ever played with taboo regarding gender, I'm interested in getting a voicemail from you. Here's what I'm looking for: please think of a statement you think is powerful regarding your gender. The tone can be funny, grave, intellectual, provocative, whatever you'd like. It should be one to three sentences long, and start with the phrase ""I don't..."" Then call the Google Voice mailbox for this project at (617) 356-8092, and leave me your message. When you call it will first ask you your name. Then it will ring a few times and the voicemail will pick up.

Your messages will be used as part of an audio collage laid over video of ""The Pink Aisle"" (the aisle of pink toys ""for girls"" in Walmart, Toys R Us, etc.). Even though the images will be of the Pink Isle, I'm very interested in including people of ALL genders and sexes. It's also worth pointing out that I'm interested in hearing from you regardless of whether you identify as straight, queer, cis, or trans. All people have experiences of gender roles confining them, and all degrees of that experience are valid.

NOTE: Feel free to submit anonymously OR give your name. If you provide a name, be sure to spell it for me. Anyone who would like to provide their name will be credited in the video, and I will share it when it's done (probably around April 2014) on my new Vimeo channel, which is user24340142.

Thanks!
Ari K 

PS. Originally posted using the wrong account.  Sorry!",queer
Thoughts on being possibly transgendered,,queer
"Dear Gay Community, Equality Is More Than Just Marriage: Part I",,queer
"The Queer Detainee Empowerment Project is forging to fill a gap in NYC to serve queer, trans, and HIV+ detainees. Your funds will go to assist us in post- release services. Please donate today!",,queer
HuffPost Brooklyn Drag King Feature,,queer
Anti-LGBT cardinal: Catholic church isn’t anti-gay and was ‘out-marketed’ on same sex marriage,,queer
Great pullover to come out with,,queer
People of ALL Gender Presentations Wanted!,"Hi! I'm doing a presentation on gender for my school in the next couple weeks, and possibly writing a paper on my research later on. It's looking at gender identity and the future of our society. I'd really appreciate if you would take this quick survey and help me gain some more perspectives on these topics. 
Thanks! 

https://www.surveymonkey.com/s/DTXPC7P
",queer
"Report: LGBT immigrant detainees face higher risk of sexual assault, abuse",,queer
How many cops does it take to arrest 2 black gay teens playing in the st? Try 40.,,queer
"This is kind of an odd question, but can anyone around here help me find something academic?","Someone was asking me if there are any bisexual criticisms of Adrienne Rich's ""Compulsory Heterosexuality and Lesbian Existence""? In her essay she describes pretty much all experiences of women identifying with women as being different types of lesbianism. It kind of rejects the bisexual option and in that way is erasive, but it seems hard to find any academic ciriticisms of it on that basis, for some reason. Anyone know of any?

Thanks!",queer
HuffPost Brooklyn Drag Queen Feature,,queer
"Bi Notes for a Bisexual Revolution, Review",,queer
Queer Zombie Film,,queer
Kickstarter to independently produce a TV pilot with an all queer main cast,,queer
Author of article on queer people in Oman receives abuse on Twitter,,queer
"And you suddenly wonder what your daughter has told her about you. That you are the wicked witch of the west, no doubt, that you forced her to her state of illusion. That you make her very angry.",,queer
On Russian laws from Russia,"If you can, please help the people in Russia to defend against the onslaught of the religious fundamentalism and political oppression.

Most of you probably already know that LGBT rights are under attack, what many do not realise is that they are citing the laws as they were originally proposed. Before being passed the language in those laws has been changed to make them more encompassing. Current laws do not speak of ""gay propaganda"", they outlaw any propaganda that states that any ""non-traditional"" sexuality or gender identity is normal.

Of course, LGBT community is currently the first one that feels the force of these laws, and it is great that international LGBT community realises the importance of working across the state borders. However, throughout this struggle it would be helpful to seek more alliances then divisions.",queer
Bruises from a gay bashing,,queer
"“The LGBT movement has been coopted by the very institutions it once sought to transform,” -- Urvashi Vaid’s Wakeup Call",,queer
"""Happy Birthday Marsha “Pay It No Mind” Johnson!"" (from 6/27)",,queer
Thank Goodness! DOMA is Dead!,,queer
Aaand it's now snowing in hell.,,queer
"We are young slutty guys in Chicago working our art hustle everyday and we love to share that love, that consent-based sex with the many cute people we meet along the way.",,queer
Any queer harry potter nerds out there?,,queer
Cross-Dressing: An American Pastime,,queer
Do No Harm: Intersex Surgeries and the Limits of Certainty,,queer
Rooster Tails - The Pretty One,,queer
"""I am not sure where or how or when, in all my mind's wandering, I first came to Positive Wishing, but I believe it was near the outset of my choosing to stop adhering to my parents’ reality. Not that linear constructs matter...""",,queer
"Sierra DeMulder - ""To Michelle Bachmann"" (WoWPS 2013)",,queer
"""Born This Way"" Or Not: No Justification Required",,queer
"Same-Sex Marriage Does Threaten ""Traditional"" Marriage",,queer
DOUBLE DUCHESS - DEVIANT (Official Video),,queer
My friend has started a Web series I think you all would like.,,queer
Maria Toorpakai: The Pakistani squash star who had to pretend to be a boy,,queer
Queer Musicians Needed for Indie Zombie Film,,queer
People Like Me: a Yelp-like app for the LGBT community ,,queer
"Casey Legler, a woman who is an artist and former Olympic swimmer, and who also works as a male model",,queer
Homosexual and bisexual men and women needed for an anonymous online survey on sexiness,"Hi Redditers,

I am completing a PhD in Psychology looking at the factors that relate to self-perceived sexual attractiveness. 

I am looking for men and women over the age of 18 to complete an anonymous online questionnaire. I have had a great overall response in other subreddits but would like a larger homosexual and bisexual representation in my sample.

The questionnaire will take approximately 30 minutes to complete and may be carried out in your own time and in your own environment. 

I imagine the results from my study will be interesting to most of you and as a thank you I will post a document detailing my results (when I have them) to Reddit.

I hope you enjoy the study and maybe learn a little about yourself through completing it! 

To participate please visit:

http://www.deakin.edu.au/psychology/research/nataliecentner/ ",queer
An Open Letter to the Girl I Pretended To Have a Crush On in Eighth Grade,,queer
Gender queer meetup group in Boston,"Hi all, I'm part of a gender queer meetup group in Boston and we're interested in getting more members/meeting more people. We usually meet around the Cambridge/Somerville area. If anyone's interested: http://www.meetup.com/Boston-Area-Gender-Queer-Meetup/",queer
We're Here: announcing the first ever Queer Documentary Challenge,"Hello all! I am involved in something pretty cool that I wanted to share with everyone (and I hope this is an appropriate place). I'm trying to spread the word and am happy to hear what other subreddits might be interested and/or appropriate.

I work for a non-profit org called KDHX, and we've launched the first ever **global Queer Doc Challenge -- this is a documentary film competition that gives you 5 days to complete a short (4-8 minute) doc on an issue surrounding the LGBTQ community.**

[The Vital Voice did a good piece on us here.](http://thevitalvoice.com/lifestyle/57-lifestyle/857-the-queer-doc-challenge)

Thanks for reading. We are hoping for real stories from all corners of the globe. Also, some of the some of the biggest film festivals and venues in America (the Hot Docs Canadian International Documentary Festival in Toronto, the Hollywood Theatre in Portland, Oregon, the Seattle International Film Festival, and QFest in St. Louis, Missouri) have committed to screenings, which is great news!

[The website is here](http://www.queerdocchallenge.org), and if your team would like to register [you can do that right here.](https://queerdocchallenge.org/2013-challenge/participant-registration)

Please don't hesitate to ask questions! Thanks all :)

TL;DR The Queer Doc Challenge is super cool and it's here!",queer
the real issue facing queer youth (hint: it's not marriage),,queer
new collaborative writing project to share funny/awkward/touching romantic anecdotes from a queer perspective. we need submissions!,,queer
DAE use another more common label for simplicity?,,queer
A great Queer pioneering food carts and bikes,,queer
Where Does 'Queer' Fit In?,,queer
queers behind fences? careful what you wish for...,,queer
Chicago queer movers and shakers interviewed,,queer
"Love, Rage and the Occupation, Part 3: the JOH protest vigil (2006) | Bi radical",,queer
question: I 'identify' myself as a lesbian but really have the urge to dress in drag - would this acceptable or insulting to the drag community?,"I admire the power, strength, and courage that drag queens carry. I have been wanting to try it myself. For the reason of... embodying this character sounds thrilling. Being more of a woman that I already (physically) am, I am the type of lesbian that can rock the my style I own, but when it comes to that next step of our fabulousness... its not my territory. ",queer
"A Gay Man's Life - A Life UNkind
",,queer
"Allan and Jackson Love America:  Independent Progressive Radio - Episode 13 - Allan and Jackson's Big Gay Show (Obama vs Romney, WA pastor wants to take ""gay"" back)",,queer
"Love, Rage and the Occupation, Part 2: Queeruption (2006) | Bi radical",,queer
Cynthia Nixon and Bisexual Choice,,queer
What does queer mean to you?,"I think most of us find the label ""queer"" empowering because of its versatility, and it means a lot of different things to different people. One of my favorite uses is it can be an umbrella term to include anyone in the LGBT community that doesn't identify as L-G-B-or-T (but don't consider themselves straight).

But I also identify as queer specifically, and I'm sure I'm not the only one. So tell me, queerit, what does ""queer"" mean to you? I'll start:

* Queer for me means I don't experience categorical attraction. Gay people are attracted to the same gender, categorically. Straight people to the opposite gender. Bi people are categorically attracted to both, while pan people are categorically (or hypothetically) attracted to anyone across the gender spectrum. NOTE: this does not mean they're attracted to EVERYONE, but simply that they view the opposite/same/any gender as a category to which they are attracted, while individuals may or may not conform to their standards of attractiveness for that category.
* I don't experience this. I'm attracted to people on a much more case-by-case basis, and I have trouble finding ways to describe the kinds of people I'm attracted to in categorical terms.
* At the same time, I'm not attracted to all points on the gender spectrum, as a rule, which is why I'm uncomfortable with pansexual. So one thing queer does is let me distinguish myself from pan. It also lets me distinguish myself from straight, which I get mislabeled as a lot (I'm male who has been dating a woman for more than a year; most people misinterpret my heterosexual behavior as definitive of my sexual identity).
* If I had to pin down my sexuality, I would say I'm attracted to a) women who perform as masculine, b) women who perform as feminine, and c) men who perform as feminine. But as I say that I'm thinking of exceptions and realizing that this is an artificial imposition, although it does help me understand myself a bit better.


So there you have it. Obviously I've thought about this a lot, so I welcome your thoughts and your personal stories, if you're willing to share. 
",queer
"We're here! We're Queer! Get used to it!: 
introducing /r/queerconlangers, a subreddit for 
queerfolk who love to make languages","Hello, linguists, language lovers, and interested bystanders!

I am proud to present [1] [/r/QueerConlangers](/r/QueerConlangers) , a subreddit for QUILTBAGs[1] who are interested in constructed languages.

We are still a very small subreddit so, we invite any interested parties to join us in learning and creating constructed languages which express queer experiences.

We will insist on a strict anti-bigotry policy, but questions will be allowed if asked in a respectful manner.

I will be accepting questions and comment in this thread and in my inbox. 

Thank you for your time and consideration! :)

[1] Queer, Questioning, Undecided, Intersex, Lesbian, Trans*, Bisexual, Asexual, Gay people",queer
Queer Avengers tumblr,,queer
The Queer Movement is so important...but its language excludes people with limited education.,"Please, please, for the love of what's good, can we move past post-modernistic language?

A quote from a link previously submitted: ""It is within our aesthetic and subjective multiplicity that I feel firmly confident describing ourselves as part of a queer moment, a moment that refuses singularlity, a recombinant moment, a complex collision of discreet historical moments embodied by variegated aesthetics.""

I am a college-educated person, and I have no idea what this means.  The people who really stand to benefit the most from the support and information of the queer community (think a young high schooler living in a rural area) probably have no idea what it means.

But, you say, these are complicated ideas and they need complex language.  No, they don't.  If Howard Zinn can explain the wrongdoings of the US throughout its history at a high school reading level, so can you.

There's something almost classist about writing this way.  Feminism is starting to abandon it, and the Queer movement should, too.
How about it? ",queer
Queer Identity/Politics Survey,"Hi! I'm a Psychology/Gender Studies student in Florida doing a survey on queer identity and politics for my undergraduate thesis research. My school has given me enough funding to give $5 Starbucks ""eGifts"" to the first 80 people to complete the survey. There are 11 questions (regarding your understanding of what queer identity and politics mean, and demographic info), and by voicing your opinion on the meaning of queer, you'll be contributing to an area that's unfortunately misunderstood by many psychologists and clinicians (AND you'll be supporting my dreams of graduating and improving health care for queer-identified people)!

[Here's the survey!](https://www.surveymonkey.com/s/2SGDC5P)

Thanks for your time and thought!",queer
Feminist Rihanna,,queer
"""Where Does 'Queer' Fit In"" from The Bilerico Project",,queer
"Cuba: Interview with Mariela Castro, director of the National Centre for Sex Education (CENESEX)",,queer
Rainbow Cuba: the sexual revolution within the revolution,,queer
"What does ""queer"" mean?",Is it different from gay or lesbian?,queer
Gay Marriage: What the FUCK!? (by Sue-Ann Post),,queer
"Met a Mormon missionary in a gay bar, joined his church, have lived with him ever since, but *not* gay!",,queer
"The strategy... ""BEFORE we have sex let's get tested TOGETHER for A VARIETY of STDs then make an informed decision.""
http://notb4weknow.blogspot.com",,queer
Making Peace with the Grue-some Monsters,,queer
"My best bud came out to his roommates, so we made him this!!!",,queer
Interesting new science on queerness in the animal kingdom.,,queer
r/radicalqueers: A new subreddit for anti-assimilationist queer discussion.,,queer
I really can't tell If I'm gay or not. I need help,"Hello,

I'm 19 years old and in collage, and I can't tell where my sexuality lies. I have had feelings for girls in the past and present and been very much so in love with past girlfriends I've had. Aside from that however I also have had urges to look at gay porn and straight porn alike, When I walk around campus my eye's only do double takes for girls and I never catch myself thinking about wanting to be with a guy. But I will still get urges to look at gay porn even if only a day earlier I looked at straight porn. I keep going back and forth with what I think my sexuality is and its driving me insane. Please help does this sound like I'm gay , bi , or straight 
",queer
"Queer Post-Punk, Post-Anarchist Aesthetics: So Many Histories Colliding",,queer
"Queer Haunting, History, and Our Ecological Crisis",,queer
Do you ever just feel sorry for straight people?,"To most of them, their sexuality is as cut and dry as being straight. Their sex life is vanilla and cisgendered, though they're unaware of those terms. They're spoonfed their sexuality while in the meantime we're out here exploring it, and we've very often found it's not as cut and dry as that we're gay. I think of queerness as a healthy ideal for all humanity to strive for, moving away from heteronormativity. But instead, the ""*gay* rights"" movement has led to the development of homonormativity, to appease people who look down at sex and gender as nothing more than incidental things you shouldn't have to think about ever. This frustrates and saddens me.

How can we as a community encourage straight people to join us as more than just allies?",queer
Is picking a gender category required for a child's healthy development? What say you?,,queer
I can't tell if I'm gay ... I need help :(,"For a couple months now I've realized my feelings for guys, but the problem I'm dealing with is I still have feelings for girls. There is this one guy who every time I see, I smile, I'm giddy, it's as if I have a crush on him. I can't tell whether or not it's because he is so positive and upfront about his sexuality and I'm just attracted to that, because I'm told by my friends that when I'm not in a relationship that I'm an asshole and depressed. I need help :(",queer
GAY MARRIAGE IS SPREADING TO STRAIGHTS AT THE BIG GAY ICE CREAM TRUCK.,,queer
"Help Gay, Lesbian, and Bisexual Well-being Research (15-min. Survey)
","Are you gay, lesbian, bisexual, or questioning your sexual orientation? Please take our anonymous 15-minute psychological research survey on sexual orientation, experiences with stigma, and well-being. Our survey is anonymous, confidential, and over a secure connection. For more information before you decide to participate, follow this link: 
https://www.surveymonkey.com/s/N3BRMJX

Thank you! 
",queer
Slings and Arrows,,queer
Toronto NOW to Mayor Ford: Show up for pride and we'll pick up the tab!,,queer
Is Queer Culture Just Full of Identical People Patting Themselves on the Back?,,queer
The Man Who Couldn't Have Sex With a Tranny,,queer
"Xpost from r/gender - haven't seen this here, what do you guys think?",,queer
"An interesting post against Gaga's ""Born This Way""",,queer
gender neutralizing: porn this way,,queer
I made this queer femme logo for pride this weekend,,queer
A lesbian teen describes her experience at a Utah brainwashing facility (x-post),,queer
agreed. ,,queer
reese kelly discusses coming out as trans to his students,,queer
Do queer women objectify other women the same way men do?,,queer
Virus Comics' take on sexuality,,queer
In your face activism is not dead!  LGBT flash mob to boycott their own employers in SF at the Westin Hotel.  (x-post),,queer
Guest Post: Patrick from My Super Gay Life,,queer
Being Queer Means...,,queer
"Police use violence to break up ""Kisses Against Homophobia"" event",,queer
"So, I got bored and came up with an idea for a sexual liberation flag.",,queer
Copy of a christian group's email campaign to hijack online gay marriage poll. Link to vote inside,,queer
 Who Made You The Drag Queen of the Gay Agenda? | ZackFord Blogs,,queer
"r/demsocialist has registered the channel #demsocialist on the IRC service freenode. We want to help encourage grassroots activism from the left. If you're interested, check out the subreddit and/or check out our chat.",,queer
"Will Shrink Lesley Pilkington, Mother Of A Gay Son, Lose Her License Over Ex-Gay Therapy? ",,queer
"Back when we were voting on Prop 8, I made these posters to put up around my college.",,queer
"DON'T ASK To Fight In Their War, DON'T TELL Them That's What We're For.",,queer
"""Alabastrine Wraiths, Cloaked In Air..."" Manuel Albarran's Metal Accessories -- And Nothin' Else [SFW: No Frontal Nudity, Pornographic Poses]",,queer
"I don;t know if any of you can help me out here, but are there any good queer podcasts?","I read most of my queer news online, but lately I haven't had time, partially because I now spend about five hours each day commuting.  =P

I listen to a lot of podcasts on my commute, mostly politics-related, but I don't know of any good queer podcasts.  Does anybody here have a recommendation or two?

Thanks!  =]",queer
X-Post from /r/atheism: /r/Christianity loves the banhammer,,queer
"Comedians should do a little research before talking about transgenderism. ""I have nothing but total support for you... except, you're still a man.""",,queer
Lesbian-and-Gay-Friendly Political Science Departments - who else thinks this ranking is insane?,,queer
"Does Opposing ""Don’t Ask, Don’t Tell"" Bolster US Militarism? A Debate with Lt. Dan Choi and Queer Activist Mattilda Bernstein Sycamore",,queer
"DADT, The Boyscout Version ""... Boy Scouts does not accept for membership avowed homosexuals,"" he said, adding that the issue would not have arisen had Langbert kept his sexual orientation private""",,queer
"FightingFrankie, a Queer vlog of a 50 yo, DADT ousted vet living, with his go-go boy son.",,queer
"""Shouldn't Bakery Be Allowed to Refuse Gays?""
(uhh...sure thing, BRO)",,queer
"Pre-Op Transgendered Senior voted class king.  School voids the votes as ""Oak"" is registered as a female.  Is the school following rules too closely?",,queer
"x-post from /r/anarchism: Teabaggers vs. Fisters, the debate is over.",,queer
See how straight I look. . . ,,queer
Imperialism is not queer liberation,,queer
Nepal's first transgender politician out to challenge roles,,queer
A Pathetic Attempt to Oppose Same-Sex Marriage,,queer
Queer as a Three-Dollar Bill: When a gay man dates a straight woman,,queer
Lady GaGa Teeth - Bondage Vampires (Hot as hell.),,queer
"x-post from /r/funny, Wide 'n Furry",,queer
"Ireland gives marriage like rights to same sex couples.  Of course being all Catholicy, they won't call it marriage.",,queer
Aziz and her dignity l Trans in Pakistan,,queer
Happy Pride /r/queer.  And Fuck You Achbishop Dolan!  They wore the banner anyways BTW.,,queer
Furry-ism? + Shaving + Orangina + GAY WTFF!,,queer
Toronto: Call for solidarity with queer revolutionaries resisting G20 assimilation.  - Infoshop News,,queer
fuck yeah bearded ladies!,,queer
/r/Queer Logos,"Since this group is now starting to get more active, I thought it'd be nice to have a custom logo.  You can [see them here](http://lgbterrific.imgur.com/queer_logos).  I wasn't really sure what type of logo to design.  There really isn't much of a queer symbol or flag- only the rainbow glbt flag.  As mentioned by Rebel (mod of this group) when we were discussing this, the rainbow's a bit overdone.

I tried working from [LGBT Symbols](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/LGBT_symbols) at Wikipedia, but nothing really helped.  There is, however, a flag for the [anarcho-queer](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Anarcho-queer) movement, consisting of pink and black.  I was hesitant to use that, since this group isn't an anarchy group (although there is that perspective present).  It does make for a good background, however.

I've also been working on different logo ideas for [/r/bisexual](http://www.reddit.com/r/bisexual).  Some of those logos, or ideas from them, can also be used for the logo here.  Feel free to [check them out](http://lgbterrific.imgur.com/bisexual_logos).

**Edit:**  D'oh!  I screwed up the link to the album that has all the logos.  Check them out at: [http://lgbterrific.imgur.com/queer_logos](http://lgbterrific.imgur.com/queer_logos)",queer
"I was pleasantly surprised walking out of 59th St. Station that NYC Atheists had a tent up there.  For those of you who are here and happen to be queer atheists, you might want to look them up.",,queer
"Sexy daddy Tom Brock, Lutheran pastor, reports Slovakia sounds like an awesome gay vacation spot.  Apparently he couldn't resist while there due to ""weird, demonic energy,"" and maybe the gypsies.",,queer
x-post from /r/anarchism: Pink and Black Contingent Takes Over Section of the Pittsburgh Pride Parade - Infoshop News,,queer
Are queers radical?,"After reading through some of the 5th edition of [The Pink and Black](http://bashbacknews.wordpress.com/2010/05/25/from-the-pink-and-black-attack-collective/) e-zine, and seeing the [Austin Queerbomb pride event](http://www.edgeboston.com/index.php?ch=news&amp;sc=&amp;sc2=news&amp;sc3=&amp;id=106663), I began to wonder if ""queer"" is a radical term (as used by Bash Back News).

It's an umbrella term that's all-inclusive for the LGBTABC community (or any non-normative sexual/gender identification).  Does the term imply a more radical thought about nonconformity, or is it a normalized umbrella term that nonconformists also happen to use?  Is the word queer implicit in nonconforming, or is it merely a word for inclusive?  

I guess by its very nature, queer individuals accept nonconformity; but do they also accept conformity, even for those who are GLBT (i.e., is conforming necessarily a bad thing)?  Is there an active queer movement to push for ""the odd"" (who aren't necessarily anarchists), and how is it that they wish to not conform (and want to see different)?  Is the movement trying to simply not conform, or are they trying to change society as a whole so there is no conformation at all?

----
**tl;dr:**  Are queers radical?",queer
"Austin Pride too family-friendly; Queerbomb hosts an ""edgier"" alternative",,queer
"Cross posted from /r/reddit, Marines do the ""Yes"" dance.  This leaves me a bit confused, WTF is the ""Yes"" dance.",,queer
This reddit is no longer 18+/automatically Not Safe For Work.,There is nothing here that demands a 18+ requirement.  I've removed that.  Short sighted I was.,queer
The new Pink and Black Attack zine is out.,,queer
"Usage of the word ""queer""","""Queer"" seems like an odd word.  It has a history of being used as a pejorative (and still can be).  More recently, the word's been used in more positive light (""taken back"").  I think it's moved away from the definition meaning odd/strange, except in a few rare instances.  In many ways, simultaneously used as a pejorative that can be yelled out by homophobes trying to insult and insight fear; and a term of empowerment and inclusiveness of orientations (or genders) that aren't ""normal.""  Some people embrace the term, others dislike it.  Thoughts about it?  Is it a ""bad word?""  Should it be used by the glbt community if so many individuals dislike it?  Just a quick post to bring some activity to this (now unbanned) group.

**Edit:**  This isn't really a NSFW post.  I guess now I know what type of group this was ;)",queer
"Meet Untitled Queen, Host Of 'Bottoms Up' At Brooklyn's Sugarland Nightclub",,queer
Saving Face: Help Scout fund her FFS and get RAD STUFF in return!,,queer
Stunning Brooklyn Drag Queens,,queer
"Interview with Shiri Eisner, author of “Bi: Notes for a Bisexual Revolution”",,queer
"Ze, Zombie",,queer
Today I Realised That I Am the Ultimate (Queer) Heterosexual,"That's right.  Today I realised that I am the ultimate heterosexual...and still queer as hell.  I'm a mid-hormonal transgender woman and was describing how my attractions are to a friend and realised that the only gender I'm NOT generally attracted to are those who identify as trans* women.

My own gender.

I am attracted, however, to cismen, ciswomen, transmen, and genderless folks (and most possibly intersex, though I don't know that I've ever known any).  But just not **my own** gender.  The dictionary definition of heterosexuality is ""a sexual attraction to (or sexual relations with) persons of the opposite sex.""  Well, in a non-binary world (fucking dictionaries), the ""opposite sex"" would be anyone who identifies differently than you.  

Which means I fall under the category of heterosexual.

My mind is still trying to process how absolutely round-about and absurd this is, and I'm pretty sure I made my queer, activist friends' brains all melt out of their ears

I hereby dub this sexuality ""heteroqueer"" and I will love it forever and ever, amen.",queer
"""Gender Funky...""",,queer
ATTENTION. ,"So my best friend,  is a gay teen of 15 years. Dark hair and eyes, I find him attractive Soo.. anyway our town has a shortage of gays, (BOO) and he is very lonely and wants someone to talk to. If you live in Texas, are between the ages of 14-18 ,  and are a gay or bi male, please comment or message me. Please.",queer
It Gets Better: Seattle Police Department Attacks Queer Street Party On Pride Weekend,,queer
"""Funny how teenagers THAT PLAY PRACTICAL JOKES, forget their Mom has old photos of them to post on Reddit! GOTTCHA!!"" Mother embarrasses son by posting childhood photo of him wearing a tutu.",,queer
"Queer Control Records put out a new sampler. Check it out, especially if you've never heard of QCR.",,queer
advice for a Femme: her FTM boyfriend wants to sleep with men,,queer
Pretty Queer unveils more of the best queer writing on the internet,,queer
"""Gay in training""",,queer
"Memo to LDS HQ: Dropping your opposition to civil marriage equality would obliterate the raison d'être of Fred's campaign. Until then, it's game on.",,queer
If gender were a cherry pie...,"Found this on a message board for androgynes a few years back, thought it was amusing (albeit label heavy, which I'm not too keen on, though it was helpful when I was just learning that there was more to the binary gender world).

If Gender were a cherry pie...

* Cisgender individuals would contentedly eat their designated half.

* Transsexuals would throw away their assigned half, and eat the other half.

* Transgenderists would eat the top half, and pay no mind to the flaky pastry below.

* Crossdressers would eat half, and happily wear the other half.

* Transvestic Fetishists would eat half, and save the other half for the thrill of it.

* Drag Queens would sprinkle the entire pie with sequins, and put it on spotlight display.

* Drag Kings would bind one half and pack the other half, while humming ""Putting on the Ritz"".

* Shemales would insist on top billing in ""How to Have Your Cherry Pie and Eat It Too"".

* Intergender folks would eat the very center, but avoid the outer edges.

* Bigender types would alternately munch on either half.

* Ambigender individuals would alternately eat both halves too, using both hands.

* Third Genders folks would substitute ingredients and bake a brand new type of pie.

* Omnigender individuals would cherish the entire pie, except for the extreme outer crust.

* Neutrois would throw away their alloted half, and do nothing with the other half.

* Pangender folks would complain that there wasn't enough pie for everyone.

* And... Gender Transcendent types would eat chocolate cake and be delighted that everyone else had damn good cherry pie.

",queer
Can a Bisexual Woman and a Gay Man Fall in Love?,,queer
"Before You Kick An Obnoxy Wanna-Be Bieber Tween-Boy In The Crotch, You Might Wanna Check The Titsling. The Baby-Dyke Comm Is Burning Hot With BIEBIERIANS! (Uh-huh. As in: Bieb + Lez = you.get.it) ~ The HORROR, The HORROR! ~",,queer
"Juniper Mixer, TheNewGay, Cut Copy (queer events around Boston)",,queer
LDS celebrates Pride 2011: Mormon leader calls for political action against families the LDS church doesn't approve of. ,,queer
-,,queer
This looks like a religion/cult i would DEF join!,,queer
